THE REGICIDES
We dig no lands for tyrants but their graves.
2
THE REGICIDES.
CHAPTER I.
It
was a bitter afternoon in December, the
air was intensely keen and piercing, the snow
had indeed at length ceased falling, but the
heavens looked drear and wintry. The ponds
in the village of Gwere all frozen, not with
that thin and glassy coating the first ray of
sunshine dissolves; a smooth and substantial
surface
now bore the buoyant tread of the skaters.
A finer snow fall had not been known in the
season
,
the solid and beautiful substance lay in
glittering
expanse, on gardens and meadows, hills
and dales, loading the trees with a new and
feathery
foliage, and covering as with a mantle,
every
deformity of the relentless season.
It was now four o'clock, as was evident from
the appearance of the common, in the centre of
the village, thronged with children who were
rushing delightedly from the walls of their
literary
prison.
Education had not at that period reached its
present state of refinement; and the joyful groups
that now surrounded the school house,
comprized
the whole juvenile population of the village,
without respect to the distinctions of age, rank,
or sex. A shout of eager merriment swelled in
the air as the boys surveyed for a moment the
brilliant expanse before them, and then plunged
recklessly into the cold and beautiful element,
dashing it about them, and venting in a thousand
joyous freaks the untamed sportiveness of their
spirits. But the feminine part of the company
still lingered around the door.
Richard! Richard! cried a rosy little
damsel
on the platform, dressed in a green mantle
and hood, Richard Leet, I would like to know
how Alice Weldon and myself are to walk home
through these drifts?
Ah! on your feet, to be sure, replied the
courteous youth, at the same time saluting her
with a freshly molded ball. Did you ever hear
of any other way of walking Susan?
I tell you, Richard, continued the first
impatiently
,
I shall freeze to death before we get
home, and as for poor little Alice she will perish
in the first drift. If Henry were only here, she
added, gathering up a handful of snow, and
vainly
seeking to revenge the insult, I am sure he
would teach you to treat me more politely.
Oh there they are, exclaimed a beautiful
child, who, clad in a scarlet coat with bonnet
and mittens of the same hue, stood gazing through
the window. They have come at last. And
with a spring of delight she appeared at the door,
her sweet and merry laugh still echoing through
the building.
`You will ride on my sled won't you Alice?
shouted several voices at once, as a party of
them came running from an adjacent shed,
dragging
their rude little vehicles swiftly after them.
These were quickly filled with their fair burthens,
but Alice still lingered on the step while the rest
continued in vain to urge her.
Now you may as well hold your peace, every
one of you, exclaimed a proud, fine looking lad,
who at that moment came up, his handsome
features
glowing with exercise, she will ride on my
sled, and I will snow-ball any one that interferes,
and bury him in the first drift. Say, Alice, he
continued, softening his voice, did you not
promise
to ride with none but me?
The little girl replied by springing on the sled,
and Henry after placing in her lap his Virgil and
dictionary, and exhorting her to hold fast,
bounded
off over drift and pit, nor paused until they
had safely reached the gate of their home.
It was a large white building, about a quarter of
a mile distant from the common, surrounded with
trees now leafless and snow-clad, and presenting
an air of comfort and convenience unequaled in
the village. The smoke was curling warm and
blue from its chimneys; nevertheless the eyes of
our juvenile heroine and her knight, turned
untempted
away;to the warm and springing pulse
of childhood, there is many a merrier thing than
the sparkling of a winter's hearth.
The meadow on the opposite side of the street,
just in front of the well finished mansion before
which they now paused, was with the juvenile
population
,
at the present season of the year, a place of
extremely fashionable resort; and for two especial
reasons. The one, a hill that reared itself in the
center, and presented at this moment to the eyes
of the wistful gazers one unbroken and towering
mass of whiteness; the other, that broad and
famed expanse of water that stealing from the
adjacent wood now lay, stiff and glittering on the
plain.
Oh, it would be such a triumph, murmured
the proud boy to himself, to have the first ride
on Briar hill. Better than the Latin premium
itself
.
Are you cold, Alice, he continued,
turning hesitatingly to his little charge, I mean
very cold.
Not
very,
replied the child, but with a strong
accent on the qualifying word.
Then we will have a beautiful ride,
continued
the other, darting impatiently across the way
just as the gay group he had left behind,
appeared
slowly bringing up the rear.
An irritated and impatient shout burst from
them as they perceived the ambitious design.
Don't let him beat us, echoed in many an
earnest
tonebut it was too late. Notwithstanding
his lovely little burthen, Henry Davenport toiled
rapidly up the precipitous ascent, arriving again
at the frozen pond just in time to welcome his
disappointed rivals.
A scene of the most exhilirating amusement
soon succeeded to the momentary chagrin. Sled
after sled, loaded to overflowing, descended
swiftly the steep declivity, bounding like things
of light over the frozen pond, and not
unfrequently
landing its passengers in the high snow
drift beyond. Then was heard mingling with
the creaking snow, the loud and merry shout of
the spectators on the hill, and the laugh of the
fearless skaters, as they glided gracefully along
on their slippery footing.
But in the midst of this interval of exuberant
sport, there was a sudden pause.
We never can have a moment's sliding,
2*
exclaimed Susan in a low vexed tone. There
is some one coming from the house to warn us
in.
Don't be afraid, answered Alice Weldon, as
she stood at the foot of the hill pulling the
mittens
from her little rosy fingers and seeking to
relieve them from the intense cold by rubbing
them together. It is no one but Margaret.
At all events, we'll have another slide,
muttered
the disappointed Richard. Any body that
bears a message to me, can take the trouble to
come up the hill, I fancy. The proposal
seemed
to meet with universal approbation, and with
one accord the whole party scampered through the
snow till they had once more gained the summit.
The person whose appearance had excited so
much tumult, now rapidly approached. Judging
from the testimony of her extremely youthful
countenance, any one might have seen that she
herself had but recently emerged from an age,
when the amusement she was now contemplating,
would have been shared with enthusiastic
pleasure
.
As it was, a light and glad smile betokened
her sympathy. The complexion of the young
lady was exceedingly fair, a soft bloom gathered
over it as she toiled up the hill, light and
clustering
curls lay on her forehead. The face was not
one of perfect beauty; and yet there was in the
light of her large blue eye, an expression of
feminine sweetness, which could not fail to
render
that countenance lovely to those who met its
glance.
Ah! you have come to take a ride with us,
exclaimed
Henry in a coaxing tone, as the young
lady joined the group.
And in fine company, truly, replied Miss
Weldon, laughing and shaking her head, though
her eye at the same moment, rested with a
somewhat
wishful glance upon a party just then
descending
.
A fine figure I should make, Henry,
sliding down hill with a party of truants like
yourself.
Susan Leet drew up her lip with scorn.
Oh, but this once, Margaret, you cannot
think what beautiful sledding it is, continued
Henry.
Don't tease cousin, whispered Susan
maliciously
.
She is engaged to be married, you
know, and would not be seen riding down hill for
the world.
Miss Weldon reddened slightly. I am
invested
with authority to order you all from the
grounds, she added in the same light and
humorous
tone. Come, gentlemen and ladies, you
are waited for at yonder mansion.
And we will give you a ride for your
trouble
,
replied Henry, while Richard bounded down
the steep. Do, do, Margaret, he continued,
as the children crowded upon the sled.
Ah, do, here is but just room enough for you
shouted several intreating voices; and the young
lady, after a hasty survey, perceiving no one in
sight, yielded at once to the natural gayety of
her heart, and they were instantly darting along
the declivity. After a short, almost precipitous
descent, the slope was long and gradual, and they
had leisure to survey the objects before them.
Look, Margaret, exclaimed Susan, at that
moment directing her eye to the road beneath.
Do you not see that gentleman looking at us so
earnestly? Mr. Russel, as I live, she continued,
with an uncontrollable burst of laughter at the
idea of her cousin's mortification, and two more,
coming the other way. Oh, Margaret, what can
you say to the minister?
Stop the sled, Henry;let me get off, I
intreat
you, rapidly articulated the young lady;
but a moment's reflection convinced her that
neither the one nor the other of these intreaties
could be complied with, without danger to the
limbs and lives of the whole party; and while the
provoking little Susan seemed to exult in her
embarrassment
,
laughing until her eyes streamed
with tears, she was compelled to go on
unresistingly
.
Good evening to you, Miss Weldon,
exclaimed
a well dressed youth, who approached
the party just as the young lady had arisen from
the bank, and stood shaking the snow from her
dark mantle. The countenance of the young
student was interesting, and at this moment
almost
handsome, for the sparkling flush of
exercise
had gathered over its usual paleness.
You must have had a charming ride, Miss
Weldon, he continued, with an expressive smile.
There was something slightly satirical both in
the look and tone of the speaker, and Margaret
Weldon was not the one to be ridiculed with
impunity; but the keen retort that trembled on
her lips was interrupted by the appearance of
the other personages whose ill-timed appearance
had created so much embarrassment.
These were travelers, as their well muffled
appearance
sufficiently indicated; and a second
glance was sufficient to convince her that they
were not only strangers, but persons of a far
different stamp of character from those with
whom she was wont to associate. They were
both youthful in appearance. The elder and
shorter of the two, was completely enveloped in
the folds of a huge coarse over-coat; he wore on
his head a bear-skin cap, and a pair of well
furred
moccasons protected his feet. Two small and
twinkling eyes were the only portions of his
features
visible, through the double and triple coils
of worsted that surrounded them.
The other was attired much more carefully in
the style of a fashionable cavalier, and a cloak of
costly and gay materials was his protection from
the cold.
But Margaret had scarce time to make these
observations, ere the latter gentleman hastily
addressed
her.
Prythee, my pretty damsel, have pity on a
couple of errant and half frozen knights, and tell
us if a certain gentleman of the name of Leet
resideth hereabouts. We should have reached
his house ere this, or our directions deceive us.
The style of address was evidently not relished
by the young lady, she drew up her slight form
with an air of dignity, replying with an expression
of cold politeness, to the forward advances of the
stranger.
My uncle, sirs, the Governor of the Colony,
resides in this dwelling; whether he be the person
you seek, or not, as strangers, you are welcome
to his hospitality.
There was no need of a second invitation, and
the whole party now entered the large enclosure
that surrounded the house. The snow had been
thrown up on either side from the long straight
gravel walks which led to the portico in front of
the building. Miss Weldon now conducted
them across an angle of the spacious hall and
throwing open the door, at once introduced them
into the
keeping room
of her uncle's family. The
apartment was large, unostentatiously but
comfortably
furnished. A well polished book-case
mounted on a chest of drawers, occupied one
corner of the room, and a mahogany cased clock
another; while that on the remote side from the
fire, was filled by an enormous cupboard, the
door of which was now thrown open, revealing
rare treasures of porcelain and silver. But the
apartment contained objects of far higher interest
to the cold and hungry travelers; a large round
table in the center of the room, spread with a
snow white cloth and covered with various dishes,
and on the hearth a huge blaze, that, roaring and
sparkling in the capacious chimney, diffused a light
and pleasant glow throughout the whole
apartment
.
Little Susan, at the moment of their
entrance
,
was engaged in throwing down the long
chintz curtains, and as the candles had not yet
made their appearance, the objects of the room
were only illuminated by the brilliant fire light.
The other children, having previously effected
their escape to the house, were now seated around
the hearth, engaged in satisfying their hunger,
each from a bowl of bread and milk.
There were no other persons present, and Miss
Weldon, after placing chairs for her guests near
the grateful blaze, and laying aside her hat and
cloak, was hastening to leave the apartment.
Just at this moment the door she was
approaching
opened, and an elderly, pleasant-looking
matron
made her appearance. The good lady paused
in considerable surprise at the sight of her
unexpected
guests.
Mr. Russel, aunt, said Miss Weldon, in
rather an embarrassed tone, as she met her glance
of perplexed inquiry, and the strangers, she
added in a still lower voice, are strangers as
much to me as to yourself.
The young student was received with an air
of the most cordial welcome, and from the
character
of the smile which at that moment illumined
the benevolent countenance of Mrs. Leet, there
seemed some peculiar claim upon her kindness
and affection.
In reply to the urgent invitations of their
hostess
the strangers assured her that their business
allowed of slight delay, and that they had yet
many miles to travel ere their journey was
accomplished
,
repeating also the request for an
immediate
interview with the Governor of the
Colony
.
He is coming, exclaimed Richard, who now
re-appeared from the hall; and the next moment
the master of the house presented himself. His
figure was singularly erect, rather inclining to
corpulency, and the frosts of time had fallen
thickly on his head. The countenance, while it
was marked with a degree of shrewdness and
good humor, exhibited a certain unyielding look,
which perhaps formed its most striking
characteristic
.
He advanced slowly to the fire deigning only a
single glance towards his guests, and drawing the
shovel from its resting place in the corner, began
deliberately to separate from his boots the
particles
of snow that still clung to them.
Here is Mr. Russel, my dear, exclaimed
Mrs. Leet reprovingly, just come from
New-Haven
,
in spite of cold and snow.
Ah, ah, good evening to you, Mr. Russel,
replied the old gentleman, casting another slight
glance upon him, and again resuming his
employment
.
The blood must be younger in your
veins than in mine, Mr. Russel.
The supper has waited for you, some time,
continued Mrs. Leet, in the same tone of gentle
admonition, and these gentlemen are anxious
to see you on business.
Supper and business, continued the governor,
directing, as he spoke, one of his keen and quick
glances upon the strangers. We will take our
supper first, Mrs. Leet, and talk of business
hereafter
.
No objections, sirs, I hope, he added, as
the knight of the blue cloak was about to attempt
a remonstrance. I attend to no business until
we have taken our repast, and he set down the
shovel with an emphatic air. Come,
gentlemen
,
doff your cloaks, he added in rather a more
gracious tone, as the smoking dishes made their
appearance, sit down with us, and I am at your
service.
The tone of decision was not to be resisted;
and without further preamble, the strangers
prepared
to comply with the peremptory invitation.
The table presented, in a small space, a
variety
of cheer seldom surpassed in more sumptuous
and costly entertainments; some alterations and
additions had indeed been made since the
entrance
of the visiters, and the whole now
exhibited
an assemblage of inviting fare, which it
would have been hard for the famished guests to
have refused. We grieve to say that these
observations
were principally made by the strangers
during the Governor's fervent petition for a
heavenly
blessing on their repast, which was in truth
protracted to an unusual length, though the whole
family joined in it with expressions of apparent
devotion. The quick and rather impatient
Amen
which the young gentlemen uttered at its
conclusion
,
failed not to draw upon them the admiring
glances of the children by the fireside, and a
gentle expression of surprise from the fair damsel
who presided at the board. The attention of the
strangers, however, was too much absorbed by
the important occupation before them, to notice
any unfavorable impressions that might have
been made, and they now laid about them with
an air, that evinced a prudent determination to
make the best of their delay.
You have had a long journey, said Mrs.
Leet, in an inquiring tone, as she pressed upon
her guests the unnecessary invitation to make
themselves at home in her dwelling. You must
have been out in the storm, I presume.
We were, madam, replied the younger
stranger, pausing a moment in his employment,
our journey has lasted since the early dawn,
and I fear is likely to last until another.
You are going further, then? continued Mrs.
Leet, in whose gentle heart a slight sensation of
the curious began to awaken.
We think of it madam, replied the elder,
interrupting his companion's more courteous
reply
.
There was now another pause, and Mrs.
Leet seemed revolving in her mind, how it might
best be broken.
We shall be sorry to see you go forth from the
shelter of our roof to night Mr.Pardon me
Sir, I have forgotten your name.
Kellond, at your service, madam,Thomas
Kellond, and my friend Mr. Kirk.
3
Ah! thank youlet me help you to a bit of
this cold chicken Mr. Kellond, you must have
found but poor accommodations on your route.
You dined at Middletown, I presume Sir,
continued
Mrs. Leet.
We ate our last meal at Hartford, madam,
replied Mr. Kellond, and certainly had nothing
to complain of, for we were greeted with the best
cheer the Governor of the colony could afford.
Governor Leet who had till this moment
affected
perfect indifference to the communications of
the strangers, now lifted his large blue eyes,
fixing
them alternately upon each of his unknown
guests, with a gaze of deep and fluctuating
curiosity
.
A conversation which he had previously
maintained with Mr. Russel, was however quickly
resumed, though from time to time an anxious
glance at the strangers, intimated a greater
degree
of interest in their communications than he
chose to express.
The repast was at length completed, and, the
table having been removed to a less conspicuous
station, the family again encircled the fire.
Meanwhile
every thing had been arranged according
to the well established rules of the household. A
fresh supply of fuel crackled on the neatly swept
hearth, the stand, the lights and the books, were
all in waiting. On the other side of the fire place,
the children surrounded a low round table,
pursuing
their respective avocations with an air of
decorum, which contrasted strongly with the
frolics
on the hill. Susan Leet sat with a demure
countenance, knitting a pair of woolen hose for
her brother, while the latter leaned, with
frowning
brows, upon his slate, beside her, flourishing
his pencil with many a threatening manuvre,
over the mysterious problems beneath. The youth
did indeed occasionally pause amid his
mathematical
reveries, to examine into the conduct of
an intelligent kitten sporting beneath the table, at
that moment dextrously engaged with Susan's
ball, and amusing her fancy with the graceful
undulations
of the long white thread, as it darted
across her way.
But no such trivial sport had power to arrest
the attention of Henry Davenport, as he bowed
his young head over the classic page. His hand
supported his forehead, straying among the dark
and beautiful locks that shaded it, and whenever
the eye of the youthful scholar was for a moment
lifted, there was that in its deep lustre that told
of a mind fitted to revel among the rich fountains
of ancient lore, gifted with the inspiration of
exalted
fancy, and the energy of a daring spirit.
Alice Weldon, whose history is woven with our
tale, sat in a low chair beside him, in the first
bloom of infant thoughts and feelings, and with
the tints of cradle dreams still bright in her young
fancy. Her eyes seemed intent on the
personages
who now surrounded the fire, their naturally
pensive expression often vanishing amid smiles
and dimples, as she met their glances in return.
Indeed there were others who now began to
survey
the scene with much interest.
Governor Leet, after exchanging his boots for
slippers, had seated himself by the opposite stand;
the candles were snuffed, the spectacles wiped
and replaced, and he now seemed waiting with the
most comfortable composure, for any
commmunications
that might be made. The silence of
curious
expectation pervaded the whole apartment,
interrupted only by the slight and occasional
ringing of the China cups, as Mrs. Leet carefully
wiped and replaced them on the waiter.
Considerable hesitation seemed to exist with
the strangers, as to which of them should first open
their embassy; but at length the elder, who had
hitherto maintained an air of studied reserve, broke
silence.
Governor Leet, the business with which we
are intrusted, is of an official and private nature;
it would be well that we had fewer witnesses.
No one here but my family, I believe,
exclaimed the old gentleman, his eye passing
in rapid review over the circle, unless,
indeed
,
we except this young friend of ours, and
his eye rested on Mr. Russel. But we reckon
him about as good as one of us, he added,
with an expression of pleasantry, which brought
the blood in richer tides to Miss Weldon's cheek.
I beg your pardon, sir, but I believe we are all
to be trusted.
Nevertheless you must be aware, sir, replied
Mr. Kirk, as he drew forth a large pocket book,
that there are certain undertakings which need
to be executed with secrecy and despatch, in order
to insure them success.
Perfectly, sir, rejoined the Governor
quickly
,
as the young gentleman, after carefully
examining
the contents of the pocket book, presented
him with a folded paper. The Governor glanced
anxiously over it, and those who were watching
his countenance perceived that it became
instantly
and strongly flushed. His natural composure
of aspect was however soon resumed, and he
began in a low whisper to examine its contents.
Miss Weldon was seated at the opposite side of
the stand on which her uncle leaned, and she
became
instantly aware that the kind of humming
tone into which the whisper had gradually swelled,
was not the unconscious and unnecessary sound
it seemed. With the quickness of female
penetration
,
she at once perceived that there was
something in the contents of the paper, which her
uncle desired her to understand. The frill she
was working, dropped from her hand, and leaning
her head over the table she listened with
breathless
interest to the voice of the reader. After a
short suspension, the low murinur again
commenced
,
but as yet, she caught nothing but a
confused mingling of words. Presently the
sounds became more distinct, and the words
treason and rebellion, were plainly
distinguished
.
Then was another pause, and then distinctly
followed, And we do hereby authorize and
appoint
our true and loyal subjects
Governor Leet, exclaimed Mr. Kirk hastily,
you must be aware that the revealing of state
secrets, may be attended with serious
consequences
.
Aye, aye, true, Mr. Kirk, replied the old
gentleman, with an air of provoking affability;
and he was silent for a few minutes. Then
as if unconsciously relapsing again into his
former
tone, And we do hereby command
Governors and magistrates of said colonies
all possible measuresimprisonment
of said regicides, anddenounce as rebels
harbor and secrete said Whalley and Goff
who in any wise seek to defeat said Thomas
Kirk and Thomas Kellond, in the
accomplishment
of this our royal mandate.
The voice again sunk into its inaudible
murmur
;
but Margaret Weldon had heard enough.
3*
The Governor now re-folded the paper, and
casting
a single glance at his niece, again placed it
in the hand of its owner.
And what service is required of me? he asked,
turning again to the English cavaliers who had
impatiently waited for his conclusion.
Governor Leet, rejoined Mr. Kirk, his
formal
and moderate tones slightly quickened with
anger, You must be aware that in compelling
us to hold our conversation in this public manner,
you debar us from any opportunity of making
those demands our occasions may require. It
cannot be expected that we should speak of our
embassy, without a due degree of precaution.
Richard, my son, tell Willy to build a fire in
the other room. Beg your pardon, gentlemen,
don't be uneasy, we shall soon be able to discuss
the matter privately.
It may be advisable for us to spare you this
trouble, interrupted Mr. Kellond, as Richard
prepared to obey. Our most important demand
is that horses may forthwith be procured for us
to proceed on our journey. The Governor of
Connecticut hath forwarded us thus far, and we
are dependent upon your good offices for the
remainder
of the journey. Several minutes' silence
succeeded this declaration.
Governor Leet, rejoined Mr. Kirk
impatiently
,
it only remains for you to inform us,
whether you choose to furnish us with
conveniences
for traveling.
As to that I cannot answer immediately,
replied
the Governor thoughtfully. It must be
dangerous for man or beast to cross the West
Hollow to-night. How was it Mr. Russel?
The drifts had obstructed the way so
completely
,
replied the student, that had I not
been entirely familiar with it, I should inevitably
have lost the track.
I am sorry to inform you, continued the
Governor
,
addressing the strangers, that my best
horse is at this moment disabled, and the other
two have been at hard sledding all the day. They
are out of the question, that is if I expect to see
them alive again. Nay, Mr. Kirk, the road is a
wretched one, and I would be sorry to risk the
neck of the best conditioned horse in the
Colony
.
But, father, there is the
sorrel colt,
cried
Richard, throwing down his pencil, and
preparing
to enter with spirit into the merits of the
case.
Please attend to your slate, Master Richard,
replied the old gentleman, rather impatiently;
but by the bye, the suggestion is not so bad,
he continued with apparent hesitation. The
sorrel coltyesit will do wellhe is a vicious,
fractious thing, and the sooner his neck is broken
the better. That is, provided he breaks no neck
but his own.
An excellent proviso, sir, interrupted Mr.
Kellond, but as it would be rather an untoward
circumstance that both Mr. Kirk and myself
should fall with him, I propose that my
companion
here do mount the animal, while I proceed on
foot after him, and then in case of any ill-timed
display of temper, one of us at least would
survive
to accomplish the embassy. Also, from
what you have mentioned concerning the
disposition
of the beast, I should deem it extremely
unlikely that he would for a moment tolerate any
additional burthen to what my friend Mr. Kirk
would furnish.
Me!exclaimed Mr. Kirk, with an ill
concealed
expression of disnay. I do not know
whether you are in jes, Mr. Kellond,if you
are not, I know of no reason why your neck
should be held in higher estimation than my
own.
But to cut the matter short, continued the
Governor, I propose that you remain under
this roof for the night, and in the morning, as
early as you please, you shall be furnished with
accommodations for traveling. The
gentlemen
glanced for a moment hesitatingly upon each
other.
We accept of your hospitable invitation, sir,
replied Mr. Kellond, upon condition that you
despatch no one from your roof this night, with
intelligence of our errand.
Certainly, young man, I promise you that no
one leaves my roof this night, unless it be of his
own free will and accord; and moreover, I give
you my word that nothing concerning your
embassy
shall be repeated by me to any one.
Miss Weldon's countenance at that moment
grew pale at the thought of the fearful
responsibility
so suddenly devolved upon her; for she
was conscious that no other persons in the
apartment
had overheard enough of their
communications
to form any clue to the nature of their
errand
.
She felt that, to her exertions alone, her
uncle trusted, for conveying the intelligence of
this new warrant to the unfortunate exiles who
were its objects, and with the pride and heroism
of a young heart she resolved to endure any peril
rather than disappoint that confidence.
Of the present condition of the banished judges
she knew little. Their general history was
indeed
familiar to all; that they had boldly stood
up for the rights of conscience and freedom
in their native land, even until the blood of a
royal martyr had stained their path; that they had
once ranked high in that proud army whose valor
had awed the nations, and were now driven
helpless
and exiled, seeking succor amid men of the
same name and faith with themselves, and men
who professed the same high principles of
action
;
these were facts familiar to all. Neither
was she unaware that the regicides were at this
moment concealed in the village of New-Haven,
having been driven from their original place of
refuge, by the intelligence of an act of pardon
excluding them from its privileges, and a warrant
authorizing his majesty's subjects to apprehend
them wheresoever they might be. She was aware
also that the chief men of the colony favored their
concealment among them, affording them various
disguises; and she believed that in one of these
she herself had once seen them, though
unconscious
of it, at the moment of their interview.
To communicate to the Rev. Mr. Davenport
the intelligence she had thus singularly acquired,
seemed the only method of averting their ruin.
This must also be effected before morning, and it
only remained that she should speedily resolve
upon a proper messenger. At first thought, the
embassy seemed of too delicate a nature to be
entrusted
to a second person, and she determined
herself to brave the inclemency of the weather
and in spite of snow and cold, to obtain this night
an audience of Mr. Davenport. But a
recollection
of the fearful drifts that impeded the way,
soon convinced her that this would be a mere
waste of life and courage. Margaret Weldon was
a betrothed bride; and her eye soon rested on
one who combined in her estimation, all the
necessary
qualifications, for so difficult an
undertaking
.
The evening now wore slowly away. There
had been a considerable effort, on the part of the
governor to sustain a conversation with his
guests; but they now seemed to have
exhausted
all peaceable topics and none appeared
willing
to interrupt the awkward silence. In spite
of efforts at cordiality, mutual distrust and
suspicion
evidently existed between them.
An appearance of the evening refreshment
consisting of nuts and apples did indeed restore a
slight degree of cheerfulness, and during the
period
employed in partaking of it, Miss Weldon
left the apartment. Presently after, a light knock
was heard on the outer door.
It is a person wishing to speak with Mr.
Russel
said the servant, who having but just entered
from the kitchen, hastened to obey the summons.
Ask him to walk in then, Clara, said the
governor, and don't stand with the door open.
I have, sir, replied the servant, but Mr.
Russel is requested to step to the door. The
gentleman thus called for, now taking a lamp
made his way to the hall, closing after him the
door of the parlour. A female figure well
wrapped
in a mantle, with bonnet so large as entirely
to conceal her features, was standing in the
portico
.
Samuel, said the sweet voice of Margaret
Weldon, for it was none other than she, Samuel
Russel, I pray you close the door, and listen to me;
I have much to tell you. The youth could scarce
refrain from an exclamation of surprise, but he
immediately complied with her request.
Margaret, you are wild, I am sure you are,
he exclaimed in a subdued voice as he stepped
into the portico.
I assure you, Samuel I could find no other way
of doing my errand; for the strangers were
watching
every movement so suspiciously I dared not
to send for you. But there is no time for
apologies
.
The gentlemen in the parlour are those
despatched in search of Whalley and Goffe, the
papers they gave uncle Leet is the warrant for
their arrest, and unless we can communicate with
them this night, to-morrow the judges will fall
into
their hands. Uncle Leet has, as you know,
given them his word that he will make no
exertions
in their behalf, but Samuel, you and I are
private
individuals, and we need not fear that our
conduct should draw upon the whole colony the
anger of the king.
You speak nobly, Margaret; I will proceed
immediately to New-Haven, and warn them of
their danger, but there are many things to be
considered. The strangers will be constantly on
the watch during the night and certainly will not
suffer any one to leave the enclosure unnoticed.
I doubt not their suspicions are all awake, and
even could I succeed in effecting my escape, my
absence in the morning would reveal the secret.
You must set out, replied Margaret quickly,
as soon as the gentlemen leave the parlour, and
before they have time to reconnoitre you will be
out upon the main road. And as for the morning,
I fancy the strangers will wait for a slice or two;
and you will be back to an early breakfast.
Nay, Margaret, but it is quite impossible,
replied the young gentleman, almost shuddering
at the idea of the perils he had so recently
escaped
,
it is quite impossible that I should return
again on foot, and as to horses, they seem totally
out of the question.
But the sorrel is not so bad, continued
Margaret
,
repressing a smile, I do think that uncle
has slandered him a little. But Samuel we are
talking too long. If you will go, the horse shall
be ready for you at the other door. The moment
they leave the parlor make your way into the
kitchen
,
and I will see that it is cleared of spectators.
Mr. Russel had scarce time to assent to these
propositions
,
ere Margaret had vanished from the
steps, disappearing the next moment around the
corner of the mansion.
It was not until the hour of evening prayer that
Miss Weldon again made her appearance. There
was an expression of deep concern on her
countenance
;
and Mr. Russel saw that her hand
trembled
slightly, as she leaned upon it while the
governor read aloud from the pages of the sacred
word. The portion selected was from the holy
melodies of the sweet singer of Israel, a lesson
beautifully appropriate to the state of the
persecuted
exiles, and there was something in its
promises of heavenly protection that fell soft and
soothing on the troubled hearts of some who
heard it. Neither was the prayer that ensued
better calculated to allay the prejudices of the
strangers. It forgot not the afflicted, the
banished
,
the outcast; and there was a pathos, and even
sublimity of expression, in the fervent entreaty
that God would remember those, to whom man
had forgotten to be gracious.
Immediately after the conclusion of the
evening
devotions, Margaret again left the
apartment
,
directing as she passed a slight and quick
glance towards the student.
The tedious evening had now drawn to a close;
and the governor with a heavy yawn failed not to
testify his pleasure at the signal for retirement.
The moment the door of the parlor had closed
upon the strangers, Mr. Russel hastened to fulfil
his appointment. As he entered the kitchen,
Miss Weldon was standing by the fire and his
coat and cloak hanging over the chair beside her.
There was no time for ceremony, and while the
young man was casing his feet in the warm double
socks that had been provided for him, Miss
Weldon
hastily tied around his neck the fold of an
enormous worsted tippet, like what in these days,
would be styled a
comforter
. In addition to all
the other articles of clothing, she now essayed to
throw over him a huge drab cloak or rather
blanket
,
sufficiently ample in its dimensions to
envelope
his whole person; but this last act of
her authority Mr. Russel prepared to resist with a
considerable degree of firmness.
Margaret, it is unbeseeming my character;
it looks precisely like an Indian's blanket, indeed
I will not wear it.
But you must, Samuel, replied the other in a
whisper. I borrowed it of Indian Jack on
purpose
for a disguise; and whoever meets you now
will never dream that it is not he, but with all
her anxiety, the young lady could scarce refrain
from a smile at the awkward appearance of her
lover. But the occasion was too serious for the
indulgence of mirth, and throwing open the door
she pointed to the identical little sorrel, whose
unfortunate eccentricity of character had been
so faithfully portrayed by the Governor, tied to a
post of the shed and gazing indignantly around
him. The moon was partially obscured; but the
reflection from the snow rendered every object
visible.
Speak gently to himhe will never bear to
be scolded, said Margaret, in a suppressed
whisper
,
and now, Samuel, heaven speed you. In a
moment after the sorrel and his burthen moved
swiftly down the avenue; and Miss Weldon
refered
to her apartment, without further
communication
with the family.
CHAPTER II.
Notwithstanding
the warning of an early
breakfast, the sun was shining high through
the windows of the parlor ere the guests of Gov.
Leet made their appearance.
Eight o'clock, by Jupiter, exclaimed Mr.
Kellond, as they entered the room, for though the
breakfast table was spread, it was apparently
unoccupied
.
My word for it, Tom, that wily old
rascal means to outwit us. But his exclamations
were, at that moment, interrupted by the sight of
an unexpected auditress. Miss Weldon was
standing in one of the recesses of the windows;
but, as her figure was partly hid with the drapery
of the curtain, her presence had, at first, been
totally unnoticed.
Good morning to you, fair damsel, continued
Mr. Kellond, with an air of undaunted effrontery;
and, approaching the window, he began to
address
her in that free and careless manner which
had before been so displeasing. Miss Weldon,
after returning his salutations with a haughty
nod, continued still to gaze from the window.
Directly opposite was the hill from which she had
first seen them, now thronged with all the
children
of the vicinity. Miss Weldon was
apparently
gazing at their sports, though from time to
time an anxious glance down the road, might
have convinced a careful observer, that some
object of higher interest claimed her
attention
.
Good morning, gentlemen, said the kind
and soft voice of Mrs. Leet, who at this moment
entered the room. Margaret, my dear, you
should have told me that the gentlemen were
waiting, and the good lady hastened out again
to order her long delayed-breakfast.
And where can Mr. Russel be so long, this
morning? exclaimed Mrs. Leet as the family with
only this exception encircled the table. Have
you called him, Willy?
His door is locked, replied the servant,
perhaps
he has gone for a walk. A shadow at that
moment fell upon the wall.
And here he is, cried Richard, who was
gazing from the window, while a deep and
sudden
flush illumined the features of Miss
Weldon
.
You have taken an early walk, sir, said the
Governor, as the young gentleman with an
animated
countenance now entered the
apartment
,
but better late than never. Richard,
move your chair for Mr. Russel. Margaret
gazed
earnestly upon her uncle's countenance, but
with all her scrutiny she found it impossible to
discover whether his apparent indifference on this
occasion was real or assumed.
Allow us again to remind you, sir, exclaimed
Mr. Kirk, when the repast was nearly completed,
that it will be necessary for us to set off on our
way immediately after breakfast, and we request
that horsos may be provided for that purpose
according to your promise last evening.
Aye, aye, sir, replied the old gentleman,
with an emphatic
hem
. Margaret, my dear,
he continued, turning to Miss Weldon, you were
petitioning yesterday for a ride, and I dare say
Mr. Russel here, with all his love for pedestrian
excursions, would make no objections to a seat in
the sleigh. Well, I have business in town, this
morning, and here are a couple of dainty footed
travelers, ready to faint at the mention of a snow
drift. I believe we must e'en tackle up. Willy,
my man, tell Simon to get out the sleigh.
It is unnecessary to put you to this trouble,
exclaimed Mr. Kirk, for they were now rising
from the breakfast table. I can assure you,
Governor Leet, we must go on without further
delay. The horses referred to last evening must
surely be refreshed by this time, and we will
excuse the want of the vehicle you mention.
Aye, ayemuch obliged to you, make
yourselves
easy, gentlemen, I am an old man, and
like my own way pretty much;sit down and
make yourselves easy, and so saying the
governor
quietly walked off to attend to the fulfilment
of his orders. Miss Weldon had left the room
to prepare herself for her ride; and the strangers
finding resistance vain, slowly equipped
themselves
for their journey. A loud ringing of sleigh
bells, at the door, presently announced that the
vehicle was in readiness; but the Governor was
not to be hurried, and vain and fruitless were the
significant and angry glances of the strangers,
while he slowly and comfortably prepared to meet
the inclemencies of the weather. At length,
completely muffled from head to foot, the old
gentleman sallied forth, followed by the remainder
of the party. The kind good morning, from the
group at the door, mingled with the sound of the
4*
cracking whip; and, with a loud and merry jingle,
the sleigh started forth on its journey. The
horses
were fleet, and the road not so bad as they had
been led to fear, so that by the time they had
reached New-Haven green, the clock on the old
meeting house was only pointing the hour of
noon, and its clear tones were yet ringing through
the village, as they drove up to the door of the
parsonage.
Gentlemen, said the venerable pastor of
New-Haven, after perusing the documents and
quietly listening to the representations of the
strangers, you are probably not aware that
neither
Governor Leet nor myself can furnish you
with any assistance in our official capacity, until
an assembly of the magistrates of the colony has
been convened, which will have full power to
consider your requests.
You forget, certainly, sir, interrupted Mr.
Kirk, that we are acting under the special
exercise
of an authority, to which your assembly is
only a subordinate institution.
I beg your pardon, sir, replied the governor
hastily, the assembly is the supreme power of
this colony, and by no means a
subordinate
institution
.
Without its sanctions we do not choose
to act in any emergency.
And pray, Reverend Sir, answered Mr.
Kellond
,
a strong expression of contempt animating
his features, will it please you to inform us, at
what time this high and honorable assembly,
to which the two houses of parliament are as
nothing
,
doth hold its sittings. We would grieve
to detract from the reverence due to so exalted a
tribunal; but, as I have before remarked to you,
our business requires despatch.
In the space of half an hour, replied Mr.
Davenport
,
without at all noticing the evident irony
of the gentleman's address, in half an hour,
the magistrates will be convened. It is
impossible
that this should be effected sooner,
meanwhile
let me intreat you to make yourselves at
home in my dwelling; we will signify to you our
conclusions as soon as possible.
The tedious interval occupied by the assembly
in its deliberations, was principally employed by
the strangers, in surveying the appearance of the
flourishing little village which surrounded them.
They had, however, sometime ago returned from
their excursions, ere the governor and Mr.
Davenport
made their appearance.
You have been walking, said the latter,
complacently, as he drew a chair to the hearth.
We have, replied Mr. Kirk, in an abrupt
and ungracious tone, but the result of your
meeting, sir.
Aye truly, exclaimed the governor
recollecting
himself. Then I must inform you, your
petition has been presented to the magistrates of
the colony.
And what then?
The subject was ably discussed by our
reverend
friend here, Mr. Davenport, and deacon
Hezekiah Gilbert, also the worthy Mr. Norton
made some interesting remarks, on the subject of
our relation to the king, in connection with that
of your petition.
Your resolution, sir, your resolution, we will
spare the details.
And it was resolved, continued the
governor
,
composedly, that as a body of men
intrusted
with the government of this colony, for the
suppression of vice and the preserving of order
among us, we have nothing to do with the arrest
of his Majesty's subjects, except in case of actual
transgressions of the laws by which we are
governed
.
Resolved, that the exiled judges,
Whalley
and Goffe have not to our knowledge, in any
way incurred the penalties of said laws, therefore,
as magistrates, we are not authorized to arrest
them. Resolved, moreover, that we will not in
any wise hinder the accomplishment of your
errand
,
by secreting or harboring said judges.
Then, replied Kirk, rising hastily, while his
whole countenance colored with indignation,
by the authority of this paper, will I search
every
house among you, until those rebels are
dragged
forth to justice. At your peril refuse me. And
wo to the traitor who dares secret them.
High wordshigh words, young man, said
the governor calmly, but take care, that you
do not make it my painful duty to set your feet in
the stocks, for abuse of your elders. As to the
search you propose, we shall certainly make no
objections. Every house in this village is open
to your examination, only take a kindly warning
that our own laws are in full force, and our
magistrates
in perfect readiness to see them
executed
.
The threat which this reply contained, was not
entirely lost upon the person to whom it was
addressed
.
Indeed the idea of personal danger
seemed greatly to soften the asperity of his
feelings
.
A close examination of the village, was
indeed immediately commenced; but the rude
deportment previously displayed was now
exchanged
for an air of decent civility.
It is not our intention to enter into the details
of this day's grievous intrusion upon the sanctity
of New-Haven housewifery. Not a house, not a
room, not a cupboard that did not undergo the
scrutinizing gaze of Messrs. Kirk and Kellond.
Wo to the untidy dame who had sought with an
outside exhibition of neatness, to cover the
deformity
of her interior management, for now was
her deception manifest. And wo to the notable
matrons whose clean and quiet dwellings the
feet of Messrs. Kirk and Kellond that day
invaded
.
Not a chest escaped their Vandal touch;
and the contents of trunks and closets lay spread
on the floor in strange confusion, while their fair
proprietors in mingled dismay and wrath,
surveyed
the scene. But it is not to be supposed that
a confederacy of intelligent females was to be
outwitted by a couple of unassisted strangers;
for, though the magistrates of the colony had
refused
to furnish further concealment of the
regicides
,
the helpmates of said magistrates in the
true spirit of republicanism, secretly declared
that resolutions which they had no share in
forming, should not be considered as binding
upon themselves. The embassy of our worthy
travellers was consequently unsuccessful; and,
as our history informs us, they departed the next
morning from the colony threatening the wrath
of the king upon the guiltless magistrates; while
the matrons of New-Haven rejoiced in secret at
this triumph of their skill.
CHAPTER III.
The
early superstitions of New-England were
of a peculiar nature. Not only the public
institutions
of its settlers, bore the impress of the stern
faith they had adopted as their ruling principle,
but individual character, private affections, and
popular prejudices, were all shaped to the same
unyielding model; and thus in the development
of those mysterious emotions of supernatural
dread so common to our nature, we find traces of
the same principle. The genii of oriental fancy,
the malignant spirits of German forests, the wild
fabric of Scottish credulity have all figured on the
pages of romance; but it was on the broad
shadows
of eternal truth that the weakness of human
fear had here fastened its illusions, and a
superstition
more vast, and more awful hung over the
glens and forests of New-England. When the
maiden trod quickly, on the lonely path at
twilight
,
it was not that a being of her own creative
fancy haunted it. Something more fearful than
the vision of the sportive fancy paled her cheek.
The object of her dread was one real and mighty
being, whose power extended from the abodes of
unholy spirits, to the dwelling places of earth,
throwing his mysterious and sinful influence even
around the inmost recesses of her own heart.
He had once stood first in the ranks of seraphs,
and learned wisdom from the lips of the Eternal;
mighty too he was, for he had even waged war in
heaven; and all this wisdom, and all this might,
the voice of inspiration assured her, was enlisted
against her peace. It was not strange, therefore,
that those whom the puritans, in their credulity,
imagined in league with this Prince of darkness,
were regarded with sensations of unmingled
horror
.
And though this superstition had not, at the
date of this narrative, assumed that fearful
aspect
which in after years spread such dismay
through the colonies, it was still openly
encouraged
by the sanction of good and enlightened
men.
It was about six months after the incidents
recorded
in the last chapter, that a strong
excitement
of this description, began to make its
appearance
in the colony of New-Haven. Tales of
fearful import were circulated through the
village
,
strange sights and unearthly voices had
been seen and heard at midnight, and a secret
and indefinable dread thrilled through the hearts
of those whom necessity compelled to a solitary
walk at evening. When the subtle spirit of
popular
superstition is once aroused, it floats not long
in unsubstantial rumor; the airy nothing soon
finds a local habitation and a name. So it was
in the present instance. The mountain which rears
its head about two miles west of the village, was
at length declared a favorite haunt of the
unearthly
visitant. The various fearful reports began
now to concentrate on one fair and wandering
spirit, who for some unknown cause, had taken up
her abode amid the habitations of the material
world; and many a fresh lip grew pale, as the
descriptions of that strange and beautiful being
were repeated every day, with a more intense
interest
.
It became, at last, generally reported and
believed, that just as the white mist began to
break away from the rock, a female form of
exquisite
,
but faded beauty might be seen standing
amid the wreathing vapor, and gradually
vanishing
as it slowly curled from the mountain. Who
this fearful stranger might be, and what the cause
of her appearance, few dared to question; though
each heart cherished its own secret and terrible
suggestions. Meanwhile, witnesses to the truth
of the tale, gradually increased; and it began
ere long to be secretly whispered, that the lady
of the mist came not unsummoned to disturb
their peace, that there were those among them
who had dared to make a league with death, and
a covenant with the power of darkness. We
grieve to add, that among the objects on whom
these horrid suspicions at last rested, were the
orphan nieces of Governor Leet, Margaret
Weldon
,
and her fair young sister.
Mrs. Mary Wilmot a widowed lady of high
respectability, who had about three years since
emigrated from England, under the impulse of
religious motives, was now the only remaining
sister of their deceased father. Margaret
Weldon
had accompanied her across the Atlantic,
and with her, had passed a large proportion of
her time since her arrival in America; but the
younger sister had now recently for the first time
come to reside beneath the roof of this
affectionate
relative. Alice had only a few months
since arrived from England; and as it was
generally
believed, the occasion of her mother's death,
though the strange and obstinate reserve with
which Mrs. Wilmot and Governor Leet had
repulsed
every inquiry upon the subject, had
naturally
given rise to many curious conjectures.
There was much too in the appearance of the
child herself to deepen their interest. Margaret
was pretty, but Alice Weldon was beautiful
singularly beautiful. It was not the mere grace
of form and feature, nor the expression of
infantile
sweetness, that constituted her chief charm.
It was a kind of gentle melancholy that lingered
always amid the beauty of her countenance,
stealing out in the light of her deep blue eyes,
when their snowy and drooping lids suddenly
lifted, softening the dimples of her gayest smile,
mellowing the tones of her rich voice even when
it trembled with laughter, and breathing over
the whole appearance a charm as indescribable
as facinating. And when the report once began
to circulate, that Margaret Weldon had been
seen in actual conference with the lady of the
mist, the suspicions that attached to her name,
were quickly and easily communicated to that of
her mysterious little sister.
It was just in this state of affairs that Henry
Davenport, who now resided beneath his father's
roof, one calm night in June, found himself
suddenly
aroused from a profound slumber, at
midnight
.
The chamber in which he slept, was at
some distance from the sleeping apartments of
the family; and notwithstanding his usually
daring
disposition, he found it impossible to suppress
a strong sensation of fear, as he found himself
thus singularly awakened without any visible
cause, and gazing earnestly around the apartment.
It was no human visitant that excited his
apprehensions
.
The mind of the youth had become tinctured
5
with the prevailing superstition, and though he
gave not actual credence to all the fearful
rumors
to which he listened, there was something
in the very character of the ideas they produced,
well suited to the peculiarities of his disposition;
there was enjoyment even in the awe and horror
they excited. It was, therefore, with a feeling
of trembling expectation, that he now surveyed
the objects of the room. It was small, and a
bright moonlight streamed through the thin
curtain
,
as every object passed in quick review
before
him, until his eye rested on a shadowy figure,
half concealed in the darkness. A low
exclamation
of terror burst from his lips. Visions of the
Lady of the Mist, flitted rapidly across his mind;
and he buried his face in the bedclothes.
Henry Davenport, is it you? said a low voice,
which he instantly recognized to be that of
Margaret
Weldon. I pray your pardon for
disturbing
your repose. I had thought that this was
your sister's apartment.
And what would you of Mary at this late
hour? replied Henry, who was now hastily
revolving
in his mind the reports concerning her,
and his voice gathered energy; Margaret
Weldon
,
what would you?
Speak lower, Henry, and I will tell you,
continued the same voice, and the boy felt a chill
at his heart, for her light footstep was now heard
approaching the bed. Unwilling, however, to
manifest any emotion, he slowly uncovered his
face and perceived the object of his terror, gently
parting away the curtains.
Do not be alarmed, Henry, at this singular
visit; it was indeed intended for your sister, but
now I reflect upon it, I am sure you can keep the
secret as well, and do my errand far better.
Henry will you promise not to betray the trust I
am about to repose in you?
I will not betray you, Margaret, but,and
he paused, as if unwilling to express his
meaning
.
I understand you, Henry, continued
Margaret
,
you do not desire my confidence; but surely
you are not the foolish and timid boy to fear one
like me. I know indeed all that you have heard,
and was about to show my confidence in your
courage, by imposing upon you the very task
which alone has procured for me this fearful
suspicion
.
There was something in this
declaration
which kindled at once the proud spirit of the
youth.
What is it, Margaret? If there is nothing
but danger in the errand, I will not hesitate.
Then take this, Henry, resumed the young
lady, after a moment's silence, in slow impressive
tones, and pointing as she spoke to a small wicker
basket which she held in her hand, and when
the first ray of morning appears, carry it for me
to the haunted rock. Nay, Henry, do not be thus
daunted with a name. I believe you a daring
and fearless boy, or I had never trusted you with
the embassy. There is a large and moss grown
stone which lies half way up the acclivityyou
know itthese foolish stories have made it but
too famous. Well, it is there, Henry, that you
must deposit your burthen; and whatever you
find on that stone bring back to me. And yet, it
would not be well, she added, after a moment's
pause, that we should seem to communicate.
No, Henry, you may place it on the bench in the
garden, and every morning, that is, so long as you
will perform this embarrassing task, the basket
shall wait for you there.
And why? exclaimed the youth, who could
not yet banish from his mind the suspicion of
supernatural
agency. Margaret, for whom shall
I do all this?
For mefor my sake, Henry,I intreat you,
do not refuse me. I have pledged myself to
perform
this task, and in spite of danger and
suspicion
have long done itbut a circumstance has
now occurred which will render it for a few days,
at least, improper, nay, impossible.
And whom shall I see, continued Henry, not
at all reassured by the mysterious language of the
young lady.
No one that will harm you, Henrythe only
danger is in discovery. Curious eyes may watch
your steps. But you must leave the village by a
circuitous path, and do all that you can to elude
suspicion. Henry, I must go. Will you do this
errand?
I will,
replied the youth, in a voice which
seemed as though his whole soul had been
summoned
for the effort. Margaret Weldon, I will
do your biddingbut rememberif you are
wiling me away to some dark and unholy deed,
let the sin and the scathe rest on you.
A smile flitted over the features of the fair
visitant
,
as, with all the energy of a desperate
purpose
,
he pronounced the reply; and then turning
with a light and noiseless step, she left the
apartment
.
But it is not to be supposed that Henry, at once
relapsed into that comfortable slumber which her
entrance had disturbed. A succession of fearful
reflections crowded rapidly upon his mind. The
light trains of association were all kindled. Every
faint dream, or half remembered apprehension of
evil, every supernatural legend, or wild tale of
witch or apparition, from the long forgotten song
of the nursery, to the recent reports concerning
the Lady of the Mist,all seemed embodied, and
in living array, before him. He feared, and
fancied
,
and reasoned, until his brain grew sick with
thought, and every moment the cold and dewy
hand of the pale lady seemed ready to press his
brow. I will go to my father, he at length
exclaimed
,
rising hastily from his pillow, and unable
longer to endure his emotion. It may not be
too late to retract this dreadful promise,but
the fear of ridicule at once arrested his purpose.
The moon was shining clear and bright through
his chamber, every object wore its wonted
appearance
,
and though his eye passed carefully
over every crevice and corner, no sights of horror
presented themselves. His head sunk again on
his pillow, and, wearied and exhausted, he soon
fell into a disturbed slumber.
The fearful visit of Margaret Weldon was now
repeated, with all the aggravated horrors an
excited
imagination could furnish; but instead
of Margaret, the pale lady stood beside him,
her cold, ghastly countenance peering in
through the folds of his curtains, and
commanding
him to follow. A resistless influence seemed
to compel his obedience, and while yet struggling
with its power, he awoke.
A faint streak in the east convinced him that it
was the break of day, and he hastily recalled to
his mind the events of the past night. But the
dominion of darkness was now over, and though
there mingled some slight apprehensions of evil
5*
with the proud consciousness of the trust reposed
in him, he prepared, without a moment's
hesitation
,
to fulfil his promise.
Perfect stillness reigned throughout the village,
as he threw open the door of his father's dwelling.
His eye glanced instinctively across the way,
upon
the quiet and beautiful little dwelling of Mrs.
Wilmot. For a moment he fancied he saw at one
of the upper windows the outline of a female
figure, but the fog which was rolling over the
village
prevented any minute observations. He was
anxious also to avoid the scrutiny of any curious
spectators; and springing over a low hedge that
obstructed his way, he moved slowly across a
smooth meadow. The grass was loaded with a
thick vapor, and the sweet breath of the young
clover perfumed the air, as with a light and
hasty
tread, the boy moved onward, brushing for
himself a path amid the wilderness of gems, and
crushing at every step the beauty of some bright
blossom. Now and then his eye turned anxiously
upon the little village he was leaving.
The prospect was not the same which the same
situation might at the present day command
nay you might now look in vain for the flowery
meadow itselfthe squares of the city have long
since spoiled its loveliness. The jail, the church,
and the school-house, now constituted the
ornaments
of the public green; and these, with a few
scattered clusters of houses were all that then
appeared as the germ of that beautiful city which
now yields its shade to thousands. Nevertheless
there was in the uniformly neat appearance of
these dwellings, a slight development of the same
principle which at the present day renders
New-Haven
an object of admiration. The small green
enclosures in front of each, surrounded with white
palings and filled with clustering roses, the
luxuriant
woodbine and honeysuckle, that here and
there shadowed the windows with their rich
curtaining
,
together with the shaded gravel walks
running in various directions through the village,
all sufficiently evidenced that the power of
appreciating
the beautiful, had not been banished
from the homes of the Puritans.
But the mind of Henry Davenport was
occupied
with far more interesting reflections than
these, as, after a circuitous route, he at length
found himself beyond sight of the village, and
rapidly pursuing his way to the haunted rock.
He was about to prove the truth or falsity of that
strange tale, which had so long agitated the
village
,
and his young heart throbbed rapidly as he
descried the object of his destination, towering
bold and high through the dense atmosphere that
surrounded it. The pale moonlight, meanwhile,
had quite faded in the beams of morning; and as
he drew near the foot of the rock, the broad rays of
the level sun darted full upon it, struggling through
the floating masses of vapor, and kindling the
whole mountain with a living radiance.
Here our young hero paused, not merely for the
sake of the momentary rest, which the protracted
walk might certainly have excused, but for the
purpose of rallying his mental forces for the
expected
encounter. He was now at a distance from the
habitations of men, and a few dim specks around
the distant spire was all that indicated the
location
of the village. The chirping note of here
and there a solitary bird, came swelling from the
woods, and seemed only to increase the sense of
his loneliness, while the recollection of the spirit
whose precincts he was about to invade, rushed
painfully to his mind. His eye glanced at the
same moment upon his mysterious burthenwhat
fearful spells might it not contain, what magic
influence
might it not exert upon its bearer; and
he gazed and fancied, until Pandora's box itself
would scarce have seemed a more dreadful load;
and withal, as he recalled the conversation of the
preceding night, he distinctly remembered that
Margaret had failed to assure him that he should
not behold the object of his terror.
But at last with an impulse of the same high
spirit which had first induced him to accept the
embassy, he clasped his ill-omened burthen, and
began manfully to scramble up the rock. We
must confess, however, that his glances towards
the summit were few and far between, it was
enough for him that he descried in the distance
the projecting table like stone on which he was
to deposit his load, and he cared not to penetrate
too curiously into the secrets of the dense fog
which still wrapped the height above. He was
now within a short distance of the stones, when
directing his eye for a moment upwards it
became
suddenly fixed by a fascination as strong
and dreadful as that which the serpent throws
over its victim. Was it the vision of a
distempered
fancy, or a reality? Be this as it might,
he now surely discovered, descending from the
cliff above, what seemed the faint outline of a
human figure. Slowly and gradually, it became
more distinct and Henry ere long recognized the
white robe, the pale and beautiful features of the
lady of the mist. He would have turned and fled
for life, but no human help was nighhe was alone
on the great rock, and he felt that it would be
vain to seek with mortal steps to escape the
grasp of the spirit. So he moved on with a kind
of desperate energy, his eye still fixed on the
advancing
form of the lady. They were now
within
a few yards of each other, and seemed about
to meet just at the haunted stone.
At that instant the mysterious stranger paused,
her bright and beautiful eyes rested on him for a
moment, and, had all the charms and spells he
had dreaded, been concentrated in that one
glance, the change produced on his feelings
could not have been more instantaneous. Fears
and doubts were all forgotten in an emotion of
unmingled surprise. There was something in his
innermost heart, which told him at once that
that soft glance, that look of inexpressible
sweetness
,
he had often met ere now, where or how
he knew not, whether in dreams or visions, but
the expression was as familiar as his own name.
After regarding him for a moment, the lady
turned slowly about, and by the path she had
descended, began to mount the acclivity. Henry
darted forward to the stone. A basket like the
one he bore, already occupied it. The exchange
was quickly made; and turning his way
downward
he soon found himself standing safe at the
foot of the haunted rock.
When Henry Davenport, after depositing the
basket in the appointed place, arrived again at
his father's dwelling, he learned that the whole
village had been thrown into a state of strong
excitement, by the reappearance of the identical
travellers whose adventures have hitherto claimed
so large a share of our attention. It was
rumored
that they had arrived the evening previous,
having pushed their journey only as far south as
the Dutch colony at Manhattan, and were now
prepared to institute a more thorough search,
being convinced that the objects of their pursuit
were yet concealed in the colony of New-Haven.
Early that day, the Rev. Mr. Davenport found
himself favored with a second visit from his
Majesty's
commissioners, Messrs Kirk and Kellond.
During their interview, the amiable family of the
clergymen, were grieved to perceive that
intercourse
with their southern neighbors, had by no
means improved the manners of their guests;
and though the good minister himself manifested
all possible forbearance, the conversation at last
ended with bitter and taunting words on the part
of the strangers. They were however assured
that the answer given them on the occasion of
their former visit, must be considered decisive
no assistance could be furnished them by the
magistrates of the colony, though all authorized
commissioners were of course allowed full liberty
of searching their dwellings. They were
informed
,
however, that if the judges had, as they
asserted
,
secreted themselves in the colony, they
were bound to exercise their own wits according
to the tenor of their directions, in ascertaining the
place of concealment.
The ensuing day it was ascertained that the
commissioners had taken lodgings for a fortnight
at the village inn. And from that place daily
irruptions
were made, into various parts of the
town and its vicinity, much to the annoyance of
the worthy inhabitants.
Meanwhile Henry Davenport continued his
visits to the seat of the mountain spirit; and
every
morning with increasing fortitude encountered
the fearful vision of the white robed lady. After
the first morning, however, she had never
approached
so near as before, standing at such a
distance, while he deposited his burthen, that
the dim outline of her figure alone was
discernible
.
But as he became familiar with the sight,
and every morning found himself returning from
his ramble alive and unharmed, curiosity began
to obtain the ascendancy over his fears, and he
cherished an irresistible desire to learn something
more concerning the lady of the mist. A
circumstance
soon occurred which gave a keener edge
to this feeling, removing, at the same time, all
his most painful conjectures.
It was the fourth evening after his singular
interview
with Miss Weldon, that Henry Davenport
was dispatched to Mrs. Wilmot, as the bearer
of a letter which had that day been received
from Boston, inclosed in a pacquet to his father.
He paused a moment at the gate. A rich flow
of music came swelling from the open window
of the little parlor; there was a mingling of sweet
voices within, and Henry lingered awhile at the
door, unnoticed, and unwilling to disturb the
sacred
melody of their evening hymn.
Mrs. Wilmot was seated opposite the door, and
Miss Weldon beside her, while the lovely little
Alice reclined at her feet, leaning her fair young
head with all its beautiful and clustering curls,
upon her sister and a vivid beam of moonlight
from the window played full upon her
countenance
.
There was a pallid cast to her usually
blooming features, and with an emotion too
powerful for description, Henry at that moment
discovered a close and striking resemblance to
the strange face that gazed on him so fearfully,
through the mist of the haunted rock. The
forehead
,
the lip, the soft melancholy expression
which had seemed so strangely familiar in the
Lady of the Mist, were all in a moment recognized.
The agitation of this discovery, had absorbed
every faculty of the astonished youth, and when
at length amid a pause of the deep melody, the
eyes of the interesting group were directed
towards
him, his confusion and embarrassment
were but too evident.
I have a letter for Margaret, he at length
articulated
,
suddenly recollecting his errand as he
advanced to the sofa.
And whence comes it, said Mrs. Wilmot,
as the young lady seized it with avidity, and,
breaking the seal, glanced her eye hastily over its
contents.
From Boston, replied Miss Weldon in a low
voice, her eye falling again instantly on the
unread
page; and, notwithstanding his emotion,
Henry could not but perceive, that the tidings of
which he had been the unconcious bearer were
of a peculiarly interesting nature. The cheek of
the young lady became flushed, as she perused
the letter, and her countenance exhibited marks
of strong emotion, whether of joy or sorrow he
knew not. Indeed he was now completely
occupied
with a plan he had formed since his
entrance
,
and as soon as the affability of Mrs.
Wilmot
would permit, he hastened home to
mature
his projects.
CHAPTER IV.
When
Henry Davenport, the next morning,
again set out on his excursion, it was with a
settled
determination, at all hazards, to pierce the
singular mystery which enveloped his intercourse
with the Lady of the Mist.
This resolution was not lightly adopted. He
had passed hours of the night in revolving within
himself its expediency, and had at length
concluded
,
that whether she vanished in thin air, or
floated
away on the morning mist, or dropped from his
sight amid the depths of the mountain, he would
surely know from whence she came. For this
purpose
,
he had arisen half an hour earlier than the
usual time. At first a clear starlight was all that
illumined his path; and when at length he stood
at the foot of the rock, the morning only
glimmered
in the east.
Full of his determination, after placing the
basket upon the stone he stretched himself
quietly beside it and directing his eyes above,
began, as well as the darkness would permit, to
watch the approach of the mountain lady. The
beams of the morning were rapidly gathering on
the cliff, when the boy at length discovered what
seemed a human form, winding around the
remote
extremity of the rock, and he was not long
in identifying it with the object of his curiosity.
6
A projecting ledge formed the path by which she
approached; and Henry shuddered as he beheld
her gliding lightly over the dizzy height,
apparently
without fear or impediment.
Ah, she pauses not for cliff or breakthe thin
air is firm enough for that light formmortal
beings
tread not with such a stephe muttered, as
the object of his gaze drew nearer. He waited
only to be well convinced that the form he now
descried was indeed what he had imagined, and
then, turning hastily about, and following a path
parallel to the one she trod, proceeded as swiftly
as the nature of the footing would allow, in the
very direction from which she had just advanced.
It was only by clinging to the shrubs which grew
in the clefts of the stony surface, that he was
enabled
to maintain his ground. Now and then,
he paused to recover breath, casting too,
occasionally
,
a longing glance at the little village
whose blue smokes were just beginning to curl in
the atmosphere. After persevering for some time
in this fatiguing exercise, he paused a moment to
watch for the reappearance of the mysterious
stranger. He waited not long in vain. The light
form he had so often descried in the distance, in
a few minutes more, again became visible,
treading
with the same fearless rapidity along her airy
path. He gazed as for lifestill she moved
onward
and his aching eye followed her with
persevering
earnestness.
At length near a formless pile of huge and
rugged
rocks that seemed as if thrown together by
some primeval convulsion of nature, she paused
and as she turned full around, Henry perceived
that she bore in her hand the basket he had so
recently deposited on the other side of the rock.
At that moment, there appeared standing on the
cliff beside her, a dark and lofty figure, and the
next, the cliff and the nodding shrubs were all that
remained. It was in vain that Henry wiped the
mist from his eyes, and gazed and gazed again
the objects they had before rested on were gone,
not a trace of them remained.
The spot from which they had thus
mysteriously
vanished, was at some distance above the
point where he stood; and, with a determination
to examine it more closely, he began to climb
the sides of the rock by means of the strong
bushes which every where presented themselves.
As he continued to ascend, his eye still fixed
on the mysterious point where he had last
beheld
the lady and her companion, he
suddenly
perceived, to his inexpressible relief, a small
opening among the rocks, which the
shadowing
bushes had hitherto concealed. To be at
once relieved from the dreadful certainty that
the being with whom he had been thus
intimately
connected, was only a supernatural
illusion
,
certainly afforded a strong satisfaction to
his excited mind. The cave was sufficiently
large to contain human beings, and he doubted
not that those on whom his eyes had a few
moments
before rested, were now concealed within
its walls. Here the youth paused to consider his
situation, and seating himself on a fragment of
rock, wiped away the heavy sweat which the fear
and toil had gathered on his young forehead.
Far below lay stretched in the distance, the
clear waters of the sound, a calm sea of liquid
brightness, rolling and glittering in the light of
morning, and winding far onward in its curved
shores of green, till it seemed in the long
perspective
a faint blue stream, and at last a fading speck
on the distant horizon; while all before and
around lay a broad magnificent prospect of hill
and dale, pastures and meadows and waving
woodlands
,
all swelling in the rich luxuriance of June,
and glorious in the rising sunshine. The boy felt
his young heart revive, as the fresh breeze came
up from below, kissing his brow and burning
cheeck; he could not believe that in the sight of
so much purity and loveliness, the unholy spirits
he feared would ever have chosen their residence;
and he felt his courage renewed and his heart
strengthened to continue the pursuit.
But the promise of secresy which Margaret had
extorted from him, was not to be violated; and
though he cast many a wishful glance upon the
entrance of the cavern, the recollection of the
time which must have elapsed since he left the
village, at once checked his purpose. To attempt
any further investigation on the present occasion,
might draw upon him many curious inquiries, and
perhaps discover the secret of his morning
rambles
.
At that moment the sound of the distant
bell came faintly through the distance, and though
broken and scattered by the woods and rocks
which intervened, he soon ascertained that it was
tolling the hour of seven. Without further
hesitation
,
therefore he descended from the rock, and
proceeded with all speed on the road to the
village
.
CHAPTER V.
During
all the avocations of the ensuing day,
the strange cavern of the rock occupied a
preeminent
place in the mind of Henry Davenport.
Whether he wrote, or played, or studied, whether
his eye rested on the solemn visage of the
pedagogue
,
or the laughing faces of his school fellows,
or the beloved and familiar countenances of his
own household, one single absorbing idea filled
his mind. It was the cavethe high lone cave
of the haunted rock, which excluded every other
object from the vision of his mind's eye.
A singular report, which though at first
faintly
whispered, was now every where gathering
strength in its march through the village, at
length arrested his attention. It was rumored
that the Rev. Samuel Russel had been recently
chosen the pastor of a small church, in a
beautiful
village of the Massachusetts Colony, and that,
on the ensuing Thursday, Margaret Weldon
would accompany him thither as his bride.
But the strong interest which this
communication
at first excited, was soon forgotten in the
higher interest of his intended excursion to the
mountain.
The sun was about an hour above the horizon,
and its clear light was playing full upon the
western
side of the rock, when Henry again found
6*
himself within sight of the entrance to the cave.
It is not to be supposed that his love for the wild
and romantic, had as yet entirely subdued the awe
which his possible vicinity to the dwelling of
some unearthly being was calculated to excite,
indeed, as he drew nearer the spot, his
movements
became every moment slower, and he often
paused hesitating and afraid to proceed. One
effort more, and he would stand before the cave.
He looked for a moment downward. The idea
of being hurled from that dizzy height, as the
punishment of his temerity, rushed suddenly and
painfully to his mind. But it was too late to
retreat
,
and the next moment found him at the
entrance
of the cave, gazing fearfully within.
Notwithstanding the strong yellow sunlight that
now beamed through the opening, the room
within
was only in part illuminated. The walls of
the cave, were here and there hollowed into
deep recesses which partially excluded its beams.
Various articles of rude furniture presented
themselves
,
but the eye of Henry, unattracted by
these, wandered onward to a low moss couch,
resting at last with eager curiosity upon the
figure of a venerable stranger wrapped in a
military
cloak and reposing quietly upon it. He
was asleep, and as Henry soon ascertained, the
only occupant of this rude apartment: The
selfsame
basket which Henry had so often
transported
to the rock, stood on a small table
beside
him, and near it a cup containing a few
delicate
wild flowers. He gazed, for a moment
earnestly
around him, and then with a slow and
noiseless tread approached the couch of the
mysterious
sleeper.
His face was uncovered, and a feeling of deep
awe stole over the ardent spirit of the youth, as
he gazed on the chastened sorrowful expression
of that noble countenance. Age and sorrow had
marked his forehead with wrinkles, and silvered
the few thin locks which lay on his temples, and
yet, in every line of those high features, there
gleamed a dignity, a grandeur of soul, which
Henry had often dreamed of in his high-wrought
fancies of Grecian and Roman heroes and of
Hebrew
kings and warriors, but which, till this
moment
,
he had never witnessed.
A sound like that of approaching footsteps
among the loose stones of the rock at length
aroused him from his reverie. Henry gazed
fearfully
around him; there was no retreat. A wide
plank which had evidently been used for the
purpose
of guarding the entrance, now reclined in
a sloping direction against the wall. It was the
only possible concealment; and he had glided
behind it, just as a tall and dark shadow fell on
the floor of the cave. The next moment, a
stately
step echoed within, and Henry ere long
ventured
to look from his concealment. Another
stranger, comparatively young, of lofty mien and
countenance, had entered this strange dwelling.
His head bent thoughtfully down, and there was
something in the restless flashing of his eye,
which conveyed the idea of perplexity and
trouble.
The sleeping stranger was soon aroused, and,
rising from his couch, he slowly approached the
entrance of the cave.
The sun is almost down, he said, turning
anxiously to his companion. Saw you nothing
of her?
Nothing, sir, replied the other in a
melancholy
tone. That I have waited for her
coming
,
is enough of itself to prevent it. There is a
blight on all my hopes and wishes, on the very
lightest of them; and there was that in the look
and tone of the speaker, which showed that those
bitter words were wrung from the innermost
depths of a wounded spirit.
At that moment, the clear and silvery tones of
the old man, fell on the ear of Henry, and he
perceived
that he had seated himself by the table
with an open book before him. His voice was
singularly melodious, and the effect of the holy
and beautiful words, thus solemnly repeated, was
striking, and intensely interesting.
These are they which came out of great
tribulation, and have washed their robes, and
made them white in the blood of the Lamb.
Therefore are they before the throne of God and
serve him day and night in his temple. And he
that sitteth on the throne shall dwell among them.
They shall hunger no more; neither thirst any
more; neither shall the sun light on them, nor
any heat. For the Lamb which is in the midst
of the throne, shall feed them, and lead them to
living fountains of water; and God shall wipe
away all tears from their eyes.
He closed the book and there was a
momentary
silence, interrupted only by the continued
tread of the other. Few indeed, my son,
continued
the old man, few and evil are the days
of our pilgrimage on earth; but let us not waste
these blessed trials, in bitter and vain repinings.
Rather praise Him, William, that he hath counted
us worthy to suffer for his name's sake. I know,
my son, that proud and restless spirit of thine,
will sometimes mount in spite of thy better
reason
;
but oh! let it not rise in murmurs against
the Lord that begot thee.
Heaven will forgive my crime, exclaimed
the other, impatiently, there is a boundary to
mortal endurance; and I am wearynay I am
sickvery soul sick of hopes and exertions.
My father, life may be dear to youto me it is
a weariness. I will give up the desperate
struggle
,
and go forth and die the death which heaven
hath doomed me.
And how hath it been doomed to you? My
son, your soul is blinded with a vain and foolish
sophistry. Because the edict of His weak and
foolish prince, hath said that we shall die, hath
Heaven doomed our death? And would you give
up life, and the service of God on earth, because it
is a weariness? Would you give up the conflict,
because your soul is sick? No, my son, God hath
not yet summoned us to our long restwe have
not yet overcome, that we should be set as
pillars
in the temple above. Patience hath not yet
had its perfect work, and long years of sorrow and
pain, may yet be in our path to heaven.
But you do not consider, sir, rejoined the
other, that we are perhaps drawing upon this
colony a cup of wrath, which the offering of our
blood might avert. Shall we look tamely on,
and behold the wild beast out of the word
destroying
a vine of the Lord's own planting, for
the sake of the inglorious shelter it might yield
us? Heaven forbid.
But are you not wrong? continued the elder.
The magistrates of the colony have refused to
furnish any concealment; and the kindness of a
private individual, even if discovered, would never
bring ruin upon this people. And, William, he
went on in a lower voice, while his tone trembled
slightly, would you leave your wife a widow,
and your offspring fatherless, because you dared
not endure the suffering that joyfully and
unmurmuringly
she has shared with you?
A low groan was the only reply. William,
continued the old man burying his face in his
hands, can you look on our noble hearted
Isabella
,
and say that life is a weariness? Would
you leave her alone in her sorrows, with none
to sooth her amid the blight that has darkened
all her young dreams; when she hath soothed
and loved us so tenderly, and followed us into
exile, drinking unmurmuringly of every bitter
cup which we have tasted, following us into the
dens and caves of the earth, that she might
brighten them with her smiles, and varying the
darkness of our destiny with an affection as
intense
and devoted, nay a thousand times more so,
than any thing we ever dreamed of in the day
of our affluence. William, is there nothing in
love like this, to make life worth living for; or
is it because I am a doting father, that the sight
of such devotedness doth seem to breath around
this faded earth a kind of living fragrance?
Make me not mad with my sufferings,
replied
the other. I tell you my heart strings
are ready to burst, you must not touch them
wantonly
.
My father, if I had never loved our
Isabella
,
or even if had loved her only with such
love as yours, I would endure all suffering
cheerfully
and joyfully to the end, if so I could in any
way soothe or comfort her. But to behold the
noble being that I wooed and won amid halls of
wealth wasting, and watching, and toiling away
her bright existence; and every day to behold
another and another shade fading from her cheek,
and every hour that light and beautiful form
ripening
for the tomband all for
me!
She
might have been living in some fair home in her
native land with as fresh a bloom as when I
gathered
her to adorn my own dark destiny. If she
would but weep and mourn over her altered
fate, I would nerve my soul and bear itbut
she smiles, and smiles on, when I know her heart
is bursting. O I would rather die a thousand
deaths, than see her thus blighted and withering,
because I have loved her, in spite of his
manliness
the cheek of the noble stranger was wet with
tears.
A light step was heard without the cavern and
Henry Davenport felt his heart throbbing so
violently
he almost feared it would discover his
presence
,
as a slender female figure glided by the
place of his concealment. A dark bonnet and
mantle at first prevented his anxious gazebut
these were soon thrown off and Henry at once
beheld without doubt or disguise, the pale white
robed lady of the mist the wife and daughter of
the exiled regicidesthe good, noble, the
beautiful
Isabella Goffe.
The sun was just setting as she entered the
cave, and its deep glow threw a kind of mellow
tint around the forward features of the lady, so
that a faint bloom lingered on the cheek that had
seemed so fearfully pale amid the mists of the
morning. She bore in her hand a boquet of wild
blossoms as with a light and languid tread she
advanced towards the bench on which the elder
of the strangers reclined.
Isabella, my daughter you have been absent
long, exclaimed the old man, as she reclined
herself on the stone and threw her arm kindly
around him. Hath any evil befallen you, my
daughter, he continued looking earnestly and
sorrowfully on her countenance.
I have seen, replied the lady, in a voice
whose clear and sweet tones sent a sudden thrill
through the heart of Henry, I have seen the
cruel and blood-thirsty men who watch our steps,
and heard them declare that they would search
every wood and rock and cave ere they gave up
the pursuit. This rude dwelling will not long
be ours. We must seek some other home if we
would not perish.
And where, rejoined he whom Henry now
know to be Goffe, if the dens and caves of the
mountain are not ours where on earth have we
a dwelling place? My father, my lovely Isabella,
he added, slowly approaching, and seating
himself
beside them, the time has surely come for
us to die, aud why should we any longer resist
the will of Heaven. Let us go boldly forth, and
yield up this load of bitterness. There was a
short and breathless silence.
My son, replied the old man, I have read
of a higher and better being than ourselves, who
once had not where to lay his head. It is enough
for the disciple that he be as his master and the
servant as his Lord.
William, dear William, repeated the lady,
as she parted the dark locks away from his high
pale brow, and gazed wistfully on his features,
do not grieve so bitterly. In our father's house
there are many mansions, and I doubt not that we
shall ere long share their blessedness. I know,
she added in gentle and soothing tones, that
your lot has been a bitter one. I will not speak
of mine. It would have been happy, happy
beyond
all comparison, could I have soothed the
anguish of yours, or lightened one sorrow from
my father's heart. But one effort more remains
for me. And yet, she added, her eye glancing
for a moment around the cave, it is a bitter
thing to leave you thus amid perils and death.
What mean you, Isabella? exclaimed the
old man, while the husband gazed earnestly
upon
her. Would you take away the only earthly
joy that Heaven has left us? Isabella, did I hear
you aright?
Yes, father, I must leave you, I am going
over the waters back to my native land. I will
no longer waste my days in vain repinings while
a chance of happiness remains untried. The
king's heart is in the hand of the Lord; and
he
can turn it as the rivers of water are turned. I
will kneel at the foot of his throne, and weary
him with tears and prayers till he grants me your
pardon. Nay, William, do not urge me. I have
made my resolution, and must and will fulfil it.
Two days from this, I sail for England. Heaven
grant, that if I see your faces again on earth, it
may be in peace. Her voice trembled, she
paused, and leaned her pale cheek upon his
shoulder, while audible sobs interrupted the
stillness.
Meanwhile Henry Davenport had listened in
painful suspense to this singular conversation,
dreading every moment lest some wandering
glance should detect the place of his
concealment
.
As he saw that the sunset glow was fast
fading from the cavern, he trembled lest his
continued
absence should excite the alarm of the
family, and thus discover the retreat of the exiles.
The present moment seemed the most favorable
for effecting an unnoticed retreat; for the
inmates
7
of the cave were, evidently, completely
absorbed in their own bitter emotions. There
was only a step from his concealment, to the
entrance
;
and with a suppressed breath the boy at
length stole out unregarded, joyfully
remembering
,
as he glanced once more upon the clear
heaven, that instead of ministering to the spirits
of evil, he had unconsciously relieved the wants
of those devoted exiles.
Animated with this idea, he was the next
morning
setting out on his accustomed errand, when
he perceived with surprise two gentlemen, arm
in arm, coming hastily down the street. This
surprise
,
was exchanged for strong apprehension,
when, as they drew nearer, he recognized the
forms of the well known and hated commissioners.
And where now so early, my little fellow?
said Kellond, pausing before the gate. The
ghosts and goblins must still be all awake, and
how dare you venture without bible and psalm
book?
Let me beg you, sir, not to concern yourself
on my account, replied the youth, whose
excited
feelings led him strongly to resent the
unceremonious
address, I have only set out for a
little ramble, and do not know that I am in any
particular need of your sympathy.
You are going for a little ramble, are you?
and so are we. Perhaps we may as well proceed
together. Hark'ee my boy, continued Mr.
Kellond
bending his eyes earnestly on his features,
Dids't ever hear of the Lady of the Mist, a
capricious
and handsome little spirit who seems to
have taken up her residence on one of these
mountains
hereabouts. Did'st ever hear of her?
The boy felt the rapidly changing hues of his
countenance, but he looked boldly in their faces,
hear of her! he replied in a tone of surprise,
aye, who has not heard of the pale Lady of the
Mist?
And thou hast seen her too, mayhap,
rejoined
Mr. Kirk, directing upon him a keen and
searching glance. Will you please, young
gentleman, let me examine that little basket of
yours?
The basket is not mine, replied Henry,
indignantly
,
and if it were, sir, I assure you I
should allow no one to meddle with it. Have
you any commands, gentlemen, he added,
essaying
to open the gate on which they leaned.
Why touching this same pale spirit, said
Mr. Kellond, whose very name doth turn thy
young cheek so white, my friend here, and
myself
,
have a particular desire to take a peep at
her ere we leave the village. Could you guide
us to her residence.
And would you brave the fury of the enemy,
for the sake of your curiosity? replied the boy
in a tone of strong remonstrance. If you would,
sir, indeed I dare not go with you.
Look here, my lad, said the other, holding
up before him a silver coin, we must see this
mountain lady, and if you will guide us, this shall
be yours.
The boy seemed to hesitate and looked
earnestly
around him. Do you assure me? he
at length replied, with a strong effort, shall the
money surely be mine, if I will guide you to the
haunted rock?
My word of honor for it, it shall surely be
yours. Only show us the pale lady.
Then wait a moment for me, replied the
youth, with an appearance of agitation, I must
carry this basket to its owner Miss Margaret
Weldon
and will return to you presently. So
saying
he darted across the way, and began to knock
impatiently at the door of Mrs. Wilmot's
dwelling
.
Ere long it was gently opened, and
Margaret
herself stood behind it.
Come inwhat would you, Henry? she
inquired
with an air of deep emotion, and she hastily
closed the door. Tell me, I beseech you,
Henry
,
what do yonder gentlemen desire of you?
That I would guide them to the dwelling
of the pale lady, of whom they have heard so
much; and believe me, Margaret, they suspect
the truth. They are waiting for mewhat shall
I do?
Without inquiring concerning the manner in
which he had made himself acquainted with the
secret of the cave, she now stood for a moment
absorbed in silent and intense thought.
Henry
,
are you sure she at length said, that they
are ignorant of the locality of the haunted rock?
If I may judge from their inquiries, they
know nothing about it.
Then hear me, and remember that the lives
of great and good men, depend on your actions.
You must lead these strangers astray. By the
most circuitous route you can take, guide them to
the East rockmake all possible delays on the road
any thing to amuse them and gain time for their
victims. Conduct them to the remote side of the
rock, and thence around the whole.
And when they at length discover that I have
deceived them, interrupted Henry.
Fear them notthey dare not harm you
only delay it as long as possible. Go Henry, they
are waiting for you, but remember and detain
them.
I willtrust me, Margaret, I will, and
setting
down the basket, he darted forth to meet his
impatient companions.
Miss Weldon waited only until the forms of the
strangers and their young guide were no longer
visible, and then quickly arranging herself, she
hastened down the steps through the little yard,
and with a boldness which only the desperation
of the case would have prompted, she proceeded
by the most public path, directly across the
village
,
towards the haunted rock. Fear lent
strange speed to her steps, and in less than an
hour from the time that Henry had first made his
appearance she was at the mouth of the cavern.
Isabella Goffe had discovered her approach, and
stood without, waiting to receive her.
Your father, your husband, dear lady,
exclaimed
Margaret leaning half breathless against
the entrance.
And what evil awaits them, say it quickly,
Margaret, nay, be it what it may, I am prepared.
Then I must tell you, continued the
agitated
girl, recovering breath and moving hastily
into the cave, that the king's officers are at this
moment searching for you, and for this cave.
They have heard the reports concerning the
Lady
of the Mist, and are not credulous enough to
believe them. If life is dear to you, you must fly
with all speed.
And where are they now, said Isabella, with
a look of sudden calmness while her cheek
became
white as the fresh fallen snow,
Margaret
,
if they are already on the rock, it is too late
to fly.
7*
No, no, replied the young lady, Henry
Davenport
has led them astray, and they are at this
moment searching the East rock, in the mistaken
idea that it contains this cave.
Isabella Goffe had meanwhile approached her
husband who still sat in a recess, his brow
leaning
thoughtfully on his hand, and manifesting an
appearance of perfect indifference, while
Margaret
pronounced her fearful intelligence.
Do you hear her? said the lady, twining her
arm around him, and looking earnestly in his
countenance.
Nay, Isabella, replied the outcast, shaking
his head and regarding her with a smile of
sorrowful
affection, it is vain to attempt it. None
dare to harbor us, and even if they did, it would
only serve to draw on them the fearful blight that
rests on me and mine.
William, continued the lady solemnly, a
shade of agony darkening her features, will
you perish without an effort?
Efforts are vain, my precious Isabella. It is
the will of heaven that we should die; and surely
it is a light thing for us who have no hopes here,
and he still leaned motionless against the rock.
Now hear me, William Goffe, exclaimed the
lady, in clear and unfaultering tones, if you love
me, if you have
ever
loved me; nay if you have
not, by my own love for you, I beseech you cast
not madly away the life which God hath given
you, and a smile of intense intreaty wreathed the
lip of the suppliant.
Any thing, my blessed Isabella, said her
husband, rising hastily up while his strong tones
trembled with emotion, I will do and suffer
all things for your sake, even though it were to
live ages of these bitter moments, and they now
approached the entrance of the cave.
Margaret Weldon was leaning against it, her
face deeply flushed; and the old man stood near
her, listening to her words.
Do you hear, my son, exclaimed the latter
as they approached, do you see the path which
Providence has prepared for us. This kind young
lady offereth us a home and shelter so long as it
shall please Heaven to spare our existence.
Where, and how? said the other in surprise.
You shall hear it William, but there is no
time for explanation now. We must hasten our
retreat ere the pursuers discover their mistake.
Heaven reward you noble girl, he added placing
his hand on the head of Margaret, for that in
the home of your happiness you have not
forgotten
the sorrowful; and the blessing of him that
was ready to perish shall surely come upon you.
Meanwhile, Isabella Goffe with that look of
beautiful composure she so well knew how to
assume
,
was hastening the escape of her devoted
relatives. A forced smile still played on her
countenance, and, save its deathlike paleness,
there was no expression of the intense agony
which wrung the heart of the heroic wife.
Farewell, my father, she cried, throwing her
arm around the old man, as he lingered a
moment
on the threshold. It will be long ere we
meet againwe may never meet again, she
added solemnly, and with a strong effort
subduing
the sobs of her anguish. Bless me, Oh, my
father, and she fell upon his neck, while the old
man breathed forth a fervent petition that the
God of heaven would be to his cherished one as
a hiding place from the wrath of that fearful
tempest
.
Then turning away and leaning upon his
staff he moved rapidly downward.
But William Goffe still lingered at the door of
the cave. You must not stay, exclaimed the
lady, fervently. Farewell, William. Long and
bright days may yet be in store for us, even on
earth; and if we see each other's faces no more
here, we will so live that we may meet in heaven.
He folded her in his arms, his stern lip trembled,
and his eye grew dim with tears.
Farewell, thou best and loveliestthou art
indeed more meet to bloom amid the inheritance
of saints in light, than herefarewell, my own
precious Isabella, fare thee well,and wrapping
the mantle around his noble form, he turned
abruptly
from the cave.
Margaret and the high souled Isabella were
still standing at the entrance, and gazing
earnestly
upon the fast receding forms of the judges,
when the sound of a loud trampling in the path
beneath, arrested their attention. Two well
dressed cavaliers, whom they instantly recognized
as the royal pursuivants, were ascending the steep
acclivity. Near the foot of the mountain, the
quick eye of Isabella, familiar with every avenue
to the place of refuge, discovered their horses
under
the shade of a large tree, awaiting their
return
.
As the cavaliers approached the summit,
their glances were directed frequently and
earnestly
in various drections, resting at last on the
form of Isabella, for Margaret had retreated
within
the cave. Mingled surprise and admiration
were visible on their countenances, as they now
obtained a nearer survey of the beautiful
inhabitant
of the cliff; and as if they had expected to
find the Lady of the Mist, only the disguised
form of one of the regicides, they were evidently
confounded. The lady herself, with a reserved
and graceful dignity, seemed waiting their
message
.
We are seeking, said Kirk, as they paused a
few steps from the place she occupied, we are
seeking to obey the mandate of his Majesty, by
arresting two condemned criminals, the regicides
Whalley and Goffe.
Then let me assure you, sir, replied the lady,
in tones which, in spite of all efforts, betrayed
her emotion, your excursion here is fruitless, I
am the sole inhabitant of the cave, and you must
seek elsewhere for your victims.
And how long, inquired Kellond, who
perceived
at once, by the manner of the lady, that
their conjectures were not groundless, how long
since the said criminals effected their escape from
hence?Shall we search the cave? he continued,
turning to his companion, for Isabella Goffe now
maintained a haughty silence.
It is in vain searching the cage, when the
bird has flown, replied Kirk, following at the
same moment the direction of the lady's eye, as
she cast a troubled and involuntary glance upon
the distant road. Tom Kellond, look ye there!
he exclaimed, suddenly and eagerly pointing his
companion, as he spoke, to a point in the road
where it wound round a green and shaded hill,
on the side of which the forms of the fugitives
were at that moment distinctly visible.
Can you tell us, madam, rejoined Mr.
Kellond
hastily, if the persons you are gazing after
so earnestly, have anything to do with the objects
of our pursuit? Methinks they answer well the
description
.
A flash of unutterable agony for a
moment lighted the beautiful eye of Isabella;
the next indeed a careless and haughty smile
appeared
on her features, but it was too latethey
had read the meaning of her first glance, and
now without waiting for further inquiries, moved
swiftly down the rock.
There is no hope for them, Margaret,
they will surely perish, exclaimed Isabella, as
Miss Weldon issued from the cave,they will
surely perish,and she folded her arms, and
gazed in silent and hopeless agony upon the
distant
and beloved forms of the unconscious
victims
.
But remember, replied the young lady, it
is only our superior height which enables us to
see them. Some time must elapse, ere they again
become visible to the pursuers; and perhaps they
may first be warned of their approach.
Ah, how slowhow slow ye move, muttered
the lady, unconsciously addressing the objects of
her solicitude. Would to heaven that my voice
were the thunder or the whirlwind, so it might
reach your ear. My fatherWilliammy own
William,flyflyI conjure you,and her
voice was choked with a burst of agony, too wild
for control. Ha! Margaret, as I live, they are
waiting for their enemy, she continued, after a
moment's pause; and Margaret perceived, with a
sensation of mingled astonishment and horror,
that the forms of the distant travelers were now
indeed apparently stationary.
The road at a short distance before them was
intersected by a small but rapid stream, over which
a bridge had been recently erected; and after
gazing, for a few moments, in every direction
around them, the persecuted judges again moved
onward.
Where are they, Margaret, said Isabella,
who having turned for a moment to watch the
progress of the pursuers, now looked in vain for
the forms of her husband and fatherbut neither
could her companion at all account for their
sudden
disappearance. Ah, I comprehend it now,
continued the lady with a sudden burst of delight,
they are concealed beneath the bridge,do
not doubt itdid you mark how suddenly they
vanished? and in a delirium of fear and hope,
she leaned to watch the approaching crisis. In
descending the hill, the horsemen gradually
changed the quick gallop with which they had
first appeared, into a slower movement,
occasionally
pausing and gazing earnestly around them.
They were evidently astonished to perceive that
the objects of their search were still no where in
sight, and, as Margaret had feared, unwilling to
believe that they could possibly have proceeded
with sufficient velocity to become invisible in the
distance.
Merciful God! deliver them, exclaimed the
lady, as Margaret essayed to support her sinking
form in her arms. The pursuers had at this moment
paused in the midst of the bridge, and were
apparently
scrutinizing with much interest, the fair
and quiet landscape around them. You
cannot
bear itdear Isabella, said Margaret, trust
them with heaven, and come into the cave.
Oh, hushhush, whispered Isabella,
regarding
her a moment with that fearful smile with
which love had taught her to veil her wildest
agony, I can bear any thing, Margaret,do not
doubt me, and again her eye rested upon the
pursuers. They were at that moment
dismounting
from their horses, and after carefully
fastening
their bridles to the railing of the bridge, and
proceeding to the other side, they began swiftly
to descend towards the margin of the stream.
Ah, they are lost! After all, they are lost,
murmured Isabella faintly. I was wrong,
Margaret
,
I can notnoI
can
not endure it, and
with one long and agonizing sigh, her head
drooped
motionless on her shoulder.
They are gonelook up, my sweet friend, and
fear nothing, said Miss Weldon, as she stood
with her arm around the lady, and fanning with
her light bonnet, her faded brow and cheek.
They are going to search the wood beyond.
Ah! I knew they would never dream of such a
hiding place. The pursuers were now indeed
winding their way along the margin of the stream
towards an extended wood, at no great distance,
whose thick and tangled underwood seemed
to present the most natural place of
concealment
.
A faint hue of life at this moment tinged the
cheek of the pale Isabella, and a joyful
brightness
glistened in her eye, for now the beloved
beings, who had but just seemed lost to her
forever
,
suddenly appeared rising from the bank of
the stream. They passed swiftly over, and then
paused a moment, pointing to the horses which
their pursuers had tied to the bridge. After a
moment's consultation, the younger of the
fugitives
turned again to the bridge, and loosening
the bridles, left the horses at liberty; and then
rapidly rejoined his companion. The steeds, as
if comprehending his wishes, quietly trotted
homeward, leaving their worthy riders to the free
employment of their respective powers of
locomotion
.
In what manner these were exercised,
doth not appear from our history; it is certain,
however, that the regicides pursued without
discovery
,
their northward journey.
8
CHAPTER VI.
It
is impossible for the most vivid imagination,
to conceive the various reports which would
probably
have originated from the events just
described
,
or rather from such fragments of those events
as might have found their way to the village, had
not the whole curiosity of the community been
suddenly diverted to a still more interesting
subject
.
It had been now for many hours, a matter
beyond doubt, that the wedding of Margaret
Weldon
was that evening to be celebrated at the
dwelling of her aunt.
Preparations for the approaching festival, the
inquiry who were invited, who had failed of an
invitation, the probable dress and appearance of
the bride,were all subjects too painfully and
engrossingly interesting to allow of any long
digressions
.
At an early hour a large party were assembled
in Mrs. Wilmot's best room, awaiting with
anxious
glances, the entrance of the bride. The
room had been arranged in a style of taste and
rural elegance becoming so joyful an occasion; its
walls were hung with festooned wreaths of
flowers
,
and several large and beautiful bouquets
adorned the mantel-pieceopposite this was an
arched recess, profusely adorned, and as yet
unoccupied
.
Mrs. Wilmot had a few minutes since welcomed
her last guest, and all was now anxious and silent
expectation, interrupted indeed by an
occasional
whispered conjecture of some of the
younger females of the party. All surmises and
queries, however, were now speedily silenced by
the entrance of the bridal train, and the ceremony
and prayers, much longer and more particular
than in these degenerate days, were performed
without interruption or embarrassment. Some
there were, indeed, who hinted at the excessive
paleness of the young bride, kindly hoping that her
choice had not so soon been repented; but our
readers who are acquainted with the
circumstances
of her morning ramble, will certainly place
upon it a more charitable construction. We will
pass over the details of the merriment, that now
echoed through the apartment; and indeed the
whole wedding might have been consigned to a
similar oblivion, but for the sake of a singular
circumstance which occurred during its
celebration
,
forming a theme for fireside meditation for
months and even years afterwards.
In the midst of a confused hum of conversation
and as nearly as could be recollected, just after
the performance of the ceremony, it was suddenly
perceived by some of the less loquacious, that
there was in the company a stranger to whom not
one had been introduced. In a retired corner of
the room sat a female whose appearance was
peculiar
.
The entire want of ornament in her dress,
while it attracted the attention of some, was to
others the least striking peculiarity in her
appearance
;
for when her face, at first downcast as if
in mental absence, was raised, they saw a
countenance
of strange and indescribable beauty, but
pale and sorrowful, as if the light of young hopes
had gone out there forever, leaving in its stead
high thoughts and holy purposes, but nought of
earth save its deep and tender affections. Such
as were most curious in noticing her dress,
discovered
,
as the breeze from the window slightly
disarranged the drapery which covered her neck,
that she wore a rich golden necklace. This
circumstance
might have been forgotten had not
other incidents afterwards kept it in
remembrance
.
The low interrogations that now passed from
group to group, instead of satisfying only excited
to a higher point, the prevalent feeling of
curiosity
.
None could tell who the stranger was, or
whence she came. The curiosity of the company
was gradually tinged with superstition and
heightened
to fear. And when some one, in a whisper,
at last interrogated the mistress of the mansion,
her evident evasion of the question by some
indefinite
and purposely ambiguous reply, gave no
satisfaction. There was a slight check on the
merriment of the company. The tones of
laughter
if no less loud than at first, were less free and
careless, and many a sidelong glance was
directed
to the corner occupied by the stranger.
Indeed those who first discovered her presence,
afterwards asserted that at the first glance some
indescribable sensation struck to their hearts;
and it was said that those whose attention was
directed thither, if ever so gay at the moment,
became gradually reserved and gloomy.
At length, the eye of the stranger was lifted
with a new expression. Alice Weldon had just
entered the room, and the illuminated glance of
the lady followed her, as she glided among the
guests in the exuberance of childish happiness.
The thoughts of the more imaginative and
nervous
among the observers, testified that there was
surely something mysteriously fascinating in the
smile, with which the object of so much
curiosity
,
watched every movement of the child, as
if anxious to catch her notice. Presently the
eye of the little one turned towards the
corner
,
where the stranger sat alone. That gaze
of delight arrested her attention; and, in a
moment, an answering smile played upon her
lip.
It was in vain that the lady who happened
to be nearest the child, sought with a violent
effort to engage her in something else. The
attempt was for a moment successful, but that
strangely winning smile seemed to attract her
with an irresistible influence. With a quick
movement she withdrew her hand from the
grasp that confined it, and in spite of the
efforts
made to divert her attention, moved
slowly
across the room. The smile deepened on
the lip of the stranger, as the lovely child now
hesitatingly approached her.
You are a beautiful lady, said the little
one, pausing at a short distance from her, as if
afraid to advance; you are the prettiest lady
I have seen to nightshall I come and sit with
you?
Ah, come, come, sweet one, replied the lady,
in a rich and trembling tone, while every feature
kindled with a look of intreaty.
Alice stood for a moment with her hand
in hers, and looked silently upwards on her
countenance. Are you like Margaret? she
at last said, with an air of perplexity, turning
8*
at the same moment towards the bride, as if
seeking to institute a comparison between them.
No, no, it is not Margaret, she added
looking
again at her new friend,Who are you
like?
The stranger replied only by bending to press
the lips of the little girl to hers.
You must love me as well as Margaret,
she at length added, in the same subdued
and thrilling tone, will you not, my precious
one?
Shall I love you better? replied the child,
climbing suddenly into her embrance, and twining
her soft little arms around her, shall I love you
better than Margaret, a thousand times better?
and she pressed her lips to those of her new
found friend, until the lady seemed unable to
repress
her emotion.
This was the last that was noticed of them.
The entrance of refreshments for a few
moments
absorbed the attention, and when
curious
eyes were again turned to the corner,
neither Alice nor the mysterious stranger, were
visible. The former, however, soon re-appeared
from a door which opened to the hall, and it
was at once percieved, that she wore on her
fair and rounded neck, the golden chain which
had before been discovered on the neck of the
stranger lady. It was also percieved that, on
her return, she manifested an appearance of
deep melancholy, and seating herself in the
place which the stranger had occupied, scarcely
smiled or spoke during the remainder of the
evening.
The influence of the stranger over the little
orphan, was not confined to the present occasion.
It was thought that a seriousness and unusual
pensiveness of disposition, was ever after
discoverable
in her character.
The next morning the good ship Beaver
sailed
for Liverpool, and from that time forth,
nothing
more was seen or heard of the Lady of
the Mist.
CHAPTER VII.
The
course of our history requires us to pass
over the fifteen ensuing years, without any
particular
notice. During that time important
changes
had taken place as well in the scene of this
story, as in the persons who are its actors. The
village was gradually becoming a large and
flourishing
town, and many of the families which had
before occupied its chief places were no longer
to be found. Their heads had gone down to the
land of forgetfulness, their various members were
widely scattered, while another household
gathered
around the hearth which had once been
sacred
to their joys.
Mrs. Mary Wilmot, however, still lived, and in
the same place as at the close of the last chapter.
Time had not much altered its appearance. The
house was as white, and the gravel walks as clean,
and the flowers as blooming, as when fifteen years
ago, the fair Margaret had left the place for her
husband's residence. Another hand, indeed, now
taught the woodbine to climb in its wonted place,
and propped and trimmed the sweet-briar and
roses that adorned the court;but they had lost
nothing by the exchange, that hand was as fair
and gentle, and the taste which arranged them,
as exquisite, as any that ever culled a blossom,
since the first fair tender of flowers brightened
the first garden with her beauty. Mrs. Wilmot
had not been deserted in her declining years. A
lovely and accomplished young lady, whom she
had reared from her early childhood, was now
her constant companion; and though there were
some who hesitated not to pronounce her a
singular
and unaccountable being, the old lady found
in her all that was gentle, and patient, and
lovely
.
The charge, however, was not wholly
groundless
.
Alice Weldon had indeed exhibited on many
occasions, what had seemed wildness and
eccentricity
of character, to those who had no clue to
the secret springs of her noble nature. A
romantic
imagination, a set of ardent and enthusiastic
feelings, and a certain pure and fearless
independence
of soul, together formed a character
which all might not love, and which only the few
with spirits like hers, could truly appreciate.
Alice Weldon had never exhibited to her
companions
,
or even cherished in her secret heart, any
selfish emotions of pride; on the contrary, a
peculiar
sweetness of deportment on her part, had
ever marked their intercourse. But there was a
kind of unconscious superiority in the curl of her
rosy lip; she seemed to live in a world of fancy
and feeling, to them inaccessible; she was
more beautiful, more graceful, more
intellectual
than her companions; and though not in
fact haughty or capricious, it was not strange
that as the character of the child became
gradually
merged in that of the elegant, high spirited
and romantic young lady, these epithets began
freely to attach themselves to her name.
These evil dispositions were, in part, attributed
to that defective system of education which Mrs.
Wilmot had adopted with her niece. Alice
Weldon
had ever been allowed the indulgence of all
her innocent tastes and feelings, without opposition
or restraint. Her love for the romantic had been
encouraged by frequent and lonely rambles
among the beautiful scenery in the outskirts of
the village. An exquisite taste for drawing, had
been improved by the lessons of a teacher who
had chanced to reside a few months in the
colony
.
Her thirst for poetry had been gratified by
a perusal of the best authors. The native
melody
of her voice, untaught save by an occasional
attendance at the village singing school, was
warbled forth in a thousand plaintive airs; and
one could scarce ever pass the door of Mrs.
Wilmot's
house at twilight, without listening to her
sweet and bird-like tones.
But by far the most important source of Alice
Weldon's singularities, was supposed by some to
lie in the rich golden chain that ever adorned her
person. The strange manner in which it had
been acquired, was not yet forgetten; and it was
still supposed to exert a mysterious influence
over all her thoughts and feelings. Indeed it
did appear as if some melancholy spell had been
secretly breathed over the heart of its possessor.
A brilliant gaiety of spirit was sometimes seen
bursting forth in every tone and look, like a rich
gleam of sunshine among clouds, and then again
retreating, as if at the bidding of that hidden
influence
.
It was pleasant June twilight, and Alice
Weldon
was standing by the parlour window, her
head bowed down earnestly to catch the last
beams of daylight that lingered on the page.
But the shadows fell fast, and raising her eye to
the window, she perceived that she was the
object
of an earnest and protracted gaze from a
gentleman
who was at that moment slowly passing.
The stranger, for such he seemed, was tall, well
dressed, and prepossessing in his appearance. He
smiled, and as Alice imagined, bowed slightly
just as she averted his countenance. The
circumstance
was surely a singular one, so much so,
that the young lady still continued by the
window
absorbed in a profound reverie, until the voice
of Mrs. Wilmot summoned her to the table. Not
that the casual passing of a stranger, or even a
curious and protracted glance of the window,
were by any means unparalleled occurrences; nor
was the expression of admiration with which he
evidently surveyed her, altogether a thing
unprecedented
.
The stranger had indeed seemed
peculiarly
gifted with those attractions of person,
which are usually counted upon as best suited to
win the heart of a young and romantic female;
but we will do our heroine the justice to say, that
for all this, the memory of the youth might have
passed away from her mind, as his manly form
faded from her vision. But that momentary
glance had aroused the sweet and thrilling
memories of childhood; there was something in
that smiling countenance, to remind her of one
whom she had once known and loved; and every
time that the image of the youthful stranger
returned
to her fancy, there came with it, the dark
locks, the clear eye, and the sunny brow, of him
who had been the companion of her infancy.
The next day it became a well authenticated
piece of intelligence that Mr. Henry Davenport,
son of the former venerable pastor of the town
had come from Boston to take up his residence
in New-Haven having become the possessor of
the property left by the deceased patriarch in the
colony which had first numbered him among its
pillars. The addition of an educated and
accomplished
young man to the society of the place
was a much more unfrequent and important event
than at the present day, and while none received
the intelligence with indifference, it cannot be
denied that to the minds of some, at least among
the young and fair, the event thus announced
was one of special interest. Many were anxious
to renew their acquaintance with the rich and
honored young man, whom they remembered only
as the active, high-spirited and amiable boy. It
was not strange that thus for a few weeks he was
fast becoming an object of some interest to the
fair ones of the village. A sudden check was
however put to any indiscreet admiration that
might have been lavished upon him by the
intelligence
that Alice Weldon, amid the unobtrusive
seclusion of her aunt's dwelling, in the loveliness
of her youth and beauty, had won, irretrievably
won, the heart of the accomplished young
Davenport
.
It was a bright, bland, summer evening when
Henry Davenport first openly declared the
history
of a long and devoted attachment. But there
is something in the development of the first love
of a young heart, altogether too sacred for the
leaves of a printed volume; and we have ever felt
that there was a kind of sacrilege done, when the
recesses of such a soul have been broken open,
and those sweet and holy affections which would
fain shrink even from their own consciousness or
are at best revealed to one alone, have been
poured
out in passionate expressions for the gaze of the
manythe cold hearted, perhaps, the rude and
the curious. The incidents of the tale however
and the development of its characters, require
the introduction of the present scene, and we
must plead the above mentioned scruples,
together
with some slight inexperience of our own, as
an apology for the blank in its description.
* * * * * * * * *
The blush had faded from the neck and brow
of the fair girl, but her head leaned on her hand,
and its living damask still glowed through the
slender fingers and the bright hair that fell over
them. There had been a few low and broken
words, but these were past, and now her voice
was clear and calm.
Henry, they have told you that I was a
romantic
and singular being, that my actions were
all guided by the influence of a mysterious and
secret charm. I am about to prove that these
things are true. To all that I may have said in
an unguarded moment, there is one unyielding
condition. You may think me unjust and
capricious
but
Name it, interrupted the youth hastily,
Alice, if it is a deed for mortal arm, you have
but to name your condition.
The young lady slowly unclasped the beautiful
ornament that adorned her neck, and placed it
in his hand. Reveal to me the fate of the
being
who gave me this.
Nay, Alice, you are trifling with my feelings,
he answered, gazing with surprise upon the
costly
trinket, this is unkindyou cannot be
serious
.
I am serious, Henry, replied the lady. He
9
who would win my hand, must first penetrate, for
me, the mystery which involves the history of her
who gave this necklace, and as she spoke she
pointed to a small and rudely inscribed motto
beneath the clasp.
N' oubliez pas ta mere,
murmured the young
gentleman, holding it near the light. What
means it Alice? I had thought that this was the
chain given you when a child by the strange lady
at your sister's wedding.
It is, Henry Davenport, it is the very same;
and I doubt not that lady was my mother. Nay
hear me, Henry. You call me Alice Weldon,
and you think me the sister of Margaret Russel,
and the niece of Mrs. Wilmot; but when I tell
you that in thus doing you are mistaking me for
another, perhaps you will credit my assertion:
The stranger who clasped this chain around my
neck, was, without doubt, my mother.
Explain yourself, Alice, rejoined the other
in a tone of surprise and agitation. You
certainly
cannot expect me to comprehend your
meaning.
You doubtless remember, continued the
young lady, the circumstances of her
mysterious
appearance.
They have often been related to me; but
until this moment, I had always believed it the
exaggeration of ungratified curiosity, which
attached
such importance to the gift. Indeed I
had reason to imagine, that it was only
presented
from motives of affection to your sister. Go
on Aliceyour words are strange, and yet
methinks
they tally well with some wild thoughts of
my own, many years ago.
I was but four years old, continued Miss
Weldon, when this singular occurrence took
place; but the impressions it produced, are still
vivid in my recollection. Ah, I can never forget
the thrilling ideas that rushed upon my mind, when
I first surveyed the stranger, as she sat in yonder
recess. But she was no stranger to me.
And you had seen her then before,
interrupted
her auditor.
I am almost certain that I had, and yet I
cannot
remember the occasion, but I well know it
was no new face to me. It seemed rather like
one of those beautiful countenances that had
often looked down and smiled upon me in my
dreams, and my heart sprang forth to meet her,
impelled by some unaccountable influence. And
when she bade me farewellwe stood in the
porch together, and she folded me to her bosom
with such a passionate embrace, and wept over me
with such an agony of tenderness, calling me her
own precious and cherished one, and charging
me to remember and love her so long as I should
live in the world, that, were I to live for ages, I
could never forget her. Henry, I
have
remembered
her, and, in all her beauty and sorrowful
tenderness, her image is at this moment as fresh
before me as when she stood among the ivy,
weeping
over me that last farewell. And yet,
perhaps
,
this beautiful memorial, which never for a
moment suffered the bright picture to grow dim,
contributed much to strengthen these
impressions
.
Thenceforth she was the idol of my
fancy
,
the bright spirit of my waking and slumbering
visions. I do not mean that, at that time, I had
even for a moment conjectured the relation which
subsists between us. The being that I then loved
was the creature of my imagination and dear to
me as furnishing an object to those mysterious
and secret yearnings, that had ever haunted my
solitude.
And did you never feel your curiosity excited
concerning her?
Often, and most painfully, but my inquiries
were all in vain. Aunt Wilmot has ever assured
me of her entire ignorance respecting her fate.
Two years ago as I was one morning arranging
the drawers of an old fashioned escrutoire, that
stood in my aunt's apartment, my hand
accidentally
touched a secret spring which discovered
a department of the case I had never before
seen. I was delighted at the occurrence,
because
,
this ancient piece of furniture had
remained
in the family for several generations, and I
fancied
I was about to discover the secrets of some
past age. The first letter I seized upon, bore
the fragments of a black seal; and on opening
it I perceived that it was addressed to my aunt.
Delicacy would of course prevent my perusing
it, but, as I was closing it, my eye glanced
unintentionally
upon the first lines, and I trembled
with amazement. You may read it, Henry, if
you will, for I copied it ere I left the apartment.
The young man seized with avidity the folded
paper, which was now presented to him. It
contained
the following sentences. This will
inform
you, madam, of the death of Alice Weldon,
youngest daughter of your deceased sister, Mrs.
Margaret Weldon. We were preparing, as our
last informed you, to send her to America
according
to the provisions of the will, and indeed
had made arrangements to forward her in charge
of the gentlemen who hands you this letter,
when she was suddenly attacked with a violent
disease which on the 24th inst. terminated her
existence. Mr. Davenport rose hastily from his
seat as he finished its perusal and began to walk
with a hurried and unconscious step. A flush
had meanwhile gathered on his cheek; and an
expression of mingled astonishment and delight
animated his countenance.
And was there aught else, AliceAlice
Weldon
,
for so I must and will call you, did this
curious
letter contain any further information?
Only some tedious details which convinced
me that its writer was the executor of Mrs.
Weldon's estate; but I had no heart to
examine
further. The date was precisely the time at
which I was supposed to have arrived in
America
,
and I was at once convinced that I had,
all my life, usurped a name and station to which
I had no claim. Hitherto orphan though I was,
I had deemed myself surrounded with endeared
and affectionate relatives; but now the delusion
was over, I was alone in the worldan isolated
being, and my hopes all clouded.
And why so Alice? What if this discovery
should reveal to you relations far nearer than
those it has annihilated, and teach you to claim
a parentage that princes might glory in. Ah, I
see it all now. There is, there cannot be the
shadow of a doubtAlice Weldon, did you
never
suspect yourself to be the daughter of
Of whom? repeated the young lady in low
and hushed tones, for she had waited in vain for
the conclusion of the sentencehe was still
silent
,
and her cheek became colorless as the white
rose that lay in her hair.
I have done wrong. Forgive me, my gentle
Alice, he at length replied, checking his
hurried
9*
movements, and his kindled eye softening
as he spoke, Mrs. Wilmot, as well as
Governor
Leet must have been privy to this strange
secret, and you say that they never hinted any
thing to you concerning it.
Never!
And have you never revealed to them this
singular discovery?
No; the thought was agonytill this night
the secret has been buried in my own heart, and
but for you it might have died with me. It did
indeed double my inquiries concerning the
mysterious
visit of the stranger, but they were always
evaded, and indeed, Mrs. Wilmot seemed pained
whenever it was mentioned. For as I had felt
my relations to the beings around me suddenly
severed, my thoughts had gradually fastened, with
a new and strange devotion, upon that beautiful
image of memory, which seemed to me to
concentrate
all that was lovely in human tenderness.
I endeavored to reason calmly, to divest myself
of enthusiasm, I remembered every tone and
look, the gust of tears, the passionate embrace;
and I could not but feel that there was a link in
our destinies, something strong as the ties of
natural
affection. The translation of the little
motto
you see on the clasp was at length obtained,
Forget not thy
mother
. There was no longer
a doubt. Yes, Henry, it was my own mother
who fifteen years since went forth from this house
in such bitterness. Who knows but that she may
still livealoneunprotectedin peril and
sorrow
,
while I whose duty it is to soothe and
comfort
her, am wasting my hours in careless case,
unmindful of one who charged me to love and
remember her. No, Henry, I will enter into no
new relations until I can fulfil those first and
sacred
obligations, of which this gift is an
enduring
token. I cannot be happy and I will not
mar with my own dark fortunes the destiny of
another.
But she may be dead, replied the youth in
agitation. Say nothing rashly, Alice.
Remember
,
fifteen years have past since you saw her.
I do. And now hear me, Henryhear the
condition of my plighted troth. Unravel this
mysteryI know you have already a clue you
do not choose to confide to mebut I will not
urge you. Uuravel this mystery. Reveal to me
the fate of this mysterious being, and oh, if living,
restore her to me.
And then?
I will deem it my highest happiness to love
and honor you forever.
The curfew now slowly announced the hour
of nine, and Henry Davenport ere long departed
for his lodgings.
CHAPTER VIII.
On
a cold moonlight winter evening, some
eighteen months after the events recorded in
the last chapter, a small sleigh was seen
blithely jingling over the road which forms
the southern entrance to the village of H
The back seat was occupied by two ladies
completely
enveloped in the folds of a huge buffalo
skin, and that in front by a single gentleman in
the capacity of driver.
Drive faster, Richard, for heaven's sake,
exclaimed
one of the ladies in an impatient tone,
as they slackened their pace at the slight ascent
before them. I say, Richard, if you do not set
us down somewhere, and that speedily, I will take
the reins myself. If one of these drifts would
suit your ladyship, replied the other, turning
with a threatening air to the roadside, I can
easily accomplish your wishes. Will you alight?
Ah, Richard, you will not laugh when you
find me frozen to death under the buffalo skin.
I tell you my fingers are icicles already.
Then they must be strikingly improved in
complexion, replied the other with an air of
extreme
indifference, but at that moment a loud
and triumphant shaking of the bells announced
that the horse with his dignified and leisurely
tread had at length completed the ascent. Ah!
and here we are, shouted the driver, pointing at
the same moment, with his whip, to the prospect
which had just become visible.
On the plain beneath, at no great distance, a
comfortable cluster of brown, red and white
houses, now appeared interrupting the bold ext
panse of snow and moonlight, while the fires and
candles gleaming through the distant windows
seemed to diffuse a delicious glow through the
hearts of the half frozen travellers.
But, Richard, we have been so often deceived
with these log houses, and jack-a-lanterns, I don't
believe it is the real village.
Not the village, Susan. Why then my
precious
sister, open your eyes. Do you not see the
steeple as plain as daylight at the northern
extremity
,
and a little to the right, the sparks from
the blacksmith's forge, they told us of, and did
we not pass the Three mile mill, half an
hour ago?
Meanwhile they were darting down the hill,
with sufficient rapidity to compensate for the
tediousness
of the ascent.
What a hill for a slide, said the talkative
young lady, turning for a moment to survey it, just
as they reached the plain. I declare, I would like
nothing better than to be a child for fifteen
minutes
,
if it were only to enjoy another frolic in the
snowand, as it is, I would risk my dignity for
a single slide from yonder summit. Ah, Alice,
you need not smile so contemptuously, she
continued
,
turning to the lady who sat silently by
her, I have known graver and wiser ladies than
yourself guilty of similar indiscretions. Even
that revered matron we are about to visit, aye,
and the madam of a parishI remember the
day when she sprung on the sled and rode down
as blithely as any of us. But, I fancy, she failed
not of some grave rebukes on the subject. Do
you remember it, Richard? It was the night the
English travellers came, and whom should we
meet at the foot of the hill, but the worthy Mr.
Russel himself. But I beg your pardon, Richard,
I remember
you
always chose to ride by yourself.
It was Henry Davenport that was guiding the
sled.
And do you know, interrupted the young
man, without regarding her previous remark, that
young Davenport has returned from England?
Returned!
exclaimed the silent young lady,
in a tone of thrilling emphasis, and starting as if
electrified. Richard did I hear you aright?
Henry Davenport returned?
Aye; so they say, replied her companion, I
found an old friend of ours at the last inn, who
says he met him three days ago in the streets of
Boston, and never saw him looking better.
And is he going to New-Haven? continued
the young lady in the same tone of eager inquiry.
What did he say, tell me I pray you, Richard.
Indeed, cousin Alice, replied the other, I
was always bad at guessing, and as I happened to
be driving you quietly over the Connecticut
hills, at the time of their interview, it is
impossible
for me to decide what were his veritable
words.
Did you not know, said Susan, leaning
across the seat and speaking in a loud whisper,
that about a year and a half since, it was
reported
that Henry Davenport was engaged to
Alice, and it was all broken off so suddenly? I
am sure, Dick, you might have spared her
feelings
.
The conversation had gradually become
interesting
,
and, before they were aware of it, they
found themselves entering the principal street of
H. It was only seven o'clock, and the
village
presented an appearance of considerable
animation. Sleighs were moving merrily along,
and the pleasant sound of the bells, the lights
from the windows of the dwelling houses, and
above all the illumination which glared from the
little grocery, dry good, and hardware store, in
the midst, produced the idea of busy and
cheerful
enjoyment. The snow had been thrown in
piles on either side of the way, and some of the
inhabitants were now enjoying the comfortable
foot-paths thus furnished, in sallying forth for the
social evening visit. Near the center of the
village
,
the principal street was intersected by
another
from the east, and it was on one of the
angles thus formed that our party at length drew
up before the large square house which had been
pointed out to them as the dwelling of Mr.
Russel
.
It was one of the most ancient in the village,
and having never been painted, it had acquired
from long exposure, that tinge of sombre brown
so redolent with gloomy associations,and there
was an air of loneliness and desertion about it,
with the large old barns in the rear, particularly
when seen, as now, with their long and quiet
shadows
lying in the moonlight. Every object
exhibited
an air of perfect stillness, there were no
lights in the windows, and not even a dog to bark
their welcome.
There's no wonder they call it a haunted
house, said Susan in a voice tremulous with
vexation, and turning to her companion in the
sleigh, while Richard knocked loudly at the door.
I am quite sure I never saw a house look
more like it.
They are not at home, sir, said a tidy looking
woman, who had at length made her appearance.
They are gone to the meetingthe minister's
meetingand wont return till to-morrow. Will
you walk in?
Ah! that we will, good woman, if you have
such a thing as a fire, replied the young man,
hastening at the same moment to assist the ladies
in alighting.
If Mr. and Mrs. Russel are absent, I would
not stay in this house to-night for the world,
whispered Susan to her companion, as they
mounted the steps, and indeed I should not
wonder if we were carried off bodily before
morning, she continued, in a still lower tone, as
they followed their conductress through a long
and extremely narrow hall. Stranger things
have happened here, if all tales are true.
The door which terminated the passage, was
at length thrown open, and the travelers were
ushered into a bright and pleasant little parlor,
the social aspect of which seemed to remove
all cause of discontent. There was a fresh blaze
on the hearth, and the light and glow of the
apartment
contrasted strongly with the cold, pale
moonlight
without. The guests had been expected.
A small table was already spread for their
refreshment
,
and the good Mrs. Ramsay now
hastily
arranged chairs for them around the fire.
Ah, this seems more like a christian
dwelling
,
whispered Susan, in a low voice, as the
good dame left the apartment, but, Richard, I
confess I do not exactly like the idea of staying
in the haunted house alone, or at least with
strangers. I would rather the minister were at
home.
Richard's sarcastic reply was interrupted by
the re-appearance of Mrs. Ramsay, who
seemed
indeed to act in a much higher capacity than
that of an ordinary domestic.
Mrs. Russel bade me tell you to make
yourselves at home, if you came during her
absence; that is, if you are her sister and
cousins.
I believe we can prove the fact to a
demonstration
,
good Mrs. Ramsay, answered Richard,
gaily disencumbering himself of his superfluous
apparel, and I for one shall make use of its
privileges
,
ghosts and goblins to the contrary
notwithstanding
.
After a few meaning glances on the part of
Susan, the young ladies rose to follow his
example
,
thus presenting Mrs. Ramsay an opportunity
of more unobservedly satisfying her curiosity.
They were both expensively dressed; but the
discriminating eye of their observer, soon
detected
a peculiar tastefulness in the apparel of the
younger. The mantle she had worn on her
entrance
,
had fallen from her shoulders, the dark
pelisse beneath revealing her light and graceful
figure. As she laid aside her veiled bonnet, the
waving curls beneath fell on a brow like marble,
high and fair, and darkly penciled; a gleam of
spiritual beauty looked out from her blue eyes,
softened and shaded with its drooping lashes;
while the melancholy cast of expression touching
every feature would have given interest, nay,
fascination, to a countenance of ordinary outline.
Nor was her companion destitute of personal
attractions
;
her form was graceful, a sparkling
10
bloom rested on her lip and cheek; and, in other
company, she might have been deemed
beautiful
.
But the light of genius and fancy, the bloom
of rich thoughts and feelings, will ever stamp on
the countenance of their possessor, a superior
and elevated loveliness.
Though the worthy Mrs. Ramsay had not
arrived
at exactly the same conclusion, with that to
which we have conducted our readers, she was
evidently investigating the comparative merits of
the young ladies, with a spirit of determined
resolution. The result, however, appeared at first
satisfactory. If I may make bold to say it,
she at last said, turning to Susan with an air of
triumphant skill, I expect you must be Madam
Russel's sister.
No; I have not that honoronly her
cousin
.
Then I will never trust a likeness again,
muttered the other in a disappointed tone,
turning
to the table to hide her vexation. I am sure
the other young lady favors her no more than I
do. No body would dream of their being
related
.
Guessing was certainly Mrs. Ramsay's
forte; and she now completed the arrangement
of the table, with an air which evinced her
displeasure
at the failure.
Alice Weldon was the only one who seemed
not to relish the inviting repast. There was a
violent tremor in her whole frame, a strong and
visible excitement of feeling, and notwithstanding
her complaints of the effects of cold and
weariness
,
her gay companions ere long desired to know
its cause.
But at that moment, the wind moaned heavily
through a distant part of the building, and all
the unpleasant associations which the cheerful
appearance of the little parlor had for a time
dispelled
,
seemed to return with increased energy.
It is nothing but the whistling of the wind,
replied Mrs. Ramsay, as Susan rose suddenly
from her seat by the table, and earnestly
demanded
its cause. The shutters too are loose, and a
breeze from the north will always move them.
But neither this explanation, nor the raillery of
her brother, had power to allay the excited fears
of the young lady. When the keen
apprehension
of evil is once aroused, it needs no frightful
occurrence to continue and strengthen its
influence
.
The slightest sound, the most trivial
incident, is greedily converted into cause of alarm,
until the mind is wrought up to an intense and
perhaps intolerable pitch of emotion.
If you had seen what I have seen, said Mrs.
Ramsay, as the trio seated themselves by the fire,
and if you had heard what I have heard, you
might well be afraid. She paused as if for
encouragement
to proceed.
And prythee what have you seen? replied
Richard, with a contemptuous smile, be a little
more definite, I intreat you.
Why, to tell you the truthto be plain with
you, continued Mrs. Ramsay, approaching the
fireside, with a solemn and mysterious expression,
you must know that this house, a certain part
of it I mean, is
haunted
. Those who find it for
their interest may deny it as they will, but I will
stand to it, the longest day I livethe house is a
haunted one.
What part of it, good Mrs. Ramsay? cried
Susan, looking earnestly around the room, and
suppressing, for a moment, her quickened
breathing
.
Do you see that door? continued the other,
pointing to what seemed a small closet behind
Susan.
What of it, Mrs. Ramsay? exclaimed the
young lady, suddenly vacating her seat for one on
the opposite side of the fire.
Nay, Susan, interrupted Alice, now raising
her thoughtful and abstracted glance from the
embers. You do wrong thus to agitate your
feelings. I cannot feel that there is cause for
your alarm.
Ah, you cannot, replied the other with a
scornful smile. Well, I will confess to you,
cousin Alice, my inferiority. I am not so much
wiser than the rest of this generation, as altogether
to defy supernatural beings. Perhaps if I were
as good as Richard and yourself, I might exhibit
more courage.
Perhaps you might, my dear, replied the
youth calmly. But as it is, we must intreat
Mrs. Ramsay to defer her frightful stories till
daylight.
Ah! and good reason, retorted Susan, you
dare not hear them.
Dare not? repeated her brother
contemptuously
,
You shall see. Good woman I will save
you the trouble of describing these apartments,
and he moved with rapid steps towards the door
so mysteriously designated. But Richard was not
at heart ill-natured and the agonizing intreaties
of his siter at length prevailed. Perhaps too
some private misgivings of his own exerted their
due influence. Be this as it may, his character
was vindicated, and he now again approached the
fireside.
And now, Mrs. Ramsay, do tell us all about
it, continued Susan eagerly. That mysterious
door. Where does it lead?
Heaven knows, replied the old woman,
devoutly
folding her eyelids. Heaven knows
not I. So long as I have lived in this house,
which is two years this coming Thanksgiving, I
have never lifted the latch, and heaven forbid I
ever should. But I have seen it opened. Aye,
with my own bodily eyes have I seen itand that
too when the lock was turned and the key
hanging
above the mantel-piece, as plain as it does
at this moment. Mrs. Ramsay moved her chair
into the circle as she spoke, and Susan Leet drew
closer to her cousin.
Did you see any one? inquired the latter in a
faultering voice.
Aye, as plainly as I see you at this moment.
I saw a face like the face of a human being,
but pale and ghastly, and the eyes were
sunken
Nay, Mrs. Ramsay,tell me no more of these
things, cried Susan, shuddering and turning to
Alice, who now indeed seemed herself to have
imbibed a portion of her own interest in the
narration
.
Do, dear Alice, sing us a song, and let
us forget these horrible ideas.
The request was immediately complied with,
and Miss Weldon rejoiced in an opportunity of
diverting her own attention from the fearfully
fascinating narrative. The song selected was
one calculated to arouse a far different train of
association, and Richard soon found means to
introduce
subjects of conversation better suited to
10*
his own mirthful spirit. The evening now wore
away without further recurrence to the subject of
their apprehensions; though an occasional glance
at the mysterious door, testified that Susan had
not entirely forgotten it.
It was now ten o'clock. Richard had a few
minutes ago retired; and the young ladies
drew their chairs more closely around the fire,
to enjoy for a few moments its delicious glow,
ere they ventured to brave the cold of their
sleeping
apartment. If there is one time when young
females are more prone to indulge in fanciful
reveries than another, it is certainly this, when
the ceaseless hum, the absorbing cares or
pleasures
,
of the day, are past, and they sit quietly
down to commune with their own wild and happy
thoughts, without fear or distraction. Ah, how
many lovely hopes have sprung up in the
brightness
of the winter's hearth, how many airy castles
have arisen to the eyes of beauty, and crumbled
and faded away, in its glowing crimson. But we
cannot transcribe the thoughts which now kindled
the eye of our heroine. It is a time when the
loved and the absent are remembered; and Alice
Weldon would not have breathed, even to the
cousin whose arm was around her, the secret
hopes which her fancy then cherished.
But these reveries were now unexpectedly
disturbed
by the re-appearance of Mrs. Ramsay.
She came into the room with a hurried movement,
and Alice could not but think that there was a
singular expression on her features; but as she
seated herself silently by the fire, she forbore to
notice it.
Do you hear that noise? exclaimed Susan,
after a few moment's silence, and directing as
she spoke, a surprised and terrified glance around
the apartment. For several minutes I have
heard that strange sound. Say, Mrs. Ramsay,
can you tell me where it is?
Not I,replied the old woman, while her
eye reflected back the whole quantum of terror
which Susan's had communicated,Do you hear
it, Miss Weldon?
In the interval of profound silence which now
ensued, Alice could indeed faintly distinguish a
sound like that of a human groan, as if echoing
along some distant passage. All eyes were now
fixed intently upon the mysterious door, until the
cheek of Alice Weldon became as pale as that of
her more timid companions. The low repeated
groan, seemed gradually to grow more distinct,
as the increased effort of attention rendered the
effect more powerful.
Does Mr. Russel never enter these strange
apartments? murmured Alice faintly.
Ah, that he does; and the more the sin, and
the shame say I, for him, a christian minister.
And do you believe, continued Alice, that
so true and holy a man as your minister, would
have dealings with the spirits of evil? Hark!
Again!Listen, Susan, that surely is the voice of
human suffering.
Susan had arisen in the extremity of her terror
and was now leaning, pale and almost breathless,
against the corner of the mantel-piece. Mrs.
Ramsay sat trembling beside her. Are you
sure, continued Alice, glancing at the latter,
that yonder key will indeed unlock this door?
Quite sure;I know it. But what would
you do with it, Miss Alice? she added in an
altered
tone, as the young lady calmly approached
and took it from its resting place.
Alice, Alice Weldon, what would you do?
cried Susan, casting on her cousin a look of
agonized
inquiry, as she stood for a moment gazing
thoughtfully towards the door.
If it were not too bold a deed for a single girl,
Susan, I would open at once that mysterious
door. Oh, those fearful tones! she added as
still another groan was borne on the air,They
pierce my heart, I cannot stay here, when there
is a chance of relieving the sufferer. Say, Mrs.
Ramsay, does Margaret, does Madam Russel
herself
ever enter those apartments?
So they say, replied Mrs. Ramsay,
reluctantly
.
Susan, I will never believe that Margaret
hath done aught beneath the character of a
christian
woman.
Oh do not depend on that, replied her
cousin
intreatingly, dearest Alice, I assure you that
strange suspicions rested on her name, many
years ago, even before she left our village.
But you forget Susan, that you are speaking
to her sister. Margaret is no more connected
with unearthly beings than I am at this moment.
Susan had, in the ardor of her emotion, laid her
hand upon her cousin's arm as if to prevent her
daring purpose, but at that moment she suddenly
withdrew it, as though those words had conveyed
to her some strange and fearful meaning; and
after gazing at her for a moment with an
expression
which Alice could by no means comprehend,
she turned shuddering away from her.
How can you, how dare you go? said Mrs.
Ramsay, as the young lady slowly approached
the door, for at that moment the sound of a
distant
tread was clearly perceptible. Alice paused
for a moment, and then placing the key in the
lock, the next, the dreaded door was open
before
her.
She now found herself standing at the head of
a rude staircase; and the light she held in her
hand, streamed upon it, sufficiently to make
visible
the darkness of a narrow subterranean
passage
beneath. The damp air from below sent a
sudden chill through her frame; she paused a
moment, and throwing over her shoulders the
rich mantle which hung beside her, again set out
on her fearful errand. The staircase was steep
and difficult of descent, but her foot at length
rested on the flooring of earth below and she
moved quickly forward. The passage through
which she was now treading, was extremely
narnow
.
A stone wall on either side bounded her
vision, and the fearful glances she directed
down the dimly lighted vault, were equally
confined
by an abrupt angle in the path before her.
But the undaunted girl still moved on; and, in a
few moments more, she had reached the corner and
was rapidly turning it. At that instant there was
a sudden darkness. A gust of chill air from
beyond
had extinguished her lamp. It was in vain
that she sought to rekindle the lingering spark, it
only expired the more readily and she now found
herself involved in total darkness. To return
from whence she came, and that with all possible
speed, was the first terrified impulse; but, in the
confusion of the moment, she had lost the direction
of the parlor, and had now no possible guide to
her steps. At that instant, there appeared a faint
light shining high in the aperture of a wall at
some distance before her, forming what seemed
the outline of a door; but whether this would
conduct her again to the parlor, or to the
mysterious
object of her search, was only a matter of
fearful conjecture. After groping for some time
in perfect silence, for the groans had now
entirely ceased, she found herself ascending
the ladder which led to the lighted apartment
above. Now there came from within the sound
of a heavy tread, and the young adventurer
pausedbut the life blood came back to her
heart again, and with it her dauntless purpose;
the next moment, and she stood on the
thresh-hold
above. The lock rattled to her touch
there was the sound of a turning key within, and
the door of the apartment opened wide before
her. Amid the sudden and painful rush of light,
a form of commanding grace stood before her,
and a dark and sorrowful eye rested sternly on
hers. She would have spoken, but the words
died on her lip; she leaned tremblingly upon
the wall, and at length there came a low and
brief apology; but the stranger still gazed as if
heedless of its import. If the idea of
supernatural
agency had for a moment intruded while
groping through the darkness below, it all
vanished
beneath that silent gaze. There was a
touch of earth and its sorrows, on every object of
that lonely room, and her very soul was hushed
and awed, at the recollection that she had dared
to intrude upon its sacredness.
It was only a momentary glimpse indeed which
Alice directed to the objects of the apartment.
It contained no windows, the faint light of the
mouldering fire flickered upon the walls, and the
lamp burned dimly in its socket. A case of
books stood near the door;there was a low
table in the center of the apartment, and
scattered
around it a few cushioned chairs with covers
of faded green. A couch stood near the fire,
of like ancient and worn materials, and here
indeed the quick glance of Alice rested. A wide
cloak fell carelessly over it, and its folds were
heaving to the low and quickened breathings of
human agony. It was no fancy then; that deep
groan had borne its own true and fearful
meaning
,
and there lay the suffering and dying one.
And yet the pity which had prompted the
effort
,
almost vanished amid the deep emotions
that now thrilled her heart. It was the face of
an old man, and very pale, the eyes were closed
as in slumber, and every feature was thin and
worn as if with long and bitter suffering. Yet
there was around those features the peaceful
beauty of holiness, a smile was on the thin and
faded lip, and in every furrow of that noble brow
were the records of the battle fought, the
victory
won, and the diadem laid up above,
incorruptible
and unfading; it seemed as if the
brightness of heaven were near, and the agony
of earth almost ended. But Alice was still
conscious
that the other inmate of the apartment
had not ceased to regard her with fixed and
painful
earnestness. He was indeed silent, but a
strong flush, mantling high even among the
dark locks that shaded his temples, betrayed no
trivial emotion.
Forgive my intrusion, sir, said Alice in low
and trembling tones, it was not for idle
curiosity
indeed,
sir, I will prove that it was not; only
tell me how I can in any way serve you, or
The stranger was evidently about to speak,
but at that moment a low and protracted groan
burst from the couch of the invalid. Though
the sound of heavy steps and opening doors, had
not aroused him from that deathlike lethargy;
the faint tones of that sweet and murmured voice,
seemed to have recalled him to the consciousness
of sufferinghis eye roamed wildly over the
apartment. In a moment his companion was
beside
him gently bathing his temples, and
evidently
stifling his own deep sighs with words of
consolation
.
But there was no replyfor the eye
of the invalid now rested on the spot where the
beautiful young stranger was leaning, her face
bright with emotion, and the drapery of her
scarlet
mantle streaming from her shoulders. There
was something irresistibly attractive in that
beseeching
glance, and she almost unconsciously
drew near the couch.
Now the blessing of the God of heaven be on
thee, my Isabel, my own lost and beautiful one,
said the old man in slow but unfaultering tones,
as Alice Weldon advanced towards him. I knew
thou wouldst not forsake us altogether. I told
thee, William, she would come again to us,
though it were only to soothe our dying moments
Give me thy hand, my sweet daughter Isabel,
let these eyes look once more on thee. Ah,
once
more, for surely there is nothing else on earth
that I would not now close them on joyfully and
forever.
Alice cast upon the other a glance of anxious
inquiry, as she placed her fair hand in that of the
aged invalid. But there was nothing there, to
check her amazement; all that had appeared
strange and mysterious in the exclamations of
the sufferer, seemed more than confirmed in his
countenance. The old man still continued to
gaze wistfully upon her.
Methinks the long years that have rolled so
wearily over us, have fallen but lightly on thee,
my noble daughter. I am old, and worn with
grief, and even William's dark locks are sprinkled
with snow; but thou dost seem more young, and
far more blooming, than when we left thee in the
cave of the mountain. Say, Isabel, is it that
thou hast wandered free and happy among the
fresh breezes of the earth, that thine eye is so
bright, and thy cheek so blooming? But nono,
he added mournfullyit cannot be. They told
me that my Isabel lay in the dark prisons
beyond
the ocean. And he closed his eyes as if to
shut out the bewildering image.
A tear trembled in the eye of Alice, as, with a
look of earnest inquiry, she once more raised it
to the countenance of the stranger. Tell me
your name, young maiden, exclaimed the latter
in a voice of uncontrollable emotion, and haply
I may read you his meaning.
They call me Alice Weldon, replied the
trembling girl, while a strong rush of
associations
overpowered her spirit.
Then wonder not that visions of that
beloved
one are kindled. Thy mother was his own
and only daughter, and thou art mine. There
was a moment of doubtof deep incredulous
wonder, and Alice gazed in silence. But the
springs of natural affection are hidden and
mysterious
;
and it was not long ere she threw her
arm around the neck of him whom but now
she had deemed a stranger, calling him her
father
,
and weeping over him with wild and
passionate
11
tenderness, as if from her earliest
childhood
she had loved his name.
The old man seemed only in part to have
comprehended
the recognition that had taken place;
and his thoughts still wandered with painful
earnnestness
,
to the memory of that heroic being
whose living image seemed before him. Oh
I had prayed that I might see her again, he
murmured in weak and sunken tones, and I had
forgotten that the illusions of earth are not yet
over.
Only half an hour had elapsed since Alice had
departed on her mysterious expedition, when she
again found herself traversing the subterranean
passage. There seemed a perfect silence within
the little parlor as she ascended the staircase, only
the ticking of the clock was plainly perceptible.
Mrs. Ramsay was sitting precisely in the same
place as when she had left her, and close beside
her was Susan whose countenance exhibited the
same emotion as before, save that there was an
expression of even deeper terror in her eye as it
glanced upon the opening door. Alice
instantly
perceived, that during her absence, the party
had received a singular addition. On the
opposite
side of the fire sat a stranger, a tall and
elegantly
proportioned female. She wore a pelisse
and bonnet of rich black velvet, and a ribbon
of the same hue, fastened around her throat with
a small diamond clasp. The lady had evidently
passed the noon of life; and here and there a
solitary line of silver mingled among the dark
hair that was parted on her forehead. Her face
seemed throughout of the pure and colorless tint
of marble; and so perfectly regular was the
contour
of her features, that it seemed rather like
some exquisite production of the chisel, than
like a form of life and motion. A faint smile
lingered on her lip; and there was a certain
wildness and indescribable sweetness of
expression
in the brilliancy of her soft dark eye, as it
beamed upon the admiring Alice.
The young lady waited a moment, as if for
some introduction to this stranger, but there was
an uninterrupted silence; and a meaning glance
at that moment interchanged between Mrs.
Ramsay
and her cousin, suddenly convinced her that
she was to them an object of aversion and fear.
There were no inquiries as to the success of her
errand; and she now sat down, without
attempting
to interrupt the awkward silence.
Several minutes had elapsed, and Alice was
still vainly endeavoring to account for the
appearance
of the stranger at this untimely hour,
when a sudden and startling knock on the
outer
door diffused a general thrill throughout the
company. Susan started up hastily, and seizing
a mantle from the chair beside her, stood
resolutely
,
as if prepared for any emergency.
Where are you going? said her cousin in
surprise.
To take up my abode with christian people,
for the night, if indeed there are any such in the
vicinity. No, Alice, you need not urge me,
continued the young lady with a flush of
indignant
spirit, I would not stay in this house
another
hour, even if you would tie around my neck
that golden charm which gives you so much
courage. Do you see, she added in a whisper
to Mrs. Ramsay, how that strange being's eye
flashes at the very name of a charm.
Are you not going to the door, Mrs.
Ramsay
?
continued Alice, without replying to her
cousin, for at that moment another loud and
rapid
knock intimated the impatience of those
without.
Not I, ma'am, replied the resolute dame,
gathering courage. Gentle or simple, they
must e'en wait till morningwe've queer
comers
enough for the night already. And she
cast a timid and suspicious glance upon the
stranger. At least, she added in an under
tone, if worse comes to worse, there's a kind
of people that can e'en come through the key
hole.
The stranger was evidently embarrassed, she
looked earnestly for a moment upon the young
ladies, upon each alternately, and seemed about
to speak; but a third knock, more violent than
either of the preceding, now rang through the
building.
It is a bitter night, Mrs. Ramsay, said Alice,
rising hastily and seizing a light from the shelf.
It would sound ill too, that a traveler had
perished
at the minister's door for want of a hand to
open it, and casting as she passed, a single and
earnest glance upon the dark eyed stranger, she
proceeded
through the narrow hall to the outer door
of the dwelling. After some little
embarrassment
,
the bar was at length removed, the key
turned, and the door thrown open.
For the love of mercy, exclaimed a tall and
closely muffled traveler, who stood knocking his
boots against the stones, in the extremity of his
impatience, but the words died quickly away;
and the next moment, the hand of Alice Weldon
was grasped in his, a tone of joyful greeting rung
in her ear, and he who had dared for her the deep,
and the dangers of a foreign clime, and the pride
and grandeur of a princely court, was standing
once more beside her.
And now do I claim my reward, cried
Henry
Davenport, as they entered the parlor together,
for Mrs. Ramsay and Susan had made good their
retreat; but the stranger still sat by the fire.
The condition, replied the young lady in a
low and agitated voice, her eye glancing upon
the stranger with a look of trembling interest.
A bright flush was kindling on that pale cheek,
and the wild and joyful meaning of that
beaming
eye was no longer a mystery. The next
moment, Alice Weldon lay folded in that lady's
arms, the warm tears of a mother's love were
on her cheek, the rich music of a mother's voice
fell on her ear; and dreams, and fears, and
wishes
,
were all faded in one bright reality. The
tale of mystery was soon unravelled; and though
the kindness which had sought to shield her
from the misfortunes of her family was not
unappreciated
,
a tide of deeper pleasure filled her
spirit, when she learned that he who had that
night folded her in a father's embrace, was
none other than the noble outcast, whose
story
of high devotion had so often kindled her
fancy.
Isabel Goffe had not in vain, sixteen years
since, summoned up the strength of woman's
courage, for a hopeless and almost desperate
effort. Her errand across the deep had not
been in vain. Long years had indeed been
wasted in the silence of her prison walls, until
the beautiful and smiling infant whose memory
had gladened its loneliness, could scarcely be
recognized
,
even by a mother's eye, in the elegant
11*
and graceful being who now hung over her. But
it was not in vain. The eloquence of the wife and
daughter at last prevailed even at the foot of the
English throne; and she now came with an
assurance
of secret pardon to the sorrowing exiles.
Was it then too late? Oh noit was a moment
worth ages of the heartless existence of many whom
the world call happy, when the heroic Isabel
kneeled that night in the lone chamber of
death. And a nobler and costlier legacy than
the gold of Peru, was in those words of blessing,
with which the tried spirit of her father, at last
burst away free and happy to its home in heaven.
Three months after these occurrences, the
beautiful house and grounds of the deceased Mrs.
Wilmot, were purchased by an English
gentleman
of fortune, recently arrived in the colony of
New-Haven. Walter Goldsmith, (for such was
the name of the new comer,) was a man of
commanding
person and manners, much esteemed
among the inhabitants for his benevolence, the
high and pure morality of his life, and more than
all for those strong principles of holiness, which
evidently formed the springs of his existence. He
was however reserved, and somewhat unsocial in
his habits, and seemed almost exclusively devoted
to the happiness of an extremely amiable and
beautiful wife, who had accompanied him to his
new residence.
Little was known, among the colonists, of the
former condition of the emigrants. They were
supposed, however, to have been in some way
connected with the deceased Mrs. Wilmot, as
her favorite niece resided wholly in their family.
Alice Weldon indeed addressed them by the
endearing
appellations of parents, and certainly
there are few stronger attachments than that
which was here mutually exhibited. It was also
noticed by some, that there was a striking
similarity
of person between Miss Weldon and her
beautiful adopted mother. The mystery however
was never duly investigated; the extreme reserve
of Mrs. Goldsmith's manners on this and many
other subjects, prevented those communications
which might have been desired.
Henry Davenport obtained, the ensuing
autumn
,
the hand of the lovely Miss Weldon; but
as her new guardians refused to be separated from
the object of their affection, he concluded, at
their earnest solicitation, to establish himself
beneath
the same roof.
It was not until many years after, when at the
close of a long and happy life, Walter Goldsmith
was laid by the grave of the regicide, and only
the simple initials, W. G. appeared on the rude
tombstone which marked his resting place, that a
secret report prevailed through the village, that
he was other than he had seemed, and that the
name of Goldsmith had long concealed among
them the family of the devoted and high souled
Goffe.
THE FAIR PILGRIM
THE
FAIR PILGRIM.
CHAPTER I.
As lovely a morning as ever rose on the
loveliness
of an English village, was tinging, with its
rosy light, the cottages and magnificent turrets
that adorned the valley of D. Doubtless,
to some, the appellation of village suggests
only the picture of one of those smiling groups
of human dwellings, which adorn our American
landscapes,nothing, however, could differ more
widely from the present scene. Not only the castle,
the chapel, and the shady park appeared in their
ancient grandeur, as the monuments of
aristocratic
pride and power; but for miles around the
humble cottages of the villagers, nay, even their
inhabitants were nearly all only so many
appendages
to the dignity of the one noble family,
whose residence graced the vale. Among the
few houses which appeared to maintain an
independent existence, there was one, which,
from the neatness of its structure, and the
beauty of the surrounding grounds, was well
fitted to excite attention. It was situated at
a considerable distance from the castle, in the
midst of a beautiful coppice. Behind it rose
a high, wooded bank, and the verdure which
enameled the turf in the shady walk, was every
where enriched and deepened by the meanderings
of a brook, whose blue wave, here and there,
gleamed up from among the trees. Every
circumstance
which renders rural life beautiful,
seemed here to exist in delightful combination.
Nature's melody was not wanting. The voices
of birds were uttered low and sweet from the
boughs, the bleating of lambs on the hill, the
notes of a thousand bright insects, and the
murmurs
of the little brook, all came on the ear in
rich and mingled music. The house was of wood,
large and neatly painted; but the ivy which had
crept over the porch, and the moss which had
here and there overgrown the sloping roof, gave
it a venerable air.
The windows of one of the front apartments
were thrown open, and amid the grateful coolness
which pervaded it, several elderly men of dignified
and respectable appearance sat eagerly
conversing
together.
Sir Richard, did you mention aught to the
king concerning the charter? said one who
leaned
upon the window seat.
The subject, replied the baronet, was but
slightly touched upon. I deemed it impolitic to
urge the matter as yet, for I saw that the
impious
Laud, that most cruel enemy of the
Puritans
,
watched my steps. But Strafford is on our
side. He cares not whether we die or prosper,
so he doth but gain gold and honor for himself.
He hath promised me that he will favor our
petitition
,
when a fitting opportunity presents.
Meanwhile
,
my brethren, continued the baronet, let
us render thanksgiving that this great and
difficult
undertaking of ours, doth seem so nearly
accomplished
.
The proprietary grant hath been
easily and firmly secured. The ships are
prepared
for departure, and as far as our resources
have allowed, fitted out with all things needful
for so perilous a journey. All that remaineth is
that you, my brethren, do gird on your spiritual
armor and go forth to your work.
The silence which succeeded this declaration
remained for some time uninterrupted. The
emotions it had excited were too deep for words,
and each spirit seemed quietly searching its own
mysterious depths, for those treasures of strength,
and that holiness of purpose, which their noble
enterprise demanded.
It is time, then, that the day of departure
should be appointed, said one after some minutes
silence.
Three days from this, if it seems fitting to
you all, replied Sir Richard Saltonstall. What
say you, Endicott?
It is well, Sir Richard. Our plans admit of
little delay; but, Wilson, he added, turning to
the gentleman by the window, can your
scattered
flock so soon be gathered together?
They are all at this moment, apprised of a
speedy departure, and are, I doubt not, ready for
the summons. And yet not all, he continued
hesitatingly, One tender lamb of the fold is as
yet ignorant of our purpose.
And why? exclaimed the baronet, in
surprise
.
When the Father of mercies hath
opened
so clear and glorious a path for his people,
why should man presume to veil its light?
Reverend Sir, you say the lamb is a tender one,
will you leave it to the ravening wolves that are
now spoiling God's heritage?
Sir Richard, replied the clergyman calmly,
she of whom I speak, hath stronger ties than we
to bind her here. As for us, our wives and our
children are going with us; but she must leave
kindred as well as home. She must come forth
not from the shadows of the Presbyterian faith, but
from amid the clouds and darkness of this
pompous
hierarchy. Sir Richard, I know that the
lady serves God in purity of spirit, and her heart
is with his people, but she hath been bred amid
the splendor and luxury of a magnificent home,
and the first spring flower is not more frail and
delicate. And you will better comprehend my
meaning, when I tell you that the lady Eveline,
the daughter of the noble Earl who dwells in
yonder
castle, is the one of whom I speak.
There was an expression of universal surprise
as the clergyman said these words. But,
Wilson
,
exclaimed Sir Richard, the Earl, her father,
is the friend of our arch enemy, the bigoted and
persecuting primate. Doth he permit his
daughter
the indulgence of her religious principles?
I fear not, replied the clergyman, shaking
his head sorrowfully. The lady is compelled to
join in rites and ceremonies which her soul
abhors
,
and I have often heard her long for the green
pastures, and still waters, where none might make
her afraid.
And yet, said Endicott, reproachfully, you
refused to lead her beside them. My brother,
you have done what to my feeble vision seems
wrong. You should have told the lady your
12
purpose, and the God whom she hath chosen,
would have been her counselor.
I have perhaps been too much guided by
my own wisdom, replied the pastor, and God
may choose to prove it foolishness. Brethren,
do you counsel me, even now, to apprise the lady
of our departure?
We do, we do, exclaimed several voices at
once. Heaven will point to her the path in
which she should go?
Then, continued Mr. Wilson, I will this
moment forward a message which shall convey to
her the necessary intelligence. Sir Richard, you
know the lady well. Will you not yourself indite
the epistle? and he arranged on the table before
him the materials for writing.
But, replied Saltonstall, is there any one
beneath your roof, who would venture to place it
in the hand of the Lady Eveline? The task,
methinks
would be an extremely difficult one.
It would, Sir Richard. Nevertheless I will
seek to provide you with a messenger. There is
but one to whom I could trust the embassy,
and as he spoke the clergyman left the
apartment
.
Just as the baronet had completed his task, a
graceful girl with a sweet and modest
countenance
,
opened the door, and approached with a
sort of hesitating air the table by which he wrote.
A loose scarf was thrown over her neat and
simple
dress, and a bonnet in part concealed her
features. She blushed, and paused a moment.
My father told me, sir, you had a message to
one of the ladies of the castle. Shall I carry it
thither?
Sir Richard was folding the letter, and he
cast on her a benignant glance. Ellen Wilson,
you are kind in offering to perform this duty.
But have you ever seen the noble sisters of the
castle? For remember, you must place the note
in the lady Eveline's own hand.
I once saw them both, replied Ellen, it is
two years since, but I can remember them at this
moment as though it were but yesterday. They
had lost themselves in a ramble on our hill, and
I led them through the coppice. But the lady
Eveline was much taller than her sister, and her
tone and look were both so different from the
other's, I am sure I could not mistake her even
now.
And do not return, my child, said Sir
Richard
,
as he placed the letter in her hand, until
the lady hath read the epistle, for she will
doubtless
give you her reply.
The heart of Ellen Wilson beat with an
unwonted
violence, as after a long and pleasant
walk, she found herself standing within the
enclosure
which surrounded the castle. Though
her whole life had been past within half an hour's
walk of the place, she had never but once before
ventured within these noble domains, and that
was in her early childhood. The mother of the
noble sisters, who had now long slept in the tomb,
was then a young and beautiful matron; and the
affectionate kiss which she had here imprinted on
the cheek of the little wanderer, was at this
moment
distinctly remembered. But other and
more agitating reflections, soon presented
themselves
.
Aside from the appalling grandeur of the
place, and the high rank of those upon whom she
was about to intrude, the heart of the simple girl
was awed with the recollection of her errand, and
its probable effects.
She had come to invite the daughter of that
proud Earl, openly to renounce the faith of her
father, her rank, her home, and all that she held
dear, and to become a pilgrim to a distant
wilderness
.
But it was no time for faultering purposes;
and the heart of Ellen Wilson had lately been
taught to lay aside, together with the indulgence
of earthly hope, that fear which bringeth a snare,
and after requesting of the porter who opened the
inner gate, permission to speak with the lady
Eveline, she soon found herself traversing with
haste, the immense halls of the castle. These
were furnished in a style of ancient and costly
magnificence, and she could scarce refrain from
pausing to return the gaze of the fine pictured
countenances, which now in rapid succession met
her eye. At last the servant paused, and throwing
open the door of a splendid apartment bade her
enter.
A hasty glance assured her that she was not yet
in the presence of the noble inhabitants of the
castle, and the servant, after informing her that
he would immediately communicate to the lady
Eveline her request, left the room through a door
which commucicated with a still larger apartment.
For the moment which it remained open, she had
caught a glimpse of several forms within, and
the sound of their voices at the same time met
her ear. In a few moments, the servant again
appeared.
The lady is at this time engaged. Her
brother
and the Marquis of Bhave just returned
from London, and she is now in their presence.
In less than an hour, he added, she may be
ready to see you. You can wait for her in this
apartment.
The condition seemed so slight in comparison
with an entire denial, that Ellen concluded
without
hesitation to accept of it. Just as the servant
had again left the room, a sound of near voices
caused her to raise her eye, and she perceived
with surprise, that the door from which he had
last entered, still remained partly open. A
distinct
view of the persons within, at once presented
itself.
The lofty walls were adorned with the richest
tapestry which ancient art could produce.
Immense
mirrors, superb sofas and tables, the rich
damask curtains, all burst with the imposing grace
of novelty upon her bewildered eye, and even the
pure light of heaven itself seemed to have caught
a strange voluptuousness, as it stole in rosy beams
through the richly colored glass.
An elderly man whom Ellen at once recognised
as the proprietor of this noble dwelling, was near
one of the windows. On the same sofa sat a
young cavalier gaily and fashionably dressed, and
another still whom she knew to be the young heir
of D, was pacing the floor.
But objects of far higher interest than these,
soon met her eye. Seated on a low sofa in a
distant part of the room, the two beautiful ladies
of the castle appeared, engaged in that branch of
needle-work which was then deemed a meet
occupation
,
for females of high rank and fortune.
They were both apparently very young and from
any thing in their appearance, it would have
been difficult to have determined which was the
elder. One was taller and fairer than the other,
and as her head bent over the embroidery frame,
12*
the bright brown hair, parted away from behind,
fell curling beautifully over the snowy arch of her
long and graceful neck. There was a fresh bloom
on the cheek of both the maidens, but that on the
countenance of the taller was not so vivid as the
other's, and her lip too had a pale and rosy hue
in comparison with the full bright coral of her
sister's, and in her eye, and on her brow, and
over her whole mien, there were the marks of an
unfettered and noble spirit, which Ellen knew to
be none other than the lady Eveline's.
The voice of the Earl now caught her attention.
Any more news, at court, my son? The
puriritans
how
prosper they? Hath our worthy
prelate
given any new proofs of zeal against these
heretics?
No, but Charles has given new proofs of his
folly, replied the youth hastily. It is rumored
that to the most hypocritical and ranting set of
them all, he is about to convey a charter
transferring
the powers of government from the Grand
Council of Plymouth to the colonists themselves.
What colonists, what mean you, George?
rejoined the Earl with a look of impatient
surprise
.
Do you speak of the Plymouth colony?
No, my Lord, replied the young Marquis,
he refers to a more extensive scheme of folly
which Sir Richard Saltonsall has lately
projected
.
It seems that the honest puritans are at
length wearied of the good offices of the
Archbishop
,
and intend making their escape to
America
,
to join their Plymouth brethren. Saltonstall
has lately purchased a large tract of the Grand
Council and is about to despatch thither a fresh
cargo of hypocrites.
And why, rejoined the Earl angrily, is the
Duke of Lenox so desirous of establishing this
hated religion in the very heart of his
possessions
?
One would think the colony already
there, enough to give a godly savor to the land.
Ah, replied the young nobleman I believe
the council are quite in despair concerning their
great territories, and willing to part with them
as they best can, but continued he, my Lord
you need not fear their increase. You could not
have placed them in a better place. If all tales
are true, the bears and Indians will soon cool their
enthusiasm. I fancy the Archbishop himself
could never have found a more effectual method.
You say truly, replied the Earl with
bitterness
.
A better place could not have been
found for them; and when you have dealt as
long with these stubborn rebels as myself, you
will not need to be told that the more they are
persecuted, the more they flourish.
And may not this, my father, indicate the
goodness of their cause? said the lady Eveline,
as she raised her flushed countenance from her
work.
A thousand pardons, my blessed little
puritan
,
exclaimed her brother, hastily approaching
her. I certainly forgot your presence. And
you, my Lord, he continued turning to the
young nobleman, come and kneel, as you
value
the lady's favor.
A frown of displeasure at the same time
gathered
on the countenance of the Earl. A young
female who is wiser than all her relatives, is
surely
an object worthy of admiration; but, Eveline,
why not place the climax to your devotion by
joining this pious pilgrimage?
And if I should, replied the lady calmly,
I should only exhibit a far less noble example
of devotedness, than did those holy females who
are already enduring the hardships of the
wilderness
.
But surely, Lady Eveline, said the Marquis,
you do not mean to say that you favor the
opinions of the Puritans?
Even more; replied the lady while a pale
blush suffused her countenance, I have made
their opinions my own.
And it is a part of your religion, I presume,
exclaimed her father angrily, to disgrace those
who have the misfortune to be connected with
you, by the avowal of your creed.
The indignant glow of a proud spirit for a
moment colored the lady's cheek, but there
was evidently some controlling principle within,
which forbade the indulgence of earthly
passions
;
for ere she had essayed to reply to her
father's words, the flush was gone, and instead of
it a smile of heavenly sweetness, such as became
a follower of the lowly in heart. I cannot,
my father, indeed, I cannot refuse a portion
of the obloquy which rests upon my religion.
Would it not be ungenerous, for me to deny my
principles, because I feared the disgrace
attached
to them?
I admire the Lady Eveline's spirit,
exclaimed
the young Marquis with animation. I deem
it unfair, my Lord, to quarrel with any religion
whose precepts distil upon us in such gentle
glances and from such lips as just now pleaded
for the puritans. I fear I shall become a puritan
myself, if I linger long in this fair presence. Say
George, is it not dangerous?
Disturb me not, said the youth, in a tone of
affected pathos, as he stood with his eyes fixed
upon the lady, I am even now painting to
myself
the form of the fair devotee wandering about
among the caves and mountains of the new world.
But, my beloved sister thou must lay aside the
needle from those small and lily hands of thine,
for to my best knowledge the heroines of
America
do wield the hoe instead thereof, and thou
must doff that costly robe, simple and plain
though it be, did not the martyrs of old wander
forth in sheep skins, and goat skins? And that
coronal of pearls, that shines so brightly among
thy tresses, it is not good. Do we not hear of
the holy women of old, how they sought to adorn
themselves not with gold and pearls and costly
array
Would to heaven, George, exclaimed the
lady interrupting him, that I had instead
thereof
the ornament of a meek and quiet spirit, and
then again repressing the bright crimson which
mantled her cheek, she bent her head over the
frame to conceal the tear of wounded feeling.
But there appeared to Ellen something
peculiarly
touching in the idea which the young
nobleman
had expressed in such tones of irony.
There was a frailty, an exquisite delicacy in the
form and features of the noble girl and an air of
elegance in her simple and costly attire, which
seemed all unmeet for the trials which she
doubted
not would soon be her portion.
The Lady Julia had, till now, borne no part
in this agitating conversation; but on catching
a sudden glimpse of her sister's moistened eye, a
look of tenderness lighted her countenance. I
pray you forgive us, my noble brother, she
exclaimed
,
looking coldly upon the young Lord,
if we do not duly admire your costly politeness.
My sister and myself have lived much in
retirement
of late, and scarce know how to appreciate
the lofty polish which the court of Charles has
given you. I pray you forgive us. The
beautiful
lip of the young lady curled with an
expression
of disdain and after speaking a moment to
her sister in a low voice, they rose together and
left the apartment.
There was silence for several moments, after
the door had closed upon them, and when at
length it was interrupted by the Earl; the voice
was so low that Ellen could scarcely distinguish
his words. She was just indulging in a feeling
of secret impatience, when the sound of a light
tread caught her ear, and turning, she beheld
approaching
from a distant door, the tall, light
figure
of the Lady Eveline. She came close to the
blushing girl and her tone was low and sweet.
I was told that you waited to speak with me,
young maiden. Am I mistaken? But if it is
aught of a private nature, she added, casting
a sudden glance at the open door, while Ellen
hastened to present the letter, this is no
fitting
place for it. Will you come with me?
Ellen rose, and after following the footsteps of
the young lady through a long suite of
apartments
,
they stood at last in an elegant reading
room, the favorite resort of the young Eveline.
And now you may speak freely, she said, as
she placed her chair by the side of a small
mahogany
table at the same time seating herself
near her, I believe I know you already. Are
you not Ellen Wilsonthe same who once gave
us such a fine ramble in the coppice?
Ellen replied in the affirmative, and placed the
letter of Sir Richard in her hand. The lady
unfolded
it, and glanced slowly over its contents.
But as she proceeded, a new and sudden light
seemed to kindle in her blue eye, the paleness of
her brow extended itself over the whole
countenance
.
And when, at length, she slowly folded
it again with an appearance of assumed
composure
so colorless was her lip and cheek, that
Ellen
feared each moment to see her fall fainting
from her chair. But still the paper remained in
her hand, and she seemed pressing its folds with
greater exactness. Madam, the news which
this letter conveys are sudden and strange. It
has come upon me unawares. My faith is weak,
and I dreamed not that it would so soon be put
to the test. Three days from this, if I read aright,
the pilgrims set sail. The time is shorttoo
short for all I have to do. I fear, Ellen Wilson,
I cannot so soon give up all I love.
You need not, dear lady, said Ellen, in a
timid voice, He whom you have not long loved
better than all others, will still be with you.
Lady Eveline is not his grace sufficient for you?
Surely, Ellen, your father is of the
puritans
,
replied the lady gazing with admiration
upon her fresh and smiling countenance. And
you are going forth to danger and suffering with
a cheerful spirit. Oh that I also might have
grace to do the will of my heavenly Father
joyfully
.
There was an expression of agony on the pale
face of the noble maiden, and Ellen dared not
witness that fearful conflict of feeling. Lady,
she said, God himself will make you know your
duty. Methinks it cannot be his will that you
should thus abandon your home and kindred.
There was still another pause, and then the
lady
rose. Ellen Wilson, come to me again
to-morrow
evening at sunset, and I will tell you my
decision. Ellen felt the pressure of her hand
in parting, it was cold and moist, and trembled
violently; she could scarcely refrain from tears,
as she followed the servant through the long and
splendid apartments, and remembered the agony
of their beautiful mistress.
CHAPTER II.
Their dauntless hearts no meteor led
In terror o'er the ocean,
From fortune and from fame they fled
To heaven and its devotion.
The
alarming paleness which the countenance
of the Lady Eveline exhibited during the
remainder
of the day, was a subject of much remark in
the castle; and the bitterness with which the
young Marquis reproached her brother for his
unkind
jesting, showed that his interest in the lady's
peace was of a peculiar nature. What rendered
her melancholy still more touching, was an
apparent
and studied effort on her part to appear
with her usual cheerfulness.
On the afternoon of the second day, the lady
after having with much difficulty escaped from
the gay company below, appeared pacing with a
quick and agitated step the floor of that lofty
gallery
which terminated in the sleeping apartment
of the sisters. The time which had been
appointed
for making known her decision was
almost
arrived, and as yet nothing but a succession
of dark and agonized feelings had crossed her
mindan indistinct impression of stern duty
urging her to the renunciation of every earthly
hope. But she felt that it was wrongit was
not what the mighty decision before her
demanded
;
13
and she now entered her apartment and
closed the door with a firm resolution that she
would calmly and dispassionately listen to the
still small voice of truth, and come no more out,
until she had fully resolved whether the earth was
henceforth to be to her a wilderness, and the
voice of sister, kindred, and the home of her
childhood, with all the hopes of a gay and
beautiful
imagination, were henceforth to be to her but
as remembered dreams. The lady felt that her soul
was weakened with the pressure of sorrow, and
she sought for a portion of the undying energy of
Him who fainteth not, neither is weary. And
was it for her to withold from God the influence
of her high name, was it for her, in the pride of
human greatness, to turn away from Him who now
spake as it were from heaven, demanding the
example
of her faith, her exertions and her whole
life for the honor of his despised and afflicted
church, whose name was a reproach among her
people? And was it for her on whom the deep
vow was resting, to live not for herself nor for
the few fleeting days of time, but for the vast,
shadowless and immortal existence beyond,was
it for her to cling with fond affection around the
elegances and endearments of her home?that
home too where her religion was a by-word and
whose strong influences were hourly urging her
from heaven and holiness?
The prayer had not been vainly said, and amid
weeping and untold agony, the beautiful lady of
D at last resolved to give up all for God.
And now a light burst in upon her spirit, calm and
peaceful as the light of heaven. She thought of
her sister, her beloved Julia, dearer to her than
her own soul, her motherless sister; she thought
and painful exertions, still her soul was comforted
with the thought of her last glorious rest in
heaven
.
The long vista of futurity seemed open
before
her, and with a kindling eye she trod the
apartment, till the might and grandeur of earth
had passed away, and the lofty halls of her
fathers
crumbled with years, and the ivy and the
moss had mantled their ruins, and she beheld a
free and glorious nation bright with the light of
heaven's own truth, planted by the exertions of
that pilgrim band, who now, amid weakness and
sorrow and fear, were about to traverse the deep.
Surely a low grave among them on that
distant
shore, was far more noble than a resting
place in the tombs of her ancestors.
The light of the setting sun was already
straying
through the crimson curtains, when the
Lady
Eveline remembered her request to Ellen
Wilson
,
and determining to go forth and meet her
in the avenue, she hastened to prepare herself
for her walk. She had already crossed the
gallery
,
and was descending the superb staircase
which led to the outer hall, when a glimpse of
the young Marquis leaning thoughtfully against
the entrance arrested her steps. She wished to
avoid him, but it was too late. He had caught
a view of her, and now demanded the privilege
of accompanying her in her walk. The lady was
embarrassed, she could not refuse, and they
descended
together through the winding avenue
which led from the castle.
You are surely well again, my Lady, said the
Marquis, glancing with surprise on her
countenance
now lighted up with a glow and brightness
altogether unusual. There were still traces of
tears on her cheek, her eye beamed with the
fervor of intense feeling, and a smile of that
peace which the world cannot give played on
her lip.
Here was an object which of all others,
human
love clings to most tenderly, and the
impassioned
words which the young nobleman
uttered
,
showed that his heart confessed its power.
The lady had desired earnestly that this bitter
trial might be spared her; for it was too true
that there had been moments, when she had
dreamed, even in this very avenue, of giving
her young heart with all its affections to him who
now so earnestly solicited it, and beautiful had
the long life before her seemed, when she had
thought of devoting it to his happiness. But this
was all over. She knew that he was in heart a
hater of the puritans and a despiser of their faith,
and that however his young affection for her
might now soften his feelings of contempt for her
religion, such affection was but a broken reed to
lean uponall was overand now some other love
must brighten the grandeur of his princely home.
She had told the Marquis of this, with a noble
firmness; and they were leaning silently upon
the gate, watching the brilliant and fading
hues of the western clouds, when the form of
Ellen Wilson approaching the remote
extremity
of the avenue drew their attention. Her eye
was fixed upon them and she seemed in doubt
whether to approach.
Yonder girl has a message for me, my Lord,
exclaimed Eveline, opening the gate, I must
leave you for a moment to receive her errand.
What message shall I bear to my father's
house? said Ellen as the lady approached her,
13*
there are many there, anxiously awaiting your
decision.
Say that I will go with them, replied the
lady, calmly. Ellen, at what hour do we leave
the valley?
At eleven, my lady, and at two we sail. The
moon will be bright, and ere the morning dawns,
we shall have gone far on our long way. And
my father bade me tell you also, that if you had
aught to carry with you, it must this evening be
conveyed to the ship. If you will send it to the
cottage, Lady, it shall be safely done.
It is wellit is well, repeated Eveline, with
quickness, endeavoring to subdue some painful
emotions. At eleven, Ellen, I will be in your
father's cottage. Is there aught else?
Nothing, replied Ellen, but she turned a
moment with a glistening eye, only dear lady,
God will bless those who love him, better than
father, and sister, and houses, and lands, and I
know
you
will be blessed when you have forsaken
them all for his sake.
The ties of christian love are strong; and the
high born lady bent to kiss the lip of one, who
was henceforth to be her sister, and the
companion
of her pilgrimage.
The Marquis still waited for her at the gate;
and after pursuing their walk a little farther on
the lawn, they returned to the castle. Eveline
immediately retired to her dressing room for the
purpose of making the necessary preparation for
her voyage. This was quickly done. From the
mass of rich dresses which her wardrobe
contained
,
a box of her simplest clothing was soon
selected
;
and this, with another containing a few
choice books and letters, a small portrait of her
mother and sister, and a casket of costly gems,
the gift of her father, and of themselves
sufficient
to purchase the supply of her future wants,
was all that this noble heiress chose for her
portion
,
from the boundless wealth of her father.
After
this painful duty was accomplished, she
directed
a servant to convey them to the cottage at
the foot of the coppice, and in a few moments
after, she descended to the sitting-room below.
The Lady Julia was this evening splendidly
dressed, and to the eye of her sister she had
never looked more lovely, her voice too thrilled
with affection's music, and every tone seemed to
bury itself in her spirit. Her father and brother
were there, and unkind though they had often
been, the heart of the Lady Eveline was not one
in which such ties could be lightly severed, and
every time she met their glance, or heard their
voices addressing her, a tear would involuntarily
tremble in her eye, that she whom they looked
upon as daughter and sister, would soon be to
them as a forgotten exile.
The gay Marquis appeared this evening
strangely melancholy; and when at length the
young ladies arose to retire, he accompained
them to the door. A hasty summons from a
distant
estate had just arrived, and as he was to leave
the castle early the ensuing morning, he availed
himself of this opportunity to bid them adieu.
The Lady Julia's compliments were uttered in
that easy and graceful manner which the
slightness
of the occasion seemed to demand; but her
sister, for a moment, appeared singularly
embarrassed
.
Her cheek at once became deadly
pale and then the blood mounting suddenly, gave
it so rosy a tinge, that Julia gazed upon her in
surprise
.
Sister, shall we go? she said, gently
drawing her away.
Farewell, Lady Eveline, exclaimed the
Marquis
.
Ah! that farewell, he dreamed not that
it was forever.
But the door was closed. Eveline felt they
were to meet no more on earth, and she was now
almost unconsciously traversing the hall with her
sister's arm in hers.
The following morning was spent by the Lady
Eveline in the solitude of her reading room. She
was principally engaged in writing an
affectionate
letter to her father, in which she prayed for
the continuance of his affection, his forgiveness
and blessing, when she should be far away on her
lonely exile, and another of exquisite tenderness,
addressed to her sister, in which she laid open to
her all her sorrows, and told her of the stern
conflict
of duty and feeling; and besought her by
all the tenderness of their early love to
remember
her until death. The letters were both
moistened
with many tears, ere they were consigned
to their temporary concealment.
The day stole rapidly away, like the other days
of earth; noontide, sunset, and the fading
twilight
were all gone, and now amid the shadows
of the starry evening, the moon was just lifting her
unclouded light. As it first began to gleam
through the windows of the castle, the Lady
Eveline was slowly walking along the wide
gallery
,
while her sister still lingered a moment in the
dressing room, to complete the arrangement of
her toilet. Far different were their reflections.
When that light which now fell from the lofty
windows of the gallery upon the form of Eveline
should fade away in the grey beams of morning,
oh where would she be then? The thoughts
that overpowered her heart were too bitter for
endurance, and she hastily approached the door
of the dressing room.
Dear Julia are you not ready yet? Methinks
you are long.
I cannot help it, Eveline, replied the other
in a half vexed and half sportive tone, I have
been lecturing this awkward curl these fifteen
minutes, and it will not mind me. See how
ungracefully
it falls! And do you know there is a
great deal of company below this evening, and
the young French Count that George has told us
so much of? There, Eveline, does it look
better
?
and as she spoke she held the lamp to her
face and turned full upon her sister.
You look well, very well, replied Eveline,
almost unconscious of what she said, while she
gazed upon the countenance of the lovely young
lady. Yes, you look very, very beautiful,
continued
her sister, gazing wildly upon her.
So then you are laughing at me, replied
Julia, blushing and placing the lamp again on
the dressing table. I shall never ask you again,
if I am becomingly dressed.
No, no, thought Eveline,
never
.
But, sister, upon my word no one can accuse you
of vanity, continued the young lady. I do not
believe you have looked in your mirror since
morning. A plain white dress, not a single
ornament
,
and your long curls all in your neck with
nothing to confine them. And yet, Eveline, that
Puritan dress is so becoming, I will not go one
step until you are remodeled, lest the Count should
say I had stolen your gems in very spite. Nay,
no resistance. Sit down upon this sofa, and let
me see if I cannot spoil that lookwhat did the
Marquis call it, Eveline? Oh, `simplicity, sweet
simplicity. '
You speak foolishly, Julia, replied the lady,
while her sister prepared to fulfil her threats
It matters little now what robes I wear
Ah, Eveline, taste, and heart and all gone?
If I remember aright, they have been missing since
morning. It looks a little suspicious of that young
Marquis, sister. She paused a moment, but
Eveline
had no heart to reply.
There, that blue sash is quite becoming, Lady
Eveline, I have tied it behind in a true lover's
knot, and these curls begin to look extremely
graceful beneath my magic touch. And not the
least symptom of a bracelet, she continued with
increased vivacity. One would suppose you
were dressed for a fine night's slumber, instead
of the drawing room. But do not look so sad
about it, you may wear these amethysts of mine.
Now, my lady, look in the glass, she added
taking her hand, and pay the compliments due
to my skill and taste.
It is beautiful, very beautiful, repeated
Eveline
,
her thoughts still dwelling on the bitterness
of her approaching destiny.
You are in the complimentary mood this
evening
,
my grave sister, but come, we must hasten
down. We have waited too long already. And
arm-in-arm they now moved quickly through the
gallery and were soon standing in the brilliantly
illuminated drawing room.
All seemed in fine spirits, save the Lady
Eveline
,
and if she was sad, it was not for want of
attempts
at cheerfulness. Her gay brother,
notwithstanding
,
rallied her much upon her
mournful
visage, but as the evening advanced and her
paleness every moment increased, he became
alarmed, and Eveline soon saw him directing her
father's eye to her, from a distant part of the
room. The Earl instantly approached.
You look ill, daughter, he said to her. Do
not weary yourself by sitting here. Indeed,
Eveline
,
he added, in a tone of unwonted feeling,
I fear you are much indisposed.
Oh, no, replied the lady, with a sudden
effort
,
I am quite well. George will tell you I
have been laughing with him all the evening. But
my walk this afternoon, was long and I am
unusually
fatigued.
Then, replied the Earl, you must retire to
your own apartment and stay till you can come
forth with a fresh bloom. Do not wait for
ceremony
,
he added, I will excuse your absence.
Good night, daughter.
The lady looked silently up, for a moment, on
her father's countenance, as if with that one glance
she was seeking to stamp it forever on her
memory
;Good
night, my father, good night, she
repeated in a low and solemn voice, and she
seemed waiting for the parting kiss, as she had
been wont to do in her childhood. For a
moment
her father's lip met her's, it was for the last
time, and a thrill of strange anguish rushed through
her frame.
George was standing by the door as she passed.
There, Eveline, am I not a dear and precious
brother, to procure your banishment from the
parlor
in such season?
Oh, yes, George, said the lady interrupting
him, in a tone of thrilling emphasis, you
are
dear and precious. She would have said more,
but her voice trembled, the gay smile faded from
her lip; her brother's hand rested a moment in
hers, and there beamed from her countenance
such a look of sorrow and holy tenderness, as
long years had not power to efface from the
memory
of the youth.
Just as the door was closing, Lady Evelin
caught a glimpse of her sister. She was sitting
in a distant recess, conversing gaily amid a group
of admirers. Her whole countenance was bright
with gladness, and a keener pang pierced the
heart of her sister, as the door closed upon this
last best object of her earthly affection.
It was nearly ten when the Lady reached her
apartment. One short hour was all that
remained
,one
hour more and the places which knew
her now, would know her no more. She leaned
her head upon her pillowthe firm restraint which
had hitherto borne down her feelings, now gave
way, and the lady wept bitterly. Suddenly she
felt a light arm flung around her. Dear sister,
why do you weep? said the gentle tones of the
Lady Julia, as she gazed with surprise upon her
tearful countenance.
Oh, Julia, my heart is broken, I cannot bear
it, indeed I cannot,and she leaned her pale,
wet cheek on her sister's shoulder.
And why, exclaimed the lovely girl, as she
pressed her lip affectionately to hers. Why will
you not tell me your sorrows? Have I ever
refused
you my sympathy?Once, indeed, when I
thought you enthusiastic and bewildered with the
doctrines of the Puritans, I blamed youbut
surely that can have no connection with your
present sorrows.
There was something in her last words which
aroused the lady from her reverie; she now rose
calmly from her sister's arms, and throwing back
the curls from her pale forehead, endeavored, with
a smile beautifully serene, to conceal the agony
of her spirit. Oh, deeply was that image written
on the heart of the sister, when months and years
rolled on and she saw her no more.
Julia, excuse my weaknessmy spirits are
low to-nightmy heart throbs painfully. I need
repose, dear sister.
But, Eveline, you look extremely pale. Let
me call my father.
No, sister, do not concern yourself, replied
the lady,I thank you for your kindness, Julia,
for
all
your kindness, and she turned to the
dressing
table to conceal her emotion.
In less than half an hour, the younger sister lay
asleep on her pillow, but Eveline still slowly
paced the apartment. She was clad in a habit of
dark, rich velvet, and the fanciful dress and
ornaments
she had that evening worn, together with
her sister's, and many other gay articles of
apparel
were lying on the sofas around her.
The taper threw a feeble gleam on the various
objects of the room; the last echo of retiring steps
had ceased, and there was a stillness throughout
the castle. With a trembling step she
approached
,
to take one last farewell of the beloved sleeper.
The warm tear which dropped on the cheek of
the dreaming girl for a moment aroused her.
Eveline, is it you? she murmured, why do
you wait so long? Then again closing her eye,
she turned her face upon the pillow, and the lady
saw her no more.
Ellen Wilson was standing at the foot of the
avenue, when she beheld in the distance the form
14
of the Lady Eveline, coming forth for the last
time from the halls of her fathers. There was
something deeply affecting in the sight of such
devotedness in one so young; and Ellen could
not but weep. But there was no tear on the
lady's cheek. The bitterness of the sacrifice was
past; her step was firm, her eye bright, and her
brow calm with the fervency of devotion. Once
indeed, when they had reached the boundary of
her father's domain, the lady turnedshe leaned
a moment on the wall and gazed for the last time
on the loved scenes of her early years. The
venerable castle, long avenue, and the shady park,
were lying in the solemn moonlight. For an
instant
,
her eye lingered on the high window where
the light was still burning in the Lady Julia's
apartment; and then again they walked swiftly
onward.
Ellen Wilson was also of the Pilgrims, and as
her feet pressed the soft grass of the beautiful
coppice, where she had played in childhood, her
heart knew its own bitterness.
Lights were moving swiftly through the cottage,
and the lady soon found herself seated in the midst
of that stern and sorrowful band whose kindness
was henceforth to be to her instead of the strong
ties of earthly love.
All was now ready. Carriages were waiting
at the door. But they lingered a moment longer.
The heads of the Pilgrims were bowed in prayer.
Little children with golden curls, and hoary age,
youth and manhood kneeled together; and their
mingled spirits, and the warm blood of their slain
affections, ascended to heaven in grateful
oblation
.
All that they asked was granted. Dauntless
courage, unwavering fortitude, love to God and
man, and hopes full of immortality, fell on them
like the dew of heaven.
The lady was soon seated in a closed carriage
by the side of Ellen Wilson, and she gazed with a
tearless eye from the window, till her native
valley
,
and its lofty turrets had quite faded in the
distance
,
and ere the bell had tolled through the
castle
the second hour of the morning, she was
standing
far away on the deck of the vessel which was
soon to bear her to her destined home.
CHAPTER III.
Hail to the land of our toils and our sorrows!
Land of our rest! when a few more to-morrows
Pass o'er our heads, we will seek our cold pillow,
And rest in our graves, far away o'er the billow.
When
the joyful sound of Landland in
sight, was echoed in the ear of the wearied
voyagers
,
the Lady Eveline was sitting in her cabin
engaged in those refined and elevating studies,
which during her voyage she had found means to
prosecute. Ellen was seated on a low stool,
beside
her, busily occupied with her needle, and
from time to time her eye glanced on an open
book which lay in the chair before her. There
were many other females present, but as the cabin
was large, it allowed them to scatter themselves
in various groups, as best suited their tastes.
Do you hear it, my Lady? said Ellen,
throwing
down her work, and gazing earnestly on her.
Was it not land they cried?
They listened again, there was no mistake.
The loud huzza for land, echoed in the hoarse
voices of the sailors above them, and Ellen, with
many of the females, immediately hastened upon
deck. The former, however, soon returned with
a look of much disappointment, assuring her
friend that the object of their curiosity was only
visible through a glass and on the top of the mast.
This was nothing more than the lady had expected;
and had it been otherwise, she found that without
some preparation of heart, she could not even
now look unmoved upon the land of her voluntary
exile.
It was midnight, when the ships conveying the
Pilgrims approached the shore of their destination.
Ellen Wilson and her noble friend were standing
together on the deck, gazing silently before them
as they slowly neared the rock-bound coast. The
deck was crowded with Pilgrims, all looking
eagerly forward to catch a glimpse of their future
home. The dim light of the stars only, illumined
the scene; and even this was in part obscured, by
a few cold and broken clouds, that swept
cheerlessly
across the heavens. Nothing could be
discerned
but a faint outline of forest, rock and vale;
and the awful gloom which seemed to rest upon
them, the noise of the sailors, shouting and
running
to and fro, and the damp midnight breeze
which moaned over the wave, all sent an icy chill
through the hearts of that gazing band. How
often amid the silence of midnight had this
long expected vision arisen before their sight.
Was it still a dream? Oh, no, the warmth of
fancy
was gone, and over it all, there was a touch of
cold reality which fancy never brings. If there
had been enthusiasm, it was over now; if the
coloring of an ardent imagination had ever been
thrown over their enterprise, it all faded as they
leaned forward, and gazed on that dim shore, and
remembered that this dismal forest was now their
only home, and the cold blue heaven their only
covering. If tears dropped on the wave, it was not
strange; for some were thinking of the quiet and
loveliness of the pleasant firesides, far away over
the ocean; and some were there, whose dearest
14*
kindred were at this moment sleeping in princely
halls, and who had been wont to rest beside
them.
The destination of the present colony was at a
considerable distance above the rock upon which
the first Pilgrims had landed, and was on many
accounts a far more eligible situation. It was
styled by the natives Naumeak; and when the
Pilgrims again looked upon it, in the pleasant
light of morning, there were no murmurs, nay, the
voice of praise was heard, that the lines had
fallen to them in such pleasant places.
After much preliminary business had been
arranged
,
about noon on the second day after their
arrival, the whole body of the emigrants prepared
to go on shore. The Lady Eveline leaned on the
arm of Ellen, as this strange procession moved
away through the untrodden paths of the forest.
During the preceding day a party had been
despatched
to reconnoitre the place, and having
selected
as a spot for settlement a small clearing
near the shore, they now acted as guides to the
remainder. A large temporary shelter had been
hastily thrown up of broken boughs and trees
which had been cut down for the purpose, and a
party of the settlers were soon employed in
conveying
thither the articles of furniture they had
brought with them from England. All was now
joyful bustle and confusion. Many of the females,
with the gentle assiduity of their sex, were busy
in the interior of their new dwelling, seeking,
notwithstanding
their various disadvantages, to give
it a cheerful appearance. Meanwhile another
party had arrived from the ship, with tools and
materials for building; and in a few moments the
noise of the axe and hammer resounded on all
sides through the forest.
There was something strangely animating in
their toil. The Pilgrim females stood around for
a while, gazing upon it with anxious silence, while
the sportive voices of childhood rang through the
wood, and even the babes themselves lifted up
their meek brows from their mother's arms,
gazing
on the strange scene with smiles.
Under such auspices, it was not long ere a rude
village had risen instead of the waving forest.
A sanctuary for Him whom they had come over
the waves to worship in freedom of spirit, was
reared in the midst of their dwellings. Pleasant
indeed to the souls of the wearied Pilgrims, was
the light of their first New-England sabbath.
They could now fearlessly worship the Father of
spirits, in spirit and in truth; and as the voice of
prayer rose to heaven, from the depths of that
solemn forest, with no voice to childe, and no ear
to hear but the ear of a forgiving God, as the
rocks and vales which till now had listened only
to the hymn of the morning stars, echoed with
the loud sweet song of praise, and their souls
drank freely of that well of living water, of which
if a man drink he is athirst no more,they felt that
they had not vainly abandoned all. And could
the worshipers in the proud cathedrals of Old
England, have glanced on that band, they would
have read on many a meek and beautiful brow,
and in the warm flush that lighted even the cheek
of manhood, the records of a devotion no less
lofty than their own.
The rude huts, which on their landing had
been hastily erected, were only considered as
temporary habitations. Each family soon made
efforts to provide its own dwelling place; and as
many of the colonists had possessed wealth in
England, some were able to do it in a style of
simple and becoming neatness; and the lovely
village of Salem with its pleasant church and
cottages
and cultivated fields, ere long had risen in
the bosom of the forest,so that, literally, in the
beautiful words of sacred promise, The
wilderness
had begun to blossom as the rose.
A pleasant room in the dwelling of Mr. Wilson,
had been fitted up for the accommodation of the
Lady Eveline. Ellen had planted beneath the
window a rose bush from the forest, and a vine
of wild honeysuckle crept over the wall.
Precious
indeed to Ellen was the happiness of that
noble lady who had come with her across the
deep, whom from her earliest childhood she had
regarded with that indefinite veneration inspired
by high birth, and who now, in the new and
endearing relations she sustained to her, was at
once the object of her love and admiration.
But as for the lady herself, she seemed well to
have learned that bitter lesson, which the sorrows
of her youth had inculcated;her affections no
longer rested on the things of earth. Their
strong tendrils had been too cruelly torn, to
fasten
on aught beneath the skies; and all that did
not still linger on the remembered and cherished
forms of her kindred far away over the ocean,
now bloomed in heaven.
Not that the lady regarded with indifference
the holy companions of her pilgrimage; she loved
them tenderly as the sharers of her toils and
sorrows
on earth, and as those whom she hoped
would share her long reward, when these toils
and sorrows were over. But there was none of
that strong clinging of natural affection, which
had marked the days of her wealth and splendor.
There was no singling out of objects for deep
attachment
.
She was contented to love them all,
as children of the same heavenly Father. And
the lady was not unhappy. Long hours of calm
and pure enjoyment, were often her portion amid
the silence of her own apartment. Often as she
sat by her pleasant window, and gazed upon the
beautiful land around her, the near ocean, and
the bright skies above, such moments of holy
feeling, such exquisite conceptions of the purity
and tenderness of heavenly love were granted
her, that her soul seemed almost to participate
in the blessedness of that land, where the rivers
of pleasure flow unmingled. The events of her
life had been fitted to purify and elevate her
affections
;
and she felt that one moment of this
holy enjoyment was more than sufficient to reward
her for her painful sacrifice.
But the days of darkness were many. Famine,
disease, and death, came often to the cottages of
the Puritans, and sometimes their hearts failed
them and the path seemed too thorny for man to
tread. It was in such seasons that the tender
exertions
of the Lady Eveline were peculiarly
useful
.
Her unwavering self-denial, her tenderness
and condescension, had won the hearts of the
colonists; and this influence, so nobly acquired,
was exerted only to relieve the afflicted, and
comfort
those that mourned.
The second year after their landing, a large
accession of emigrants arrived from England.
They brought with them a charter, which after
much solicitation had been obtained from Charles,
transferring the powers of government into the
hands of the colonists themselves. One of the
ships also conveyed their first officers who were
appointed by the crown. In consequence of this,
their numbers during the succeeding summer
were greatly increased, and the emigrants at length
became so numerous that it was deemed advisable
for a large portion of them to settle themselves
at a place, called by the natives Shawmut, but
now well known as the site of a flourishing city.
And now approached the season of their severest
trial.
During the ensuing winter a dreadful mortality
prevailed among the colonists. Hunger,
weariness
,
and sickness they had borne unmurmuring;
but here was death in all its bitterness. Fathers
and mothers died; babes and children were laid
in the grave, while the bloom of life was scarce
cold on their young faces; the warm dreams of
youth were quenched in the stillness of the long
sleep; and many a voice, like the voice in Rama,
arose from among the Puritan cottages. Few
escaped the power of the raging sickness, and
every day the fresh turf of the burial ground rose
on some new made grave.
It was now that the religion which had softened
the heart of the Lady Eveline, was revealed in its
most touching light. The natural delicacy of her
frame, seemed all to have vanished. While the
strong lay prostrate with disease and death, fresh
energies seemed given to her; with a light
unwearied
step, she moved by the couches of the
dying and the dead; and days of anxiety and
nights of sleepless watching, wasted not the bloom
of her countenance. The pillow of many a dying
child was softened by her attentions, and when
the mother had turned away in the depths of her
agony, the cold hand of the little sufferer rested
in hers; and her kind and gentle assiduities were
continued till the calm smile of death had settled
on its features. Her pure and elevated piety
gave her also unwonted access to the souls of the
bereaved, for her words were low and soothing,
and all of heaven, and of the blessedness of a land,
where sickness and death might not come, and
sorrow and sighing should flee away.
The long winter at length rolled by, and with it
the heavy calamities which had visited the colony.
Ships from England gladdened the hearts of the
wearied exiles; and as the pure spring air danced
freshly over the earth, it seemed to endue them
with health and vigor.
But there was one, to whom the spring in all its
freshness, bore no promise of future years. Slowly
and surely the frost of death was descending on
the brow of the young and beautiful. She who
had watched so tenderly by the couches of the
dying, was now herself to die; she who had so
often directed others to heaven, was now herself
to enjoy its blessedness. But the disease was
deep, and its secret work impaired not, at all, the
loveliness of the frail flower it was destroying.
To one who might have gazed, for a moment only,
on the lady, thoughts of decay and death would
have seemed strangely inappropriate. None of
her usual avocations were neglected. At
morning
and evening she was still seen taking her
accustomed
walk along the shady paths of the
village
,
or through her favorite forest walks, her
visits of kindness and sisterly love were still
continued
,
and those who passed the pleasant
dwelling
of the pastor, might still observe her light
form through the honey-suckles, or see her
rambling
with Ellen in the little green enclosure.
But they who watched her daily, with that
intense
anxiety which the love of earthly objects so
surely brings with it, felt too truly that though
death was coming on forms of strange loveliness,
he had none the less surely marked his victim.
They saw that every day her step became slower,
her form more light and airy, and her low, thrilling
voice, yet more low and thrilling. They saw too
that whenever she spoke, her eye wore an
unwonted
brilliancy; and instead of the pale damask,
a color all too deep and bright for earth, mantled
her cheek.
The lady herself felt that she must die; and
though at some moments, the sudden recollection
of this firm conviction, would bring the rich
crimson
to her lip, in general the thought was peace.
She knew that she had not lived in vain. The
principles of holiness implanted in her soul, had
long been developed in high and holy action; and
though the love of heaven was her only hope,
these recollections were now inexpressibly sweet,
as evidences that this love had sanctified her
affections
.
Upon the first conviction that death
was approaching, the Lady Eveline had addressed
letters to her friends in England, informing them
of her illness, and repeating her solemn farewell,
till she should meet them again in the world of
spirits.
It was Juneand a beautiful sabbath
afternoon
.
For some days past, the lady had been
confined entirely to her own apartment; and
now, supported by Ellen Wilson, she walked
from her bed to a seat by the open window, to
catch the fresh breeze that was springing up from
the ocean. Exhausted even with this slight
exertion
,
she leaned her head a moment on Ellen's
shoulder. The only contrast to the marble
whiteness
of her countenance was in the hue of the
long eyelash that now lay in such deep repose on
her cheek. The rich coloring of life seemed
gone forever. Her cap had fallen carelessly back,
and the breeze played lightly among the long
and beautiful hair it released. Ellen had
supported
her head with pillows; and now stood
beside
her, gently fanning her brow, and gazing
with intense grief on the altered hue of her
features
.
You are too ill, dear Lady, to sit up thus, do
not attempt it to-day, she exclaimed, as the
invalid
at length slowly opened her eye.
I am better now, my kind Ellen, replied the
lady. I will sit here awhile, for I long to look
out once more on the green and freshness of
earth. Oh, how fervently have I loved it. I
cannot
go away from this world forever without one
last look; and as she spoke, she leaned gently
forward to gaze on the beautiful prospect.
A more quiet and lovely scene has seldom met
the eye. Perfect, sabbath stillness hung over
the cottages around; and far beyond stretched
the rocky shore, and the wave of the Atlantic.
It was the hour of afternoon service and the
inhabitants
were now all assembled in the house of
God. This was near them, and as they leaned
upon the window, the loud hymn of praise rose in
rich swells on the air.
Oh, Ellen, hear that holy music! murmured
the lady faintly. I could almost dream that the
airs of heaven already played on my ear. Surely
there was never so lovely a sabbath before; or,
15
Ellen, is it because the earth grows beautiful, as
it fades from my sight?
She paused a moment, and some pleasant
recollection
seemed to flit across her mind. The
grass in the coppice, Ellen, must be green ere
this, she suddenly exclaimed,and the shady
avenue. Oh, for a walk in that avenue to-day.
Ellen was surprised. The lady had hardly
ever spoken of her former enjoyments, since the
period of their landing; but now all restraint
seemed over.
Ellen, look over that blue wave, and far
beyond
,
she continued. You can see nothing
and yet I have looked there, hour after hour, till
my eye has pierced the dreadful distance, and the
lovely valley, the castle, and the park, were all
before it; nay, I roamed through the halls of my
ancestors, and I heard the voices of those who
were dearer to me than life. But, Ellen, it is
over now, my eye is dim, and the pleasant land,
far away over the ocean, will rise no more to it,
and the lady wept.
But you have long had grace from heaven, to
strengthen you in suffering. Oh, my Lady, will
it fail you in your need?'
But to die, Ellen, far away from my kindred,
unremembered and unblestmy soul cannot
endure
it. There is music and dancing in my
father's
hall, my own Julia smiles gaily, my
brother's
laugh rings through the castle as joyfully
as ever, and evenshe paused a moment and
a rich color tinged her cheek,and I, whom
they all once loved, am dying, alone, on this
distant
shore.
Ellen perceived that the unusual emotion which
the lady now exhibited, was fast exhausting her
strength, and she was intreating her to retire
again to her couch, when the appearance of a
ship entering the harbor, arrested her attention.
Though this had of late become a less rare
occurrence
than formerly, still the sight of these
messengers from the land of their nativity
possessed
strong fascinations for the eyes of the
pilgrims
,
and Ellen now parted away the clustering
vine, and leaned forward to watch the landing.
The eye of the lady was also directed to the same
point, and now and then a few brief remarks
indicated
her interest in the scene. The deck was
apparently well crowded with passengers, and so
near was the harbor, that they could even
distinguish
their figures as they walked separately across
the plank which had been thrown over, to
facilitate
their landing.
Ah, Lady Eveline, those are not all pilgrims,
believe me, exclaimed Ellen, as a richly dressed
group, one by one, passed over. That lady's
robe is all too gay, and her step too proud, and
those young cavaliers that are over now, and
walking with her, they are no pilgrims, my
Lady.
At that moment a slight noise caused her to
turn her head, and she perceived with alarm that
the lady had fallen, fainting, on her pillow.
Oh, help me to my couch, Ellen, for I am sick
and weary, she murmured, as her eye slowly
reopened; and when her pale face at length
rested
quietly on its pillow, Ellen saw that she was to
rise no more a living being. A deathlike
slumber
soon sealed her eye again, and they who were
hovering around her couch, almost feared it was
death itself. Long and sorrowfully did Ellen
watch by her noble friend, until at last a deep
hectic began to brighten on her cheek, her lip
burned with a living glow, and when her eye
again opened, it shone with an unnatural and
dazzling brilliancy.
Oh, where is Julia? she said, gazing
unconsciously
around her. I have long been sick and
sorrowful, and she has not come to me, my sister,
my own beloved sister, where are you? and she
looked wildly upon Ellen. Nay, Ellen Wilson,
do not tell me that I am dying far over the ocean,
among the pilgrims. It was all a dream, a long
strange dream. Is not this my own apartment,
and is not this the pillow that the Lady Julia
sleeps on?and these lofty walls, and those rich
curtains and hangings, do these belong to the
puritan cottage? She smiled and shook her
head. NonoI saw none such in my dream.
Ah, Julia, you have come at last, she continued
after a few moment's pause, regarding Ellen.
Now lay your soft hand on my aching brow, it
seems ages since I felt it last.
Ellen gently laid her hand on her forehead.
Ellen Wilson, do not mock me, she
exclaimed
after a moment's pause. Your touch is light
and gentle, but it is not like the touch of a
sister's
hand. Once more, Julia, she added in a
tone of indescribable tenderness, once more,
only for one moment, I pray you come to me.
Oh, she will not come, I have intreated and
prayed
,
and she
will
not come, and again the dying
lady wept.
It was sunset, and the yellow light reflected
from without, had given a rich and mellow tinge
to the objects of the apartment. The lady's eye
had long been closed, but she had not slumbered.
Strange visions flitted across her mind. She had
heard many a light tread by her bedside, sweet
tones repeated her name low in her ear, warm
tears dropped on her cheek, soft lips met hers,
and faint thoughts of the bliss of other years
came over her like traces of faded dreams.
At last her eye opened. The small fair hand
that lay on the quilt was loaded with gems.
Slowly she raised her glance to the bedside. Ah,
whose was that beautiful and glistening eye that
now met hers? Was it still a deceitful vision?
She gazed slowly around. All illusion vanished.
She was lying in her own humble apartment, in
the cottage of the minister. The window by
which she had leaned a few hours since, was still
open. There was her little book case, her
writing
table, and the cup of roses on it, just as
Ellen
had gathered them in the morning. Ellen
too was standing at the foot of her couch
Her glance again turned to the pillow. It was
no vision. That eye was still on hers. There
was a quick and searching glance, one wild burst
of ecstasy, and the long parted sisters were
folded in each other's embrace. They who had
separated amid the splendor of the far distant
castle, were again united in a lowly cottage
beyond
the ocean.
Eveline, my blessed sister! say that you will
part no more from me. I have come over the
wide waters to see you. Eveline, do not call for
me again so mournfully. You are not indeed
forgotten
;
all that have ever loved you, love you as
tenderly now. Dear sister, this is no place for
one like you to languish and die; you shall go
back with us to our father's house, and we will all
love and cherish you.
15*
The lady calmly gazed upon the fresh and
blooming countenance of her sister. Nono,
Julia, she replied, I shall go no more hence,
till I go to my long home, my bright home in
heaven. Do not weep, dear sister, that I am
dying
,
for my heavenly Father hath at last made
death lovely, even to me.
Do not think of dying, Eveline, replied the
lady, with a shudder. Now that fearful
slumber
is off, your eye is bright, and your cheek far
more rosy than when I saw you last. Oh, Eveline,
you
must
not die.
At that moment Ellen approached from the
door.
They have desired to know if they may see
the Lady Eveline, she whispered in the ear of
the sister. I have told them that we thought
her dying.
Julia regarded her with a look of agony. Look
at that beautiful color on her cheek, she
whispered
,
you are surely dreaming.
Ellen shook her head mournfully. I have
known it long, my Lady, it is only the hectic
flush. Does she sleep? and she bent her head
a moment to the pillow.
No, dear Ellen, murmured the lady faintly.
Of whom were you speaking?
Eveline, said her sister, in a voice almost
choked with emotion, I came not alone to see
you, some whom you once loved, are now
in the next apartment; but you are
wearied
;
shall they wait till morning? For a
moment
strange energy seemed given to her frame,
her voice was strong, and she almost raised
herself
from her pillow.
Speak not of to-morrow, Julia, those whom
I would see again on earth, I must see
now
.
There was one over the wave whom my
unweaned
affections have strangely clung to, and
At this moment the door gently opened, and
the forms of her dearly remembered brother,
and of him who had long ago loved her, arrested
her eye.
The soul of the dying Eveline, was now at
peace. Earth's visions were indeed over; but
the tones of human love were still sweet to her
ear. In one short hour from the time when she
had deemed herself a forgotten exile, the forms
of brother, and sister, and friend, surrounded
her couch, and her dying moments were cheered
and sweetened, with the kindest endearments of
earthly affection.
For a few moments, she spoke with earnestness,
and told them of the strong depths of her
affection
for them, and prayed them to bear her dying
blessing to her father. Of heaven, too, she spoke,
and of the beauty and holiness of that religion
she had so honored, and besought them by the
strength of the love which had led them over the
deep, to meet her in that world. And just as her
beloved Ellen had bent to kiss her brow, while
she breathed the assurances of her grateful
affection
,
and her eye was yet bright with feeling, the
eye closed, the voice ceased, and something like
a beautiful and placid sleep, settled on her
features
.
The spirit was in heaven, and they who
had come so far to bear the lady to her princely
home, soon bore her in sorrow to her long resting
place, among the tombs of the
Pilgrims
.
CASTINE
CASTINE.
CHAPTER I.
Saturday
night and Lucy not yet returned,
exclaimed the minister of H, in a severe and
impatient tone, as he lingered at the open door
of his dwelling. The sun was down, but a few
clouds still glowed in the red and beautiful light,
and the little valley beneath, the sweet village of
Hwith its fields and gardens, was still
beautiful
in the last flush of brightness. Yet to the
dwellers in that quiet vale, the weekly season of
care and toil was already past, the sacredness of
the sabbath had come upon them, amid the
gathering
shadows of the early twilight.
The minister still leaned in the door, looking
anxiously down the silent streets, while the dusk
of evening was advancing, and the lights began
to gleam through the village. Methinks our
daughter is becoming wayward and careless of
late, he continued as he closed the door, with a
displeased countenance, and turned again into
the parlor.
Mrs. Everett was at that moment placing a
lamp upon the stand, beside the bible and hymn
book that already adorned it. At this last remark
of her husband, she raised her mild blue eye to
his countenance, with an expression of some
surprise
.
Our daughter went to tarry a few hours
with her friend Jane, so at least she told me, and
I have not been wont to doubt her word.
But why does she linger so long? interrupted
Mr. Everett. The sun went down an hour ago,
and what will the congregation say, when the
minister's daughter profanes holy time? And
Sarah, he added, lowering his voice and bending
his eye with a mysterious expression on the
countenance
of Mrs. Everett, I bode no good for the
child herself at this hour.
True, true, exclaimed the mother, rising up
hastily, while her countenance kindled with an
indescribable expression of maternal anxiety.
I had for once forgotten the Indians
Nono, Sarah, it is not the Indians I fear,
but a more deadly enemy. Have you not noticed
how, from the time the young stranger from the
north first came among us, our Lucy's heart hath
been going after other things than her parents on
earth, and her Father in heaven? It hath
pressed
upon me long, that there is one whom she
loves better than these. Nay, Sarah, he
continued
,
why look at me thus, have you yourself
seen nothing of this?
Never, replied the mother. Lucy has
never breathed to me aught of the young
Canadian
,
and even when every one else is inquiring
into the cause of his mysterious appearance and
his protracted visit, I have noticed that she has
been silent. But if she has given you her
confidence
,
surely you ought not to have withheld it
from her mother.
Lucy has told me nothing, replied the
clergyman
,
but I have watched her closely; and
when day after day, as she sits with us, and her
eye is on her needle, I have read her countenance,
I have seen that her soul was full of visionsnot
the calm visions of the better land, but warm,
unhallowed
dreams of earth. I have seen her eye
kindle, and her lip tremble with smiles and even
unconscious whispers; and if I did but ask her of
her thoughts, such a deep and sudden blush would
come over her face, as a pious and free hearted
maiden need never wear. And I have seen it too,
Sarah, even in the house of God; her eye has a
fixed
and vacant gaze, which shows that her heart
is not there, and when the Canadian comes up the
aisle her face grows flushed, even though she sees
him not.
Mr. Everett, exclaimed the mother with
unwonted
animation, you do indeed wrong our
beloved
Lucy. Little as I know of the schemes and
devices of the great world without, I can at least
read that one gentle spirit, whose every motive
and feeling I have so long studied. I know that
my Lucy's heart is a shrine of pure and elevated
affections
Then so much the more carefully should we
guard them, Sarah; she has a wild and romantic
fancy, that may lead these affections astray.
There is something too, in the mien and look of
the elegant stranger, singularly attractive even to
me.
And is it strange, that one who has been
reared
amid the simple retirement of this little
village
,
should not regard with feelings of perfect
indifference the accomplished stranger whom you
yourself admire?
No, Sarahit is not strangebut wrong.
Would it not be wrong for the daughter of a
Puritan
minister, to give away her heart's best
affections
to a stranger, and a Papist? I know the
slightest breath will kindle the enthusiasm of a
young heart like hers; and do you trust to the
strength of her love for us, and for the pure
religion
in which she has been educated? Sarah,
Sarah, you have too soon forgotten Lucy
McGregor
.
Mrs. Everett started as though some sudden
light had flashed on her mind, and the
clergyman
continued to pace the floor in evident
agitation
.
I do not say, he continued, after a
few moments silence, that, even were she put
to the trial, our beloved child would ever
forsake
us, to become the wife of a superstitious
and bigoted Catholic. I cannot believe she
would thus break our hearts; but, Sarah, years
of grief taught me that it was a bitter thing,
to throw away, on some hopeless object, the
strong ties of early love. I know you think
me suspicious; but I have had cruel lessons,
and he of whom we speak, doth strangely
remind
me of one whom once we both too well
knew.
At that moment the little latch of the gate
without was heard to fall. Good evening,
sir, said a low, subdued voice, and presently
after the door of the parlor opened, and the
minister's daughter stood before her parents.
There was something in her appearance well
fitted to strengthen those apprehensions, which
had just agitated the heart of the father;
something
,
aside from that extreme beauty, which
in a world like this, must ever excite anxiety
16
for its possessor. She had closed the door, and
stood for a moment leaning against it, like one
overcome with some painful exertion. A flush
appeared on her countenance, brighter than the
mere tint of health and beauty, and though her
eye was downcast, there was visible some deeply
excited feeling, seeking to conceal itself beneath
an air of indifference.
Is this well, Lucy Everett?Is it well? said
the clergyman, seating himself at the table, and
assuming an expression of sternness, as he gazed
on the countenance of his beautiful child. There
was no reply.
Come hither my child, said Mrs. Everett,
where have you been, and why have you tarried
so long? Lucy approached the table, the flush
deepened on her countenance, and she raised her
hand before her large, dark eyes, apparently for
the purpose of shading them from the sudden
light. You know, mother, I have been with
Jane this afternoon, she said in a tone of
affected
carelessness, and I was not aware that it was
so late. She still stood by the table.
But, Lucy, you are surely not going out again,
continued Mrs. Everett. Take off your bonnet,
and come and sit down with us. We have waited
for you already.
The young lady hastened to obey her mother;
and then drawing her chair to the table near her,
she leaned her head upon her hand, so that her
features were entirely concealed from Mr. Everett
by the dark ringlets that fell over them, and at
the same time taking up the little hymn book,
she opened it and began to read in silence.
Lucy, my dear, you may close the book,
said Mr. Everett, after a few moments silence.
I have a few simple questions to be answered.
The book was closed, but the countenance of
the young lady was still inclined towards the
table.
Lucy, with whom have you spent your whole
time since you left our dwelling?
I have spent the afternoon with Jane Grant,
sir, as I have before assured you,replied the
maiden.
And was it Jane Grant who accompanied you
to the gate? said her father, bending his face
towards hers. There was no reply. Lucy,
he continued, raising his voice and speaking with
much earnestness, they who walk with you at
this late hour, must be no strangers to me. I
must know why you have lingered so long abroad,
profaning the sacredness of holy time in
unhallowed
ramblings.
The sun was far above the hill, sir, when I
left the village, but I came by the forest path;
and it was later than I had imagined it would be
when I left the valley.
Ah, Lucy, but you came not alone. Would
you deceive me? The anguish evinced by the
father as he uttered these words, seemed only to
increase the agitation of the daughter; for a few
moments she covered her face with her hands,
while tear after tear moistened her cheek.
My father, she at length said, raising her eye,
and assuming an appearance of calmness, he
who came with me through the forest path this
evening, was the young Catholic stranger. Her
voice trembled, and she paused.
And how long, said Mr. Everett, with a
forced
calmness, since this Papist youth has been
the chosen companion of your walks?
An expression of unwonted pride curled the lip
of Lucy Everett. By accident, sir, I found
myself this evening intrusted with the life of
this strangerand Papist though he is, I
rejoice
that no pride, or foolish delicacy prevented
me from fulfilling my duty. My father, I have
not been wont to deceive you, but more I cannot
and must not tell you, for I promised, as I myself
hope for kindness, that I would not.
Mr. Everett gazed on her countenance with
unfeigned
astonishment. He could not for a
moment
doubt her sincerity, and though every word
of her explanation had only deepened the
mystery
,
there was that in her countenance which
at once convinced him that further inquiries were
useless.
The next morning was the sabbath, and a more
beautiful one never dawned on the earth. The
dwelling of the minister was considerably remote
from the village, and just at the foot of a little
hill, covered with evergreen woods. In front,
the ground was gradually descending, and the
green slope was occasionally diversified with
neat houses and gardens. A distinct view could
also be had from the front window, of the church
spire in the valley below, and the small cluster of
houses surrounding it, which had received the
appellation of the village. It was May, the
air was exceedingly soft and fragrant, and Lucy
Everett had thrown open the window of the little
parlor, and stood leaning over the sash, gathering
a bunch of roses from the bush beneath. She
had just spread the damask treasure on the
window
seat, and was endeavoring to arrange them
in a graceful bouquet, when the sound of the first
bell came swelling in clear and solemn notes,
from the valley below. At that moment, Mrs.
Everett entered the room. Lucy perceived at
once that there was something unusual in the
manner of her mother. A deep shade of sadness
hung over her usually placid brow, and her eye
was moist with tears; but the daughter dared not
ask the cause of her disquietude, lest it should
lead to a recurrence of embarrassing inquiries.
Lucy was sitting in the window, and Mrs.
Everett
,
after taking from a locker near the door a
small and closely wrapped case of ivory,
approached
and seated herself beside her.
Covering
after covering was removed, she slowly
unclasped
the case, and at length Lucy perceived
that her mother was gazing with looks of intense
emotion, upon a small miniature picture. It was
set in gold and brilliants, and she felt her
curiosity
strongly excited concerning the object which
had power to awaken such agitating interest, in so
placid a spirit.
God forgive me, murmured the mother, with
a strong effort, at last subduing her feelings.
These idle tears do ill become the sacredness
of an hour like this. It was not to mourn for the
long perished flower of Glenville that I made this
effort but for the livingGod be praised, my own
Lucy Everett is yet among the living. My
daughter, you are opening again in our hearts,
wounds which long years have scarce had power
to heal, and much I fear, beginning to cast away
from your confidence, the counsellors whom God
hath given you. Child, child, you are standing
strong in the might of your own frail spirit, but
look you here, if one like this should fall, why
should Lucy Everett, standing on the same brink,
be fearless of evil?
16*
As she spoke, she placed the miniature before
the eye of her daughter, and every other feeling
was at once forgotten in admiration of its beauty.
It was the picture of a young maiden, apparently
not more than sixteen; and such a look of
sweetness
and innocence, Lucy felt she had never
before
beheld. The beautiful lips were parted with
smiles; and she met and returned the speaking
glance of that soft blue eye, till a living spirit
seemed before her, one that had known no
sorrow
and no sin, yet meek, and mild, and rich in
all the depths of human tenderness.
And so young and beautiful, exclaimed Lucy,
as with feelings of intense admiration she still
continued
to gaze upon it. Blessed spirit! Who
would dream that sorrow and death were your
destiny? and the warm tears of pity fell
unheeded
over the smiling features of the
picture
.
And why mourn, daughter, replied Mrs.
Everett, for the vain and fleeting beauty that
hath long since perished from the earth? Think
of the gem withinthe living imperishable spirit
that was dimmed and broken withinHer
voice faultered. It was only for a moment and
then in her usual calm, impressive tones, she
commenced her narrative.
Lucy Mc Gregor was the companion of my
early youth, and alas, the idol too, to which I
offered
up those affections of the soul that belong
alone to the Almighty. She was your father's
cousin, and but a child when I first saw and loved
her. At that period she came to her uncle's house
in England, an unprotected orphan, from the
Scottish hills. He received and cherished her
as his own child, and to your father she was ever
as a sister, only and well-belovedperhaps even
more. They were both bred together in the
doctrines
of the Puritans. Lucy McGregor had
been taught all those pure and sacred precepts,
which we have sought to instil into your mind
she was gentle and docile, and seemed to return
in full measure the love that was so freely lavished
upon her; but, Lucy, hear meshe whom we had
deemed so affectionate and pious, at last died an
alien from the church, and from those who had
loved her as their own souls.
An involuntary exclamation burst from the lip
of her auditress, but Mrs. Everett continued her
narrative.
Even from the period when she first came
among us, with the blue eye and golden hair of
her clime, Lucy was ever one that the world
called
beautiful. God had endowed her too with a
mind of noble powers, and with a rich and rare
gift of winning to herself the hearts of her fellow
creatures. Ah! `How did the gold become dim,
and the most fine gold changed!' Ere Lucy had
attained her nineteenth year, the noble family of
Cfirst took up their residence in our vicinity.
And from this period did we date the beginning
of that misery which afterwards overwhelmed our
hearts; for, daughter, mark mefrom this period
did our Lucy first delight in the company of the
unholy, the vain and proud ones of the world,
more than in the lowly and despised whom God
hath chosen out of the world; from this period
did she begin to contemn the restraints of her
pious home, the hedge with which God in mercy
had guarded the way of her youth. I cannot tell
you now how step by step this change was
wrought; indeed it had proceeded far, ere those
who of all others should have shared her
confidence
,
were at all aware of its existence. The
family of the castle had seen and admired her for
her beauty, and they were not long in learning,
that notwithstanding her present lowly lot, Lucy
McGregor was the daughter of an ancient
Scottish
clan, and that the name of many a renowned
chieftain graced her lineage.
Among the persons of distinction who visited
the castle, there came onea youth from a
foreign
land, whom Lucy regarded with deep
interest
;
mayhap such as Lucy Everett cherishes
for this unknown Catholic. To enter into any
particulars concerning him, would surely lead to
details and feelings unbefitting this holy day;
some hour less sacred I may tell you all. Suffice
it then, my daughter, that though of the blood
which men call noble, he of whom I speak was
of a light and profane spirit, and withal a proud
contemner of `the faith once delivered unto the
saints.'
Meanwhile we all saw, and mourned in secret,
that the orphan's heart was becoming estranged
from her early home, and the friends of her
childhood
.
Solitude was preferred to the company
she once held so dear; her joyful laugh was no
more heard among us; she seemed looking forth
to some brighter destiny than our love could give
her. The stranger at length sought her hand of
her uncle and guardian, and was refused; for,
Lucy, how think you could a minister of the true
faith, thus give up the child of his affections and
prayers, to a stranger and a Papist, high-born
though he was, and gifted in all worldly graces?
At length it was rumored through our
dwellings
,
that the castle was soon to be deserted of
its gay occupants, and we all rejoicedall save
Lucy. The day after their departure, I set out
once more for my wonted visit to the inhabitants
of a few poor hamlets, that lay at no great distance
from our village. It was nearly sunset ere my
return, and my path lay through an unfrequented
and solitary lane, it was therefore with surprise
that when arrived within a mile of our dwelling,
I perceived a lady in a rich traveling dress, rapidly
approaching me. She was closely veiled, and
yet there was something in her form and
movements
strangely familiar. `Lucy McGregor,' I
exclaimed, recognizing her with astonishment, as
trusting to her disguise she endeavored to pass
me unnoticed. I threw my arm around her and an
undefined foreboding of evil almost overpowered
me. My apprehensions indeed were not
without
reason. Upon the plea of illness, Lucy had
for some days past excused herself from the
company of her friends, and the excessive
paleness
of her face, as I drew the veil from it,
convinced me that her indisposition was not
feigned. But this only rendered the
circumstance
of her present appearance yet more
suspicious
.
I intreated her to return with me.
`Nono, Sarah,' she replied, with a strange
smile, `I cannot go backit is too late now.'
Unable to understand her, with a painful
oppression
at my heart, I walked by her side in
silence. At length, in some measure
suppressing
my feelings, I endeavored to speak of
the pleasure we should experience in
resuming
our excursions to the hamlet I had just
visited, for the vicinity of the many gay youth
at the castle, had for some time past
interrupted
them; but suddenly a long and agonizing
sigh, caused me to stop. She was leaning
against the stile, her face pale as the
snow-wreath
of her native hills, and there beamed
from it such an expression of indescribable
agony
,
as I trust these eyes may never again
witness
.
`It is too late nowtoo late,' she repeated
in the same despairing tones. `I am no
longer
Lucy McGregor. There was a pause,
and then came the fearful truth. She whom I
saw before me was the wife, yes the true and
plighted wife of the Catholic stranger. `But
I have loved you and my cousin, and my more
than father,' she continued, without regarding
my amazement, `how fervently I may not now
tell you, but I have been dazzledblinded and
deceivedthere is no more happiness for me.
And now on looking up, we perceived a
stately equipage coming down the hill before
us. Then did I intreat, and prayaye, on my
bended knees I besought her, by the love I had
borne her from our childhood, by her duty to the
friends that still lived, and by the tears and
prayers
of those who were already in heaven, not for
the sake of a few fleeting honors, thus to cast
away the blessing of Godbut it was in vain,
continued Mrs. Everett, wiping away the dew
which even the remembrance of that long past
agony had gathered on her brow. It was in
vain. One long, bitter farewell she wept upon
my neck, and I saw her no more. Three years
after this, Lucy Mc Gregor died among strangers
in a strange land, and the prayers of the
corrupted
priests were murmured over the departed
spirit of one, who from her infancy had been
nursed in the purity of the true religion. Many
years we mourned for her in bitterness of spirit,
and he who had been to her as a second father
died, and for her his grey hairs went down in
sorrow to the grave.
Mrs. Everett paused, and now the bell
sounding
again from the distant valley, announced the
hour of morning service.
CHAPTER II.
The
duties of the sabbath were over, and the
shades of twilight were softening the beauty of
the landscape, when Mrs. Everett and her
daughter
went forth, as they were wont to do of a
sabbath
evening, to walk a few moments among the
large old elms that shaded the path to the village.
They were both silent. Mrs. Everett's usually
gentle spirit had been deeply agitated both by
the task she had that morning imposed upon
herself
,
and by the mysterious conduct of her
daughter
;
and it was evident she had not yet recovered
her composure. Lucy herself was apparently
the subject of some stronger excitement than the
tale of Lucy McGregor alone could have aroused;
she had several times essayed to speak, but the
words died on her lips.
This is a lonely path at evening, she at
length remarked, as if seeking to draw the
conversation
to the subject of her late mysterious
conduct, but the observation failed of its effect.
The silence still continued. Mother, said
Lucy, with a sudden effort, I fear I have
appeared
to you an undutiful child. You would
not have told me the sorrowful story of Lucy
McGregor, had you not believed me in danger
of some strange offence. But you are mistaken.
I do not mean to say that I am more innocent
than was Lucy McGregor, she hesitated and
blushed deeply, but I have no temptation placed
before me, I mean none like those which led her
astray.
And yet, said Mrs. Everett, gazing full upon
her countenance, can you say that your feelings
are not at all interested in the stranger, who was
as you yourself acknowledge, the companion of
your walk last evening?
There was a short silence. No, mother, I
will not say it, I am deeply interested in this
youth, not merely because of the mystery that
hangs over his name and character. She added
with much earnestness, No, mother, it is because
his safety, nay, his life, has been placed by
accident
in my own hand.
Mrs. Everett paused in astonishment. Do
you speak only to tantalize my curiosity, Lucy,
or am I to look for some explanation of your
words?
To you, my dear mother, replied the young
lady, I can confide this secret. To my father
I have promised that I would not, even as I
valued the life of the stranger. You will not
betray it, mother, even to him?
Not if you have promised, Lucy, but methinks
you were exceedingly imprudent to make such
engagements. Do not, however, delay any longer
the explanation of this mystery.
You know then, mother, continued Lucy,
with a slight embarrassment in her manner,
Jane's home is situated so far out of the village,
that the path through the woods is almost as
direct
as this. I have always chosen it because it
17
is far more quiet and pleasant. I mean always
tillof late.
And why have you abandoned it of late? said
her mother.
Because I had reason to believe it was a
favorite
place of resort to the gentleman we were
speaking of. I had twice met him there, as I
supposed by accident, but Jane Grant soon after
found in our little bower a copy of French verses
which I knew he must have dropped, and I
cannot
think it was entirely accidental, for my own
name was upon them.
And what were they? said Mrs. Everett
hastily
.
Could you read them, Lucy?
I could, and I rejoiced for once that Jane
knew nothing of the language in which they were
written. The words were beautiful, but they
were not true, for they spoke of a being as sinless
and lovely as the angels of heaven, and gave to it
the name of a frail and erring mortal. Until last
evening, I have never since walked through the
woods.
And why did you then?
Jane was to accompany me part of the way,
and she insisted upon taking the forest path. I
dared not tell her my scruples, neither did I think
it at all probable that at this hour I should again
meet the stranger. Jane parted with me on the
chestnut knoll, and just as she was quite hidden
from sight among the trees, on turning my head
to the little arbor we had fitted up for our own
accommodation, I beheld the stranger himself
he was standing just in the edge of it. It was
the third time we had met precisely in the same
place. I would have turned, but I saw that his
eye was upon me, and knew myself to be just in
the center of the woods, so I moved on with a
quickened pace, without once averting my eye
from the path, until I had nearly reached the edge
of the thicket. Being exceedingly fatigued, I now
began to move slower, and it was well that I did.
For some time I had perceived before me a
singular
object lying a little on one side of the path.
As I drew near, my curiosity increased; and I
was turning aside a moment to satisfy it, when a
slight movement in the adjoining bushes arrested
my steps. Do you wonder, dear mother, that my
blood ran cold with horror, when I found myself
standing within a few feet of a sleeping Indian,
a warrior too, and armed with tomahawk and
arrows!
Mrs. Everett threw her arm around her child,
as if seeking to protect her from the threatened
danger. Why did you not tell me this before?
We must go home, Lucy, she coutinued, it is
no time to be walking now, and she drew her
daughter's arm in her's, as they moved hastily
towards
the gate of the cottage.
It was quite dark when they had reached the
porch, and it was not until Mrs. Everett had
closely
locked and barred the outer door, that Lucy
found opportunity to renew her narrative.
I was just hesitating what to do, she
continued
,
in reply to her mother's inquiries, when
the sound of distant voices met my ear. They
seemed rapidly approachingretreat was
impossible
;
if they were foes, my only security lay in
concealment. Mother, have you ever noticed the
hollow oak that stands to the right of the path,
just as you enter the valley of wild flowers?
Yesyes, go on, said Mrs. Everett with
impatience
.
It was only a few rods behind me, continued
Lucy, and I was soon concealed within it. The
voices had all the time been approaching, and
were now so near that I could distinctly
distinguish
their words; I was surprised too to perceive
that they spoke in French.
And who were they, Lucy, and what did they
say? inquired Mrs. Everett, whose interest in
the narrative had every moment increased.
Who they were, mother, I do not know,
replied
Lucy, but as to their words, I remember
them as distinctly as though I had but this moment
heard them.
Hertel de Rouville, said the first voice, he
is a noble and gallant youth; we should be well
convinced that he is a traitor, ere we come to
such desperate measures.
And what do you call noble and gallant?
exclaimed the other and rougher tone. If to
betray to the enemy the counsels of his party, is
noble, I grant you that he is so; if to fold up his
arms, and sit down in the camp of the foe, is
gallant
,
I grant you, he is a gallant youth.
But, De Rouville, continued the first voice,
what proof have you that he has betrayed our
counsels? I thought that Vandreuil himself
despatched
him to the enemy.
As a spy, not as a traitor, replied the other.
His orders were to go from one end of
New-England
to the other, to seek its weak and
defenceless
points of attack, to reconnoitre its strong
places, and see where the ambushed foe might
best hide themselves; and Vandreuil is informed
that he lingers here to obtain an opportunity of
opening our plans to the governor. At all events,
he continued in a lower tone, Vandreuil assures
me that a little of this same gallant's blood will
contribute materially to the betterment of our
cause, that is, if secretly drawn; and Hertel de
Rouville is not the man who hesitates at his
bidding
.
But if you have any scruples, Beaumont,
he added, with a tone of half suppressed
laughter
,
we will call on the old Penobscot priests for
absolution.
The other voice now became so low that I
could scarcely distinguish the words, but I soon
perceived that they were speaking of the sleeping
Indian.
No, Beaumont, do not arouse him yet, said
the rougher voice. Wait till the victim is in
sight, he will only trouble us. I know that he is
in the forest; and, I believe, in this vicinity.
Unless
he is previously alarmed, he will undoubtedly
pass this spot.
I heard no more for several moments, and
ventured carefully to peep from my concealment.
By the twilight, I saw two military figures
reposing
on the ground, near the Indian. Happily their
faces were from me, and unless my tread aroused
them, I yet hoped to escape. At length I found
myself at such a distance, that the shadowing
branches hid me from their sight. I paused a
moment, and considered what to do. One
single
,
foolish moment, I remembered that the youth
was a Catholic and a stranger, and I a Puritan
maiden; but soon came better feelings, and I
shuddered when I thought of the blood of one so
young and unoffending, poured out by the
merciless
Indian. I resolved to warn him of his
danger
.
Mother, was it wrong?
No, my child. It was such a deed as became
17*
a christian woman. And where did you find the
youth?
Near the spot where I had left him. He was
stretched on the bank by the arbor, in a kind of
careless repose; and was gazing on the sky with
such intensity, that he took no notice of me until
I was near enough to speak to him in a low voice.
He started up, and looked extremely surprised.
At any other moment pride would have withheld
me, but the dreadful conviction of his danger
rested on my mind. I scarcely recollect my
words, but I remember I spoke of life and its
sweetness, for I felt that this strange intrusion
needed an apology. He heard me with
respectful
silence, but I saw he could scarce conceal his
astonishment. Just then there was a slight
rustling
in the leaves; but it was only the evening
wind.
Stranger, said I, have you any deadly
enemies
,
any who seek your life?
Doubtless I have, he replied with some
agitation
,
for I have found that deadly enemies are
easily and quickly made. Fair lady, he said,
approaching
me, I see you have come on an
errand
of mercy. There is danger then! He
paused, and without waiting for further inquires,
I hastened to relate to him every particular of the
scene I had just witnessed. Meanwhile we were
hastening rapidly towards that part of the forest,
from which I had first entered; and just as I had
finished my recital, we were opposite the
dwelling
of my friend Jane. I would have hastened
in thither for security; but the stranger forbade
me, even as I valued the life I sought to save.
The light from the window gleamed upon his
face, and I saw that he was deeply agitated.
Here we paused a moment. Lady, said he
my life is a weary one, and I have long
deemed
it a light thing to die; but I would rather find
my death in fair and honorable fight, than fall
unknown and unwept into the secret grave that
Vandreuil has prepared for me. A temporary
concealment is now my only security. When
the enemy find their search here fruitless, they
will pursue me in some other place of my resort,
and were I to fly, I might probably fall into their
hands.
Then come to my father's house, said I, he
is kind and noble hearted, and would sooner die
than betray you.
He looked at me a moment, then mournfully
shaking his head, Nono. It will not be safe,
he said. Your father must never know of my
concealment,promise me that he shall not.
The safety of my mysterious companion was now
my only object, and solemnly and unhesitatingly
I promised it. But you must not linger here,
I added, you need concealment until the
pursuit
is over; and I will seek it for you, even at
the risk of my father's displeasure. We were
now walking through the village, and I quickly
revolved in my mind the various places of
concealment
with which I was familiar. I knew
there was one on the pine hill behind us,
singularly
well calculated for our purpose, for in
our childish games it had often afforded me
a secure hiding place. I described it to the
stranger, so that he could not mistake it, and we
parted at the gate. Mother, have I not accounted
to you for all that seemed wrong in my conduct?
But, my child, think of the engagements you
have made, to conceal the whole from your father!
The conversation in the forest was full of strange
meaning, and ought not to be withheld from him.
And, Lucy, who can this stranger be, who seems
a person of so much importance to the Canadian
Governor, and why should he fear so benevolent
a man as your father? If he were innocent, sure
he need not fear him. Who knows but this very
stranger whom you are secreting without his
knowledge, may be plotting our ruin?
Oh, no, exclaimed the young lady, repressing
a cold thrill of suspicion, it cannot behe is too
frank and generous for treachery. Mother, do not
betray him. I know I have involved myself in a
strange task, and yet if I had refused it, the
tomahawk
of the Indian would even now have been
stained with his blood.
But did you make no engagements of further
assistance? said Mrs. Everett.
Only that I would obtain all possible
intelligence
of his foe, and convey the first news to the
place of his retreat. But at that moment Mr.
Everett's voice was heard in an adjoining room,
and presently after his entrance put a period to
their conversation.
CHAPTER III.
The
ensuing day was spent by Lucy Everett
in efforts to obtain further intelligence of the
Canadian officer and his associates. For this
purpose, she had extended her walk to the village,
calling upon those persons of her acquaintance
whose situation or character rendered them most
familiar with the floating news of the day. She
could not believe that the conspirators would
abandon their object, without first instituting a
search among the inhabitants, and thus afford her
an opportunity of ascertaining something
concerning
their future plans.
It was about noon, and Lucy was returning
perplexed
and disappointed, when her eye was
arrested
by the appearance of a genteel looking
stranger
,
sitting in the half opened door of a small
dwelling, which she was that moment passing.
The circumstance was enough to awaken her
curiosity, and she determined not to pass until
she had learned whether the appearance of Mrs.
Marsden's guest, did not in some way affect the
object of her solicitude. The face of the
stranger
was turned from the door, and she heard the
voice of the good woman loud within. Unwilling
to intrude without some precaution, she paused a
moment before the bars, at the same time calling
to a little flaxen headed boy who was playing
within the enclosure. He had thrown down his
kite and with a delighted air was approaching the
young lady when Mrs. Marsden herself appeared
in the door.
Come in, come in, Miss Everett, she
repeated
in a tone of good natured intreaty. And the
little boy threw down the bars which guarded the
entrance.
Lucy needed no further invitation. Upon her
entrance the stranger had risen and seated
himself
in a remote corner of the apartment and
seemed studiously to avoid notice. But Mrs.
Marsden allowed no time for conjectures, and
notwithstanding the variety of her cares and
employments
continued to pour forth such a strain
of inquiries that the only alternative was silence.
At length she paused a moment, and Lucy was
proceeding as concisely as possible to satisfy her
curiosity.
But do you know, Miss Lucy, exclaimed
Mrs. Marsden quickly interrupting her, that the
stranger gentleman across the way has left his
lodgings and gone nobody knows where, just as
his friend here, has come in search of him.
Indeed! said Lucy in a low voice, while the
color mounted high in her cheek, and she directed
a sidelong glance to the gentlemen in the corner.
He was leaning his chair against the wall, his
arms folded and his eye fixed intensely on the
floor; but notwithstanding the smile which
played
on his features, Lucy discovered at once such
an expression of covert ferocity, that she turned
away shuddering, and prepared to doubt the
authenticity
of any thing she might have heard in
his favor.
Since Saturday evening, continued Mrs.
Marsden, the young gentleman has been absent,
and his friend here is sadly concerned for him.
He left no word then, where he was going,
said Lucy with a painful effort.
None at all, ma'am. He did not even
mention
that he was going, and his trunk and papers
are all there. I am sure he will return soon,
she continued turning to the stranger, for he
has several times gone off suddenly, before this,
and never stayed but a few days.
And do you know whither he went? said the
stranger lifting up his large, grey eyes with an
expression of eager curiosity.
Lucy Everett could scarcely conceal the
sudden
shock that at that moment agitated her frame
the voice was that of
Hertel de Rouville
.
Ah to be sure I do, replied Mrs. Marsden,
when my husband was the very one that met
him in Boston with the big hat slouched over his
face. And now I think of it, she continued, if
you are in such a hurry to see him, you had
better
go to Boston. You will undoubtedly find
him there. Would not you advise him too, Miss
Lucy?
Good woman, continued the officer in the
same harsh tone and foreign accent, you say he
had no friends no acquaintance among you.
It was his own fault that he had not, replied
Mrs. Marsden, but he had a very reserved sort of
a way with him, and never spoke a word to any
one, not even to answer a civil question. But you
had better not go to-day, sir, she added as the
stranger rose and approached the door. It is a
long way to Boston.
Then the sooner I am off, the better, replied
the officer, and after laying upon the table a
French coin, and bidding a hasty good morning,
he quitted the dwelling. Lucy saw that he
directed
his steps to the forest. That the search
in this vicinity was now over she could no longer
doubt, and ere she left the house of Mrs. Marsden
the officer and his companion, mounted on
horseback
,
were seen swiftly pursuing their way to the
south.
It was four in the afternoon, when Lucy
Everett
,
overcome with agitating emotions, prepared
for her excursion to the hiding place of the
stranger
.
She had rested herself awhile in her
mother's
parlor, and related to her the particulars of
her interview with De Rouville; and she had not
departed without giving her promise that she
would ascertain if possible the import of the
mysterious
conversation in the forest. Many
embarrassing
thoughts passed through her mind, as she
slowly parted away the thick brushwood from the
winding path that led to the summit of the hill.
The beautiful stillness of the lone wood,
interrupted
only by the voice of singing birds, and the cool
murmur of a distant waterfall, came over her
feelings
with a soothing influence until her
reflections
had gradually assumed a softer character.
That the youth whose life had recently been
redeemed from destruction by her own exertions,
could ever have acted in that plan of deliberate
treachery which the words of De Rouville had
revealed
,
was an idea too painful to be indulged.
Neither were her emotions unmingled with
fearful
apprehensions. The conversation in the
woods had referred to a systematic plan of
offensive
operations, in contemplation against the
New-England
colonies, at a time when perfect peace
was supposed to exist between them and their
Canadian neighbors. Were then the horrid
atrocities
to which the Treaty of Ryswick had at
length put a period, again to be renewed; and if
so, was not her silence with regard to it
culpable
?
Surely the welfare of a single stranger was
not dearer to her than that of her father and
country. Her cheek was yet warm with the
embarrassment
which this inquiry excited, when she
found herself suddenly in his presence. He had
wandered from the place of his concealment, and
stood leaning in the shadow of an old hemlock,
just on the summit of the hill.
His brow was uncovered, and the hunting cap
he had worn lay at his feet, his eye was fixed on
the ground, and such a shade of sadness
darkened
his youthful features, as the fear of death alone
could never have imparted. The rustling of
the tangled evergreens which lay in the path,
at length aroused him from his reverie; and with
a flush of unfeigned delight he hastened to meet
his beautiful deliverer.
The courtesies of the puritan life were few and
simple; those fine, benevolent feelings which are
the essence of all true politeness, indeed were not
wanting, but the devotion of the pilgrims had
stamped upon the manners of the growing nation
its own rigid character; and though in every
movement of the minister's daughter there shone
a simple and chastened elegance which no art
can purchase, it formed a striking contrast to the
polished bearing of her mysterious companion.
I have seen Hertel de Rouville, said the
maiden interrupting his graceful compliments.
He seeks you at Boston, and if the Indian does
18
not yet remain to watch your steps, you may now
escape in safety.
Again the eye of the stranger sunk, with that
look of melancholy, which the appearance of
Lucy
had for a few moments interrupted. I have
then a short reprieve. Heaven bless you, gentle
maiden, for your kindness to a stranger. We
shall perhaps meet no more. And yet, he
continued
,
I cannot leave my name loaded with
crime, to one whose approbation would be dearer
to me than that of the world beside. Lucy felt
that this was no light compliment; for the words
were uttered in the deep tones of feeling, and the
stranger's brow was flushed as he spoke. Sweet
Lucy Everett, do not remember me as a spy and
a traitor; think of me as one whose early
education
has taught me to love the puritans, but whom
the ties of kindred and the love of life itself are
urging to join against them in schemes of
treachery
and cruelty. I cannot yet throw off the
restraint
.
The time has not come, for were I
convicted of the offence of which Vaudruil
suspects me, it would only hasten on the scene
of bloodshed.
But why does he seek to murder you in
secret
?
said the young lady with surprise.
He has no proof of my guilt; and he dare
not do it openly. He would as soon draw upon
himself the vengeance of the king himself as my
father's wrath. Here, he continued without
regarding the astonishment expressed in the
countenance
of his auditor, here is the bitterness
of my lot. It is hard to throw aside the ties of
parental duty.
But I must not linger here, he added, after
a little pause, it is necessary that I should hasten
immediately to the presence of Vandreuil, and
by refuting his suspicions, defer his plans a little
longer, until some slight preparation for
resistance
can be made; for the moment that Dudley
is supposed to be in possession of our secret, the
French forces would rush instantly upon the
defenceless
frontier.
But your words are parables to me, said
Lucy
,
you speak of bloodshed and plans of
attack
;
are we not at peace with our enemies?
Pardon me, replied the youth, I should have
told you that war is in anticipation, and probably
already declared in England, against France and
Spain. The Canadian governor has long been in
preparation for this event; and his forces are
prepared
for an immediate attack. The moment
that the declaration of war arrives, the whole
country from Casco to Wells, will be devastated.
All that I have told you of the war, communicate
without delay to your father, all that I have told
you of myself, I pray you conceal.
The cheek of the young maiden had gradually
grown pale during this recital; and at its
conclusion
,
she had no power to speak. The line of
attack comprehended her own beloved village.
Horrid pictures of blood and conflagration floated
through her mind; and the awful certainty of the
impending evil, left no avenue for hope.
Heaven be praised, she at length exclaimed,
as if her mind had at length fastened on some
slight alleviation. The Indians are now our
friends, we have none but gallant soldiers for
our foes. Heaven be praised we have not again
to fear the tomahawk and scalping knife.
Something like a groan of agony burst from
the youth. Fear every thing
here,
dear Miss
Everett. These beautiful villages are meted out
for utter destruction. The savages will not
regard
their treaty. Every effort has been made
to induce them to slight it; and the
machinations
of those cruel and fiendish priests have at
last prevailed.
Talk not of the priests, said Lucy, her eye
kindling with sudden indignation. Cruel and
fiendish as they may be, they are but tools to that
one master spirit of iniquity who excites and
governs
them all. The Baron Castine hath surely
learned wickedness from no mortal teacher, and if
the spirit of darkness doth indeed come to our world
in human formshe pausedIt is plain, I see
it, sir, Castine hath again lighted up their wrath,
and there is no more peace for us. Her voice
was choked with agony and the cold perspiration
stood on her brow. It is time that we part,
sir, she added, after a few moment's silence,
you must fly from danger, and I must go home
and prepare to meet it.
The stranger had become meanwhile deeply
agitated
.
Now that you are warned of the coming
evil, surely you will not remain to meet it. Dear
Miss Everett I pray you hasten from the scene of
danger.
My father is a pastor, replied Lucy looking
sorrowfully up,
he
will not forsake his flock and
I cannot forsake
him
. Farewell. She turned
hastily and drawing the veil over her tearful
countenance, returned by the path which led
directly
to the garden behind her father's dwelling.
Jane Grant waited at the gate to welcome her
approach, and they entered the parlor together.
The clergyman and his wife were at their
evening
repast, and a single glance was sufficient
to convince the daughter, that some train of
painful reflections already occupied her father's
mind.
Jane, said Mrs. Everett, hath your father
returned from the south?
The reply was in the affirmative.
Brought he then the tidings from England?
I heard none, sir. He was talking
principally
of two singular looking strangers who
overtook
him a little before he reached the village, and
who seemed to be coming on a matter of life and
death.
Which way were they travelling? inquired
Lucy.
They tarried a moment at the inn, and then
went off again at full speed on the northern road.
They seemed to be foreigners and persons of
distinction.
And what news from England dear father?
continued Lucy with breathless interest, while
the warnings of the stranger flashed painfully
over her mind.
You may as well know it now, exclaimed
the clergyman with a hasty effort. Great
Britain
has declared war against France and Spain;
and it is more than probable that the French
colonies will commence hostilities
immediately
.
We must prepare for war again in all its
horrors. The persons who listened to this
communication
,
seemed variously affected by it. Jane
Grant manifested only unmingled surprise and
apprehension; but when Mrs. Everett had
uttered
her first exclamation of distress, she cast on
Lucy a glance which seemed to say, the
mysterious
conversation is explained. The main
18*
whose life you have saved was the spy of our
enemy.
Mr. Everett continued. It cannot be
expected
that the fury of the war will fall upon
this portion of the country; for the eastern
Indians
who have recently become our friends will
furnish us with the best safeguard. Yet ought
we not the less to mourn for our brethren, whom
God hath so grievously afflicted. The ways of
heaven are dark, he added, rising and pacing
the floor. Our wretched country hath not yet
recovered from the wounds and bruises of the
late war, and he groaned bitterly. But our
Heavenly Father knoweth what we need, and he
will not surely blot out his people's name from
among the nations.
Father, said Lucy are you sure that the
savages
will remain true to us? The French are a
subtle people, andremember the Baron Castine.
Mr. Everett looked upon his daughter with
some surprise. You speak reasonably, my
child, strange that I myself had not remembered
these things, but my mind was overcome with the
greatness of our calamity. True, true, he
continued
,
were our Indian friends to become
traitors
,
we must expect incursions from the foe, and
that immediately.
My father said Lucy I have received sure
intelligence, that the treacherous Castine and his
priests have indeed won over the Indians,
notwithstanding
their treaty, and they are at this
moment prepared to assist in laying waste our
villages. We lie upon the very frontier. Within
a short distance is an armed force who wait only
for the news you have just communicated as the
signal
of destruction. Without doubt they will be
apprized of it as soon as ourselves, nay I have
reason
to believe that the strangers who were
hastening
with such rapidity to the north, are the
bearers of this intelligence. Every eye was
fixed upon Lucy in amazement.
And how know you this, Lucy? said Mr.
Everett, endeavoring by the sternness of his look
to conceal his emotion.
How,
I cannot tell you, pardon me father,
my intelligence is true, there is no time for
words. Dear father is it indeed too late for
resistance
?
Mr. Everett gazed a moment on his
daughter in silence, and a sudden light seemed to
flash upon his mind.
The young CanadianAh! I see it now.
Jane Grant, he continued turning to the young
lady who pale and trembling was leaning in the
window seat. Go home as quickly as possible
and tell your father, I desire he would hasten
forthwith to Boston and inform the court of the
ruin that is prepared for us. An armed force
must be raised without delay. Ah! I
comprehend
it all now, this comes not suddenly upon
Vaudreuil. Hasten my child, he continued
addressing
Jane, give the message to your father,
and pray him not to sleep until he sees that help
is prepared for us, and Lucy, my daughter, he
continued as Jane departed swiftly on her errand,
you must run with all speed to the village and
give the alarm. Let the bell be rung to
assemble
the people, and when they ask wherefore, tell
them that the Indians are coming we know not
how soon, perhaps this night, to murder us on
our hearth stones. I have letters to write to the
frontier towns and will be with them presently.
Lucy waited not for a second bidding, and
the alarm was quickly spread. In a few
minutes
from the time of her departure, the sound of
the bell rose from the village; and Mrs. Everett
who was gazing from the window, perceived by
the dim twilight the appearance of hastily
gathering
crowds.
When the clergyman at length entered the
church which had been appointed as the place of
assembling, he found it occupied by such an
assembly
as such an alarm always gathers together.
Young maidens and matrons, and wailing infants,
youth and grey headed magistrates, were mingled
in one crowd; and the partial illumination of
the candles which some in their haste had
brought with them, served to increase the
singular
effect, revealing here and there the pale
countenances of the assembly. There was a
confused noise of questions without answer, and
the bell was still pealing through the valley.
That there was some dreadful cause of alarm,
every one comprehended; but beyond this, all
was horrid uncertainty.
In the midst of this scene of confusion, Mr.
Everett caught a view of his daughter. She was
reclining pale and motionless against one of the
pillars that supported the pulpit, amid a group
of eager listeners, her bonnet was off; and the
comb had fallen from her dark and waving curls.
At the sight of the clergyman, the confusion
which prevailed throughout the assembly in some
degree subsided; at the same moment the bell
ceased, and having ascended the pulpit the better
to command attention, he began calmly and
concisely
to state to them their real danger and the
cause of their assembling. They listened with
eager and deathlike stillness. The clergyman
assured them that he had despatched a petition
to Boston for immediate aid. But even this,
he continued, may arrive too late. We are not
ignorant of savage warfare. We know they
sound no trumpet before them. Perhaps this
night the war whoop may echo through our
dwellings
.
A simultaneous groan burst from the
crowd. At all events, let them not find us
unprepared
.
We can all fight, and fight willingly
that cruel and treacherous race, the enemy of
God and man. Brethren we have arms, and we
will not be scalped unresistingly. As for the
women and children, he continued glancing
around on their pale faces, they have nothing to
do, but go home and pray the Almighty for his
strong defence. We can all rest beneath the
shadow of his wing.
One by one, the females and children now
retired
.
Of those who remained, a guard was
formed
for the defence of the town. The better to
accomplish their scheme, it was agreed that the
houses without the valley should be abandoned,
and that one third of the guard should be
constantly
upon duty. These resolutions having
been entered into, they departed with all speed
to carry them into effect.
Lucy had left the church just at the time
when nothing had been resolved upon; and an
hour of more agitating suspense she had never
passed than that which intervened between her
own return and her father's. During this period
she related to her mother the particulars of the
stranger's conversation; and she was still
standing
at the window, watching with eagerness the
hastily moving lights in the village, when the
sound of near voices met her ear. A group of
figures, faintly discerned in the darkness, were
seen approaching the cottage; and a moment
after, Lucy met her father at the gate.
We must abandon our home my child, he
said, it is too far from the center to lie within
the line of defence. Mrs. Everett approached
the door. Hasten Sarah, said the clergyman,
and seek for yourself all that is most dear to
you. There are some without, waiting to convey
our most valuable goods.
There was no time for remonstrance or reply,
and the mother and daughter silently prepared to
obey the injunction. All was now confusion in
the cottage. Where every object was so
endeared
by ancient ties of association, it was hard to
resolve which should be abandoned to the
vengeance
of the savage. The domestic who had
been speedily summoned from her now useless
department in the kitchen, was soon engaged in
tearing up and packing the various articles which
accident first threw in her way. The clergyman
had gone to his study to select from thence the
most valuable papers; and Mrs. Everett was
laying away in a basket, the contents of an old
fashioned cupboard, consisting of a few precious
relies of family plate, together with a more
modern
and less costly set of China. The little
yard before the door was soon filled with
promiscuous
heaps of boxes, chairs, and tables. At
length the arrangements were hastily completed,
and the men departed with their burthen. Lucy
and her mother, followed by Amy, were slowly
descending the hill, and Mr. Everett, after
turning
the key upon his solitary dwelling hastened to
accompany them.
We need not stop to describe the sensations of
this sorrowful party, as they moved silently along
the path to the village; those who have ever felt
the sudden dissolution of the strong attachments
which bind to a beloved home, may easily
imagine
them. They had nearly half completed
their walk, and Mr. Everett perceived with
pleasure
that the houses which composed the village
were already under the protection of an armed
and efficient guard, when Mrs. Everett suddenly
paused and turned to her husband.
The picture, Mr. Everett! The picture, I have
surely forgotten it. There was a momentary
embarrassment
.
Mother, I will return for you, exclaimed
Lucy, and Amy will go with me; where shall
we find the picture? Mr. Everett hesitated.
It is a dangerous time to walk alone, Lucy.
But, my father, you are fatigued, and you look
ill. You cannot walk to the cottage again to
night. Do not fear for us. Amy and myself are
young and active, and we will join you by the
time you reach the guard,and after
obtaining
her mother's directions, without further
delay
they turned to retrace their steps to the
cottage
.
The moon was rising, and there was something
mournful in the appearance of the deserted
cottage
,
with its dark back grounds of evergreens.
The windows which had been wont, at this hour,
to send forth a pleasant light, now looked dark
and cheerless. Lucy lifted the latch of the little
gate. There was no sound of glad, kind voices
within; the stillness of the grave hung over the
dwelling. The heroism of poor Amy was so
entirely
overcome by the air of gloom which
pervaded
the whole scene, that when Lucy had at
length succeeded in opening the door, she
refused
to enter; and sat down trembling upon the
bench of the little honey-suckled porch. With a
painful effort, Lucy hastened through the dark
and lonely apartments. The faint light of the
moon was just struggling through the windows,
and tears involuntarily rushed to her eyes, as it
revealed to her the dismantled appearance of the
little parlor. Familiar as she was with the
objects
of this apartment, it was impossible for her
to discover the key of the locker, without first
obtaining
a light. Her hand had already fastened
upon a little lamp, that stood on the mantel-piece,
and she now made her way into the kitchen. A
few embers still remained on the hearth, and by
means of these, she soon succeeded in relighting
the lamp, and in a few moments more found
herself
in possession of the object of her search.
A sudden and violent scream from Amy, at
that moment arrested her attention. In an
instant
she was at the door, just in time to witness
the broad illumination which for a moment lit up
the valley, ere a sound like the peal of distant
thunder at once revealed its cause. A more
fearful and wretched situation than that in which
they now found themselves, can scarcely be
conceived
.
The foe had indeed come, for blaze after
blaze, and fresh vollies of musquetry, now rapidly
succeeded each other, nay, in the distant and
momentary glare, she saw, or fancied she saw, the
well known uniform of the French soldiery,
interspersed
with the tall figures of the Indian
warriors
.
Her exertions had not then been in vain. A
guard had indeed been raised, one strong in
heavenly faith, and in the might of human
affections
.
Many a firm heart must be laid low, ere
harm could come to those within the enclosure;
but here was she, far from them all, in this
dreadful
moment, alone and unprotected. Horrid and
sickening emotions filled her mind. Death was
already in the valley, for even at this distance,
the voice of strong agony was distinctly heard;
and such cries and groans as those that now
mingled faintly in the din of battle, she felt that
death alone could inspire. The exclamations of
Amy wild with terror, served only to increase her
distress.
She still stood in the porch, gazing in passive
silence upon the valley. Horror had frozen every
faculty, and she now waited in calm expectation
for the moment when the conflagration of the
village
should complete the horrors of the scene.
But a new idea of her situation suddenly filled
her mind, and bringing with it the hope of safety
at once aroused her from this torpor. The house
was at some distance from any other, and quite
out of the path of the enemy; the moon was
obscured
with clouds, and the possibility, nay, the
probability, that it might escape their notice,
was sufficient to banish despair.
She now regretted extremely that she had
allowed
the lamp to remain burning in the parlor,
as she had thus considerably increased the
chances
of discovery; and followed by Amy, to whom
a portion of her hopes were already
communicated
,
she hastened to extinguish it. The door was
quickly locked and barred; and with a sudden
animation, they began to devise all possible
means for their security. Even in case of an
attack
,
Lucy trusted that the lonely and deserted
air ofthe house, together with the appearance of
19
the apartments stripped of their furniture, by
inducing
them to believe it uninhabited, might still
secure its safety. Amy had just succeeded in
closing the shutters of the kitchen, and was
engaged
in heaping upon the embers a few light
splinters when the sound of a measured tread
broke upon the stillness. They are coming,
she shrieked, in an agony of fear.
Hushhushwhispered Lucy, as you love
life be quiet. Meanwhile the heavy,
monotonous
sound which had excited their dread, drew
each moment nearer; and Lucy motioning Amy
again to be quiet, ventured carefully to enter the
opened door of the parlor. She dared not
approach
the window, but she could distinctly
perceive
that a small party of soldiers had that
moment
reached the summit of the acclivity, and
were now within a stone's throw of the house.
There was a short and dreadful silence,
interrupted
only by the voice of the officer. Though his
orders were given in Freneh, Lucy understood
them sufficiently to comprehend that they were
to remain in their present situation, while a few
of them moved forward for a careful reconnoitre
of the house and grounds. They were soon
hastily
scrambling over the pickets, and Lucy retired
again to the kitchen.
What did he mean, said a low voice under
the window, to send us puffing up the hill for the
sake of burning this old deserted house. Not a
cat stirring! Upon my word, I do not believe it
has been inhabited since the flood.
But you know, replied the other, we must
make a division of that saucy guard. We may
fire upon them all night, at this rate, without
effecting any thing.
And is De Rouville so witless as to think that
they will come running forth to save these rotten
shingles? See, continued the same voice, they
have left us nothing for booty, but that old
fashioned
locker. I will burn the house in very spite to
these cunning puritans.
Ah! They are more cunning than you dream
of, exclaimed the second voice. When we
left the village a bright light shone through these
windows, and if I am not mistaken, it still
contains
human beings notwithstanding its deserted
look. Some too, whose lives are of importance.
I believe De Rouville learned as much before he
sent us.
At any rate we can soon settle the matter,
said the first voice, in a tone which made Lucy
shudder, though she could not understand the
meaning of his threat.
There was another silence of considerable
duration
,
and then light streamed up from under the
windows with so sudden a blaze, that an
involuntary
scream of horror burst from her lips. They
have fired the house, Amy, she exclaimed in the
anguish of despair, and was hastening to unfasten
the door. But Amy caught her arm.
Do not go out, dear Miss Lucy, the Indians
are waiting there for us; and it is better to die
here than fall into their hands. At that
moment
a column of smoke and flame burst from the
door of the parlor; and almost suffocated and
dead with horror, Amy herself threw open the
door which led to the garden. To escape to the
forest on the hill, was now the only alternative.
They had already crossed the garden and Lucy
leaned a moment over the gate to undo the
fastening
,
when the loud and fearful war-whoop
arrested her purpose. The clouds rolled away
from the moon, and she saw that they were
surrounded
with a fierce circle of waving tomahawks.
All that they could do for life was done, and Lucy
leaned against the pickets, to watch the coming
up of her foe. At that moment a fainting, like
death, came over her, the forms of the savage
warriors faded from her eye, and insensibility
succeeded
to the long excitement of agonized
feeling
.
CHAPTER IV.
When
consciousness again dawned upon the
soul of Lucy Everett, the objects around her were
entirely changed. It was still night, the moon
was in its meridian, and she was reclining on the
ground, in the midst of an evergreen forest. At
first she supposed that this was none other than
that which adorned the hill behind her father's
dwelling; and fancied that by some unknown
means she had escaped from the power of her
enemy, in time to obtain its concealment. But
a second glance convinced her that she was now
far away from her beloved home, and a captive of
the enemy.
The forest extended in every direction as far
as the eye could penetrate; every where one
unmingled
and solemn mass of waving foliage met
her eye, save when she turned it to the pale blue
skies above. Near her, and stretched upon the
ground in a deep and listless slumber, she now
perceived the companion of her misfortunes.
The countenance of Amy was excessively pale,
and had it not been for her low and heavy
breathing
she would have deemed it the sleep of death.
But that which excited her deepest horror was the
appearance of several Indian warriors, reposing
at short distances around them. They had
chosen
19*
their resting places among the thick
underwood
,
so that she had not at first been aware of
their presence. The long knife and tomahawk
still lay beside them, and in many instances were
yet strongly clenched. All seemed buried in
deep slumber, and her first thought was to arouse
her sleeping companion, that they might together
effect their escape. She was slowly rising for
this purpose when from beneath the branch of a
large tree before her, the eye of an Indian met
her own with a fierce and steady glance. The
savages had not left their captives unguarded,
all resistance was in vain, so pillowing her head
upon the grassy hillock she at length sunk into
the slumber, which fear had induced her to
feign.
Ere Lucy again woke to the remembrance of
her captivity, a strong sunlight was piercing the
sombre shades of the forest, and the loud
guttural
tones of her Indian guides were mingling
harshly on her ear. She arose and gazed
earnestly
around her. Amy was no where in sight; and
the dreadful suspicion of her probable fate,
pressed
heavily on the heart of her young mistress.
The noise of rustling foliage now drew the
Indians
about her, while they still continued their
singular and animated debate. Meanwhile that
strength and decision of thought, which had long
been nursed in secret within the bosom of Lucy
Everett, was seeking to reveal itself in
appropriate
action. The character of the Indians as a
people had long been known to her; and though
that instinctive horror with which the early
settlers
of New-England naturally regarded this
savage race, prevented her in some measure from
appreciating those nobler traits of character,
which we who live in later days have leisure to
admire, she still knew that they were human
beings
,
and that there are in every human heart,
some tender chords to vibrate at the touch of a
skilful hand; that however true to them as a race
those stern features of cruelty, there were still
individual
exceptions. She therefore determined
to analyze the various expressions of character in
her savage companions, and to endeavor if
possible
to excite in her own behalf, the glow of
benevolent
feeling; for without doubt a long and
painful journey was before her, unless indeed
some sudden kindling of wrath should sacrifice
her at once to their fury.
While these thoughts were revolving in her
mind, the Indians continued their debate around
her, with many wild and fierce gestures. They
gazed frequently upon their beautiful captive;
and Lucy fancied that, every time, their glances
returned upon her with a calmer and less
ferocious
aspect. There was indeed much in her
appearance to soften the resentment of her
savage
guards; for while her youth and the
tenderness
of her sex claimed their pity, the beauty of
her person, and the high and graceful demeanor,
seemed well fitted to call forth the more
powerful
principle of admiration. Beauty has its
influence
even with the savage, and Lucy Everett's
was precisely of that style of which an Indian
would be most likely to acknowledge the power.
There was no obsequious and fawning servility,
no meek intreaty for lifethe maiden knew too
well the character of her foe; a haughty smile
was on her lip, her step was free and proud, as
she moved through the windings of the forest,
and the glance of the Indian frequently sunk
beneath the brilliant flashes of spirit that gleamed
from the dark eye of the captive maiden. There
was also manifested on all occasions a kind of
fearless confidence in their generosity, exactly
suited to win the hearts of her proud companions.
Whenever danger approached, she drew nearer
to them, as if claiming their protection, and the
sweet and gentle smile with which their acts of
kindness were rewarded, was rendered more
acceptable
by the usual reserve of her manner.
These exertions were not in vain. A spirit of
kindness was gradually diffusing itself through
the hearts of some of her companions, and now
only waited for a meet occasion, or some slight
increase of excitement, to reveal itself in her
favor.
The savage travelers seemed to know no
weariness
;
from the first break of morning, till the
last glimmerings of day, with untiring steps, they
pursued their route through the wilderness,
pausing
only to partake of their light refreshments.
It was the evening of the third day since their
departure from H, and the moon was shining
bright through the openings of the forest, ere
they had selected their halting place. This was
at length chosen on the banks of a tributary
stream; whose murmurs as it dashed over the
stones in its channel, were all that interrupted the
quiet of nature. To the lovers of the picturesque,
if any had been there to look on, the group, the
hour, the place, would have presented a scene of
peculiar interest. The beautiful and dejected
young captive, the forms of her Indian guards
scattered in strange contrast on the turf and
hillocks
around her, the vivid touches of moonlight
on the ragged wave below, the flickering and
fitful
glare of the immense blaze which had been
kindled as well for safety, as for the preparation
of their evening repast, together with the gloomy
mass of forest which no ray might pierce,
extending
vast and dim around them, were the most
obvious
features of the picture.
With the exception of Lucy, by far the most
interesting and prominent figure was that of a tall
and well formed youth, reclining against a
fragment
of rock in the center of the group below,
and at that moment an object of fixed and earnest
attention to every individual which composed it.
At another moment, in an hour of security, Lucy
Everett could scarce have regarded without fear
and horror the ferocious aspect of the young
savage
,
his long hair waving in the night breeze, and
every feature kindled with a glow of unnatural
excitement. But the heart of the captive had
become strangely inured to sights like these;
and amid all the terror and anguish of her long
march, when looks of cunning, and cruelty, and
savage hate, glanced upon her from the eyes of
her fierce conductors, and angry voices rung
around her, there had ever been a tone of
kindness
on the lip of the young Alaska, and a look
of pity and compassion, softening the sternness of
his glance. Alaska was the favorite of the whole
party, and the son of the venerable chief who
conducted them. Lucy had from the first
regarded
him with a feeling of secret confidence; and
by degrees and almost insensibly, had begun to
hope that he would become her deliverer from
captivity.
But the low tones of the youth had gradually
increased in fierceness like the rush of the
coming
storm, and now rung high and wild through
the forest. Every eye was fixed eagerly on him.
Some ancient legend, some tale of high and
daring
deeds evidently claimed their attention; the
dark faces around her every moment assuming
some new expression of savage triumph, and every
lip trembling with exclamations of wild
excitement
.
Then came a burst of songsupported at
first only by the mellow tones of Alaska, but
gradually swelling and deepening until every
voice had mingled with his, and the wild inspiring
melody thrown back on her ear in the loud echoes
of the forest, became overpowering. Lucy turned
shuddering away, and no longer wondered at their
deeds of inhuman daring. But these at last died
away; and on raising her eye amid the silence
that succeeded, she perceived with surprise and
fear, that the attention of the whole party had
become suddenly transferred to herself. Her
apprehensions, however, were soon relieved by
the gestures of the chief, who, after repeated
attempts
,
at length succeeded in intimating to her
the desire of her companions that she should
furnish them with a specimen of the songs of her
country. Requests in this instance were but
commands
;
and Lucy, after revolving in her mind the
various simple airs with which she was familiar,
selected one, which, for its exquisite tenderness
and depth of melody, was well worthy of the
occasion
.
It was one of the beautiful and holy
hymns of the pilgrims; and as it rose amid that
savage throng, now melting on the air in soft and
solemn cadences, and now in loud sweet tones
ringing through the arches whose echoes were
yet dying with the war song of the Indian,the
effect was thrilling. Even the stern spirits of the
warriors seemed bowed with its influence. The
strains at length ceased, and a confused murmur,
that seemed like approbation, succeeded them.
The young Alaska hid his face; and the fierce
eye of the chief, softened with an expression of
kindly feeling.
Ecoutez, ecoutez,
exclaimed a low and
distinct
voice near her. She turned in amazement.
Hitherto her only communications had been
made by means of gestures; and the idea that
there were any there, who comprehended a
language
with which she was familiar, was new
and pleasing. The voice was that of Alaska;
he had approached her unobserved, and
perceiving
himself understood now proceeded to
address her in French with ease and fluency.
Listen, listen, English maiden. Thou art like
my dead sister, and my father loves thee.
Elsingah
was tall, and straight, and beautiful as the
morning; her voice was the voice of birds, and
her step like the fleet gliding of the deer. But,
maiden, the dead leaf hath fallen on her grave;
and the voice of Elsingah hath long been silent
in her father's dwelling. She hath built her
bower, where the roses and violets never die, far
away in the land of bright shadows, among the
spirits of the brave and beautiful. But, maiden,
she hath left us desolate. The old chief still
mourns for her, and there is none to call me
brother
.
And thou art like Elsingah. Thy voice, thy
smile, are like hers; and my father loves thee.
English maiden wilt thou be his daughter.
The young lady seemed in doubt, how to
answer
this singular proposal, but Alaska waited for
her reply.
And who will soothe my own father, she
at length exclaimed, vainly endeavoring to
repress
,
a tear at the thought of her now desolate
home, and my mother, my own beloved mother,
she added in broken tones. Oh Alaska, if you
have mourned for Elsingah, even in the beautiful
and happy homes of blessed spirits, think of those
who mourn for me a captive, a wretched captive
in the power of enemies.
The youth seemed considerably affected with
this appeal; but the remainder of the party, who
had sometime waited in silence, now interrupted
the conversation, commanding Alaska to interpret
to them the words of the English captive. A
cry of displeasure was heard among them as the
youth obeyed; and a long debate succeeded, to
the captive fearfully incomprehensible, though
conscious that she was herself the subject of it.
The old chief joined in it with expression of
strong interest repeating frequently the name of
Elsingah, and pointing to her whom he would
fain have adopted in her stead. The remainder
of the party, however, manifested signs of strong
disapprobation, and replied to the proposals of
Alaska and their chief with such an air of
fierceness
and resolution, that the prisoner could no
longer doubt concerning her doom; and cold and
darkly fell the fearful truths on her heartthe
death of an Indian captive was before her.
Whatever the decision might be, it was evident
that the old chief felt himself compelled to
acquiesce
in it; and after casting on Lucy a
lingering
look of regret, he quickly stretched himself
on the earth for his evening repose. His
example
was soon followed by all except those
appointed
guard for the night; and Lucy herself, to
avoid suspicion, reclined her cheek on the cold
and dreary turf.
It was an hour of bitter suffering; and the
young maiden now sought earnestly to recal to
her recollection those lessons of holy truth, which
in moments of gladness had fallen so lightly on
her heart. Earth for her was now no more, its
pleasant toils, its gay hopes and affections, were
all over, and the gravethe lonely and unknown
grave was henceforth to be her resting place.
The last effort had been made for her, and made
in vain; and the elasticity of youthful hope,
which had hitherto borne her with incredible
strength and cheerfulness through the perils of
her long march, now seemed broken and crushed
forever. And after all, she was to die just in the
spring-time of her being, far away from all who
would have soothed the bitterness of death, and
among cruel strangers. The weary night passed
away in tears and agony.
On the first appearance of day, the Indians
renewed
their march. Lucy still walked by the side
of the Chief, but though her eye glanced
frequently
over the band, she could no where
discover
the youthful favorite; and indeed the
Indians
themselves seemed uneasy at his absence,
frequently pausing and searching the openings
around them, as if expecting his appearance. At
length, about half an hour after sunrise, Alaska
suddenly presented himself, springing from the
thicket on one side of their path. There were
slight symptoms of agitation on his brow; and his
companions at first, regarded him with suspicious
glances. But a certain air of ease and
indifference
which the youth soon assumed, together
with some slight apology, ere long apparently
removed their displeasure.
The whole party now endeavored to quicken
20
their pace,they seemed apprehensive of evil at
the slightest noise, manifesting signs of alarm,
and drawing more closely around their prisoner.
But the depressed spirits and wearied frame of the
young captive, could no longer endure the
unwonted
hardships of her journey. The hope of
safety which had hitherto given energy to her
steps was gone, and with the recklessness of
despair
she now paused suddenly in her path, and
supporting herself against the tree that shaded it,
declared firmly that she could and would go no
further. She had expected death for her
temerity
,
but the Indians manifested only surprise and
concern; the most savage of them entreating her
to accompany them a little further, and assuring
her that she should then find rest and plenty.
Scarcely able to comprehend their conduct, with
a faint glimmering of hope, she at length
yielded
;
and her guides now in some measure
accommodated
their pace to her exhausted strength.
Meanwhile the prisoner perceived, with deep
regret, that he who had ever manifested the
strongest interest in her welfare, seemed, on the
present occasion, to regard her with indifference,
and even aversion. Alaska was as usual the
amusement of the party. He laughed and sung,
and recited to them tales of ancient valor; but
he seemed now perseveringly to avoid her
presence
,
and there was a kind of heartless gaiety
in his whole manner which she had never before
discovered.
But in the midst of those bursts of merriment,
the eye of the young Indian suddenly rested on
hers with a glance of deep and secret meaning.
There was an expression of mingled pity,
apprehension
and hope; and repressing the
exclamation
of astonishment that arose to her lip, she
became at once convinced that this apparent
unconcern
in her fate, was only assumed for some
mysterious purpose of kindness. Unwilling
however
to attract the suspicions of her companions, by
too close a scrutiny of his conduct, with a strong
effort she confined her glances to the path
beneath
and the dense thicket before her.
Move slower, maidenas you love life, move
slower, exclaimed a low voice near her as with
a painful effort she was seeking to quicken her
movement. She looked up in astonishment.
The young warrior was standing on an elevated
stone at a little distance before her; his bow was
drawn, and he seemed deeply intent upon some
distant aim. She almost doubted the evidence
of her senses; for though the voice was that of
Alaska, there was nothing in his countenance
which intimated the slightest consciousness of
her presence, and at that moment darting
suddenly
from the rock with a yell of savage delight,
he disappeared in the thicket.
After ascertaining that this mysterious
communication
had been listened to by none but
herself
,
she began at once to comply with the
injunction
,
being now again fully aware that in
advancing she was only hastening on to a more
cruel and aggravated doom. But the faces of
her conductors, exhibited symptoms of high
impatience
,
as she again relaxed her efforts,
sometimes
almost pausing on her way. They again
renewed their promises of speedy rest; and these
being now ineffectual, threatenings were resorted
to. But the energy of despair was in her heart,
she gazed calmly and resolutely on the
glistening
tomahawk, and her step only became yet
more languid.
Meanwhile Alaska and several of his young
companions had moved on with a rapid step, and
now the sounds of a wild and savage song came
ringing through the woods. It was supported by
several voices; but as they drew near, the
prisoner
could plainly distinguish amid the pauses, at
the conclusion of every stanza, the single tone of
Alaska chanting on in low and almost inaudible
strains. The inherent love of life had quickened
every sense and she was not long in perceiving
that words of secret intelligence lingered in the
seemingly unmeaning sound.
Listen, listen, English maiden, at length
caught her ear; and with downcast eye and
quickened breathing, she waited for his
mysterious
communication. It came at length in low
and fitful strains. Fear not. Wait here. They
will not harm you. And the voice of the
musician
again burst forth in the wild accents of his
native tongue. Irresolute, and almost overcome
with emotion, she awaited the conclusion of the
succeeding stanza. Another hour, but one
hour more, wait here, or in yonder valley, and you
shall not die. The white conquerors will not
murder you.
A cry of joy almost escaped the lips of the
young captive; but with a quick effort she
concealed
her emotion, still moving on silently and
languidly as before. They were now descending
a hill into a little sheltered nook, overhung with
birch and maple. It was about noon, the sun had
become exceedingly oppressive, and it was the
time which the Indians had usually selected for
refreshment. Lucy ventured therefore, to
demand
of them an hour's repose, assuring them,
by signs, that the strength thus acquired would
more than compensate for the loss of time.
After
a short debate, the Indians, with much
dissatisfaction
,
complied with the request.
With an air of as much composure as she could
assume, Lucy now reclined herself in the shadow
of the clustering maples, and leaning her head
on her hand, feigned that repose, the need of
which, she had urged as an excuse for their
present
delay.
Meanwhile a profound stillness prevailed among
the savages. They spoke occasionally in low
whispers; and whenever Lucy ventured to lift
her eye, she perceived that they were gazing
anxiously around them, as if in constant
expection
of an alarm. The time rolled slowly on;
to the agitated heart of the captive, minutes seemed
hours, and still no signs of the promised
deliverance
.
The prescribed period had indeed nearly
elapsed, and Lucy was already shuddering at
the gathering signs of impatience on the
countenances
of her conductors when her eye
became
suddenly fixed on the opposite thicket. A
human face, fiercely painted, was peeping out
from among the foliage, and quietly and
unobservedly
surveying the scene before him. Not
the slightest noise announced his presence, and he
continued for several moments cautiously
directing
his glances upon the unconscious objects of
his scrutiny. At length, perceiving that the
prisoner had discovered his presence, he moved
slowly down the bank followed by a close but
single file of Indian warriors.
The surprised guards started hastily on their
feet; but it was too late for flight, and the high
20*
authority of the chief who now approached them,
was such as to preclude the idea of open combat.
The fierce words which immediately ensued, were
to Lucy totally unintelligible; but it was evident
that on the part of her guides an expression of
servility mingled with angry looks, while the
countenance of the stranger chief exhibited only
haughty reproach. The altercation was at last
concluded, and the victor approached the tree
beneath which his prisoner reclined. There was
nothing in the appearance of the stranger at all
calculated to soothe her fears, and yet after
glancing a moment upon her Indian friend, she
was convinced that this was the anticipated
succor
.
The chief hastened to inform her that she
was to accompany him; and, with a fresh impulse
of strength and hope, she prepared to obey the
intimation.
When the little summit was once more gained,
Lucy Everett turned for a farewell glance at those
whom, a few minutes before, she had regarded as
her murderers. They were still standing in the
same posture in which she had left them, gazing
after her with looks of deadly hate, and even now
scarcely restraining the expressions of their
savage
resentment. Alaska had separated himself
from the group; and, as long as Lucy could
discern
the sheltered nook, he was still standing with
folded arms, and gazing after her with looks of
mingled joy and sadness. The captive waved
her hand in token of gratitude, and the nodding
foliage soon hid the whole company from her
view.
CHAPTER V.
Nothing
interrupted the profound silence with
which the whole party now moved forward, save
the breaking of the long grass beneath their feet,
and the sound of rustling boughts, as their strong
clusters parted before them. They had retraced
for some time, the path which Lucy had so
recently
trodden, when the leader of the band
plunged into the midst of a dark thicket to the
left, commanding the rest to follow him. The
way had now become more intricate than ever,
and notwithstanding the utmost exertions of the
impatient travelers, the progress made was but
in considerable, the foremost in the march
frequently
pausing to hew away the tangled bushes
which obstructed their steps.
These interruptions, however, occasioned no
inconvenience to the young captive; and indeed
the intervals of rest thus afforded, together with
the slow pace thus necessarily adopted, were all
which prevented her light frame from sinking
under her fatigues.
The beams of a descending sun threw a faint
and obstructed radiance on their way, as they at
length silently emerged into a wide and well
trodden
path, which intersected the one they had
previously trodden. They all gazed eagerly
forward, and amid the openings of the foliage
was now plainly discoverable the appearance of
distant water. Then followed a brief interchange
of signals and expressive glances among the
guides, and again they moved silently on. The
darkness was now every moment increasing; and
the eye of the captive, weary of gazing on the
endless and unvarying succession of forest and
sky, sunk heavily downward. Her grieved spirit
wandered sorrowfully away to the distant friends
and home, that she doubted not were lost to her
forever, until the strong and beautiful pictures of
memory seemed living realities; and the
thickening
gloom of the forest, and the forms of her
stern and silent companions, only as the moving
pageant of some troubled dream.
A sudden halt in the movement of the advanced
guard, now attracted her attention, and she
beheld
herself at once standing on the margin of a
wide river. With the exception of two, her guard
had suddenly deserted her, leaving her to
examine
at her leisure, the picturesque beauty of the
opposite shore, now softened with the shades of
the deepening twilight.
After a short interval the Indians reappeared,
dragging from the concealment of the thicket
several small and rude canoes. These were
speedily
launched, and the chief again approached
the prisoner. Lucy turned for a moment,
shuddering
from the cold dark wave, but there was no
alternative. With a glance of fervent but
unmurmured
supplication to heaven, she now
followed
her guide to the margin of the stream, and
was soon seated beside him in the rude canoe.
The sound of the plashing wave echoed
mournfully
in the stillnes,the shore seemed receeding
behind them, and in a few moments more, they
were sailing quietly down the current of the
stream.
The broad river was now gradually
widening
into a bold and majestic bay; and Lucy
soon found herself, in that frail bark, and with
that savage companion, alone on an inlet of
the wide sea. Meanwhile one by one the stars
of heaven shone out from the soft twilight,
while the outline of the opposite shore seemed
every moment to grow more wild and strange,
amid the gathering shadows. But the eyes of
all were now directed to a bold and woody
promontory, jutting forth from the eastern shore
at no great distance below them.
A shape like that of a fortress now appeared
on its summit, but often ere this had the
fantastic
skill of nature mocked the weary eye with
views of distant towns and cities. The illusion,
however, if such it was, seemed only to grow
more strong and distinct upon a nearer survey.
Indeed as they gradually neared the shore the
dark building with its strong outworks and
barriers
of defence, might no longer be mistaken,
though the deep obscurity which enveloped the
objects of the shore, prevented minute
observations
.
Her companion now muttering a few
unintelligible
phrases, made rapidly towards the object of
her curiosity, the other canoes following closely
in their rear. A loud quick challenge was now
heard from the shore, while brilliant streams of
light issuing from the buildings above, seemed to
render the darkness without more gloomy by its
contrast. The watchword had been given by
her guides, and in a few moments more, they
were standing on the low landing point just
beneath
the fortress.
The idea of her wild and singular situation,
rushed painfully to the mind of the captive, as,
following the steps of her guide, she now
perceived
that they were approaching the haunts of
civilized men. There was a confused mingling
of human tones, the song, the whistle, and the
boisterous laugh, the sounds of heavy steps
echoing
on the pavement within, the stirring tones of
the fife and drum, and amid their brief interludes
the notes of a softer and more distant music.
They had already passed the entrenchments, and
half fainting with terror and embarrassment, Lucy
soon found herself standing amid a sudden glare
of light at the entrance of the building, every
sense dazzled and bewildered with this
unexpected
transition from the gloom and silence of the
forest.
The apartment into which the whole party
were now slowly entering was a high and
extremely
spacious hall illuminated by means of
lamps suspended from the ceiling. Many and
various were the forms which now presented
themselves, issuing from the numerous rooms with
which the hall communicated. Servants were
hurrying to and fro, soldiers in the gay French
uniform, gathered in little groups talking and
singing in their foreign tongue, while others
whose rich dress and haughty step denoted them
officers of rank, were slowly moving through the
apartment. Neither was the prospect bounded
by the bewildering succession of objects which
the hall itself presented. The doors on either
side were constantly opening, revealing at every
moment a glimpse of the objects within. Light
music floated from the one directly opposite the
spot where the savages and their captive were
stationed; there was a sound of quick steps
moving
within to its melody, and now there
appeared
the form of an elegant female gliding for a
moment before the opening door. It would not
be expected that in a situation like this so
singular
a groupe could long remain unnoticed.
Curious
glances began one by one to fasten upon it,
until Lucy Everett would have welcomed
joyfully
even the gloom and shadow of the wilderness.
The various objects around her had however
exerted so absorbing an influence upon her
attention
,
that the absence of the Indian chief had
not been noticed, until she now perceived him
approaching from a distant part of the hall. He
had no sooner rejoined the party, than
commanding
the remainder of his followers to await his
return
at the gate of the palace, he selected two of
their number, and immediately sallied forth again
in the same direction, accompanied by them and
the English prisoner. The sight of one so young
and fair, a stranger and a captive, seemed to
create a strong excitement among the various
inmates of the apartment, and a murmur of
admiration
and pity followed the group as they
now slowly mounted the staircase.
But the noise and confusion below seemed
gradually to subside, as having at length
completed
the ascent, they now traversed several
spacious
apartments. Weary of conjecture, faint
and sick with fatigue, at length she paused; and
the chief murmuring a hasty caution to the
guards immediately disappeared.
Voices within the next room were now
distinctly
heard. They spoke indeed in a foreign
language
,
but it was one with which she was in some
measure familiar; and her conceptions of its
meaning were now quickened by an
overpowering
curiosity which the singularity of her
situation
excited. The deep full toned voice which
now met her ear, was evidently addressing the
savage chief.
Welcome, welcome, brave Anamanta, we
have awaited you since morning; but surely a
single prisoner is not all your booty.
No, brother, the English captives are still in
the wilderness. The Sieur Hertel bade me lead
them to Quebec; but the maiden I have brought
you is young and tender, and I turned aside with
her, that she might not die unredeemed in the
forest.
And did not the Sieur pay the ransom of your
prisoners? exclaimed another and sharper tone.
For all but her, rejoined the chief.
The Saco warriors were treacherous, and
sought to carry her away in secret to grace their
triumph. But the brave Alaska came to me last
night, and warned me of their treachery, and to
day I overtook them in the forest.
It is well, Anamanta, replied the first voice.
Leave the prisoner here, and I will give you
the gold for her ransom. A long drawn sigh
interrupted
the silence which succeeded.
There was a time, exclaimed the Indian
sorrowfully
,
as the clinking of the precious metal was
heard withinthere was a time, when the
chiefs of my nation would have scorned such an
offering. They went forth gloriously to the fight,
and came back loaded only with the scalps of
their enemies.
And that time shall surely come again,
rejoined
the full melodious voice which had first
spoken. Grieve not, noble Anamant, that time
shall surely come again. But not until the
glorious
race of the Mohicans stand once more on
the green soil of their fathers, not until those
unholy
heretics have been torn up, root and branch,
from the land which they have polluted, and the
forests of your tribe wave high and free again on
its blood-nourished valleys. So long as a single
vestige of this unholy people stains your ancient
inheritance, ask not for the help of God, nor
of the blessed virgin, nor of the pure church
they have defiled.
A new and fearful thought darted across the
mind of the captive as those words of
denunciation
met her ear. Impious and inexpressibly
dreadful as they had seemed, there was indeed
one to whose character as it had long been
revealed
to the colonists, they seemed but too
appropriate
.
The voice within so rich in its tones, so
musical in its cadence, was surely none other
than that of the Baron de Castine.
The conversation still continued; but Lucy
Everett heard no more. Every other feeling was
at once forgotten in the terror of this discovery.
She looked tremblingly around the apartment.
The mystery was then explained. It was the
palace Castine, that strong hold of superstition
and cruelty whose very name had once chilled
her heart; and she was here, a lone and
unprotected
prisoner, within the very walls where all
those fearful plans of ruin for her people had
been maturing, the very scene where the
treacherous
peace had been plotted, the ambuscade,
the war-cry, the cold blooded murder.
But these reflections were now interrupted.
21
The chief again entered the apartment, and
Lucy
Everett found herself summoned to the
presence
of the object of her terror. Perhaps it was
the consciousness that she had nothing to hope
from his mercy, that now banished the lingerings
of timidity, imparting to the face and graceful
carriage of the maiden, that expression of calm
fearlessness, with which she slowly entered the
apartment of the Baron Castine. It was not until
she had reached its center, that summoning all her
resolution for the effort she slowly raised her eye.
The first object which arrested it was a lofty
and dignified form reclining against the table
before
her. His dress was plain and simply
elegant
,
his features were decidedly handsome, nay
there was an expression irresistibly attractive, in
the large, mild, bright eye that seemed calmly
reading her features. But the unsatisfied glance
of Lucy still wandered on in search of that one
dreaded object which filled her thoughts; and
she immediately discovered at the remote end of
the table, a person who seemed to answer to the
fearful picture, and indeed his whole appearance
formed a striking contrast to that of his
companion
;
but her glance sunk quietly down, beneath
the searching cunning of his sunken eye.
And a fair companion for such an one as
thee, said the same musical voice which a few
minutes since had uttered those fearful
threatenings
.
Lucy started with surprise, for that voice
fell from the lips of the mild and pleasant
looking
stranger, who had first attracted her eye.
Father Ralle, he added, turning with a smile
to his companion, thou shalt shrive the
gentle
maiden, and having absolved her from the
guilt of her past heresy, we will seek to initiate
her in the doctrines of the true church. She is
too beautiful to waste her loveliness among the
puritans.
Holy Virgin, exclaimed the other in a tone
of affected horror, how is it possible, that one
who hath wandered even from her infancy in the
wild regions of heresy and sin, should
thus
be
brought into the fold of the blessed shepherd.
Noble Baron, I doubt not but that puritan girl is
a thousand times more ignorant of the true
religion
,
than the wildest savage of these forests.
That were a shame indeed, exclaimed the
maiden suddenly and involuntarily, the proud
current of her English blood mounting high in
her young cheek, it were a sin and a shame for
the daughter of one of its holiest ministers.
An involuntary start announced the
astonishment
of her auditors. They had evidently
supposed
their conversation unintelligible to the
subject of it.
By the rood, Father Ralle, exclaimed the
Baron
,
turning with a smile to the surprised and
incensed
priest, the fair heretic is not so
ignorant
as you would imagine. Nevertheless you
must be her father confessor, if it were only to
absolve her from the pride and sin of that single
sentence.
But the high flush of indignant spirit which for
a moment had given energy to her exhausted
frame, was now again vanished. There was yet
however another effort to be made, suppressing
for a moment the sensations of deadly weariness
that oppressed her, she drew nearer to the table
on which they leaned.
Noble Baron, I pray your pity, she
exclaimed
in a low and faultering voice, I am my
father's
only childhe would purchase my ransom
joyfully.
Father Ralle, you will summon the guard,
exclaimed the Baron shuffling the papers before
him with an air of seeming indifference. It is
time that these arrangements were completed.
The prisoner may retire to her apartment. Let
it be in the south wing and you may bid
Antionette
attend her, until she hears my further
pleasure.
Will gold redeem me? continued the
captive
,
heedless of his orders, and unfastening from
her neck, as she spoke, a richly set miniature.
Ah! beautiful Lucy Mc Gregor, she
continued
,
gazing for a moment earnestly upon it,
my mother will grieve bitterly to part with thee,
but surely, thou art not more precious to her than
her own living Lucy. Baron Castine, will this
redeem
me?
The gentlemen seemed alike startled by the
earnestness of her manner and a heavy frown for
a moment knit the smooth brows of the Baron, as
she laid the jewelled miniature on the table
before
him.
A beautiful picture! exclaimed the priest in
a tone of seeming carelessness. The diamonds
are of the first water my Lord, he continued
approaching
for a nearer survey, but the Baron had
now drawn it towards him, and shading his face
with his hands was evidently surveying it with
much earnestness.
Know you aught of the original? continued
the priest gazing curiously upon the prisoner.
Methinks she was no heretic.
She wasshe was, replied Lucy, with
bitterness
.
When the bigots of the Romish church
wiled her away from the true religion and tore
her from her friends and home, then indeed she
became a heretic. My Lord, she continued
turning to the nobleman who still gazed upon the
miniature, she was my father's cousin, and this
is the last memorial which is left him of one who
was dearer to him than life. And now that too
is goneit is yours. The gold is pure, and the
jewels are true and costlyonly take not away
his only child. I pray you break not altogether
my poor father's heart.
The Baron de Castine raised his eye, a new
expression
seemed to have gathered on his pale
and haughty features, and Lucy Everett read at
once in that stern, cold, and angry glance, that
her prayer was rejected. Her nature could
endure
no more. The objects of the apartment
seemed swimming in sudden darkness before her,
there was a sensation like death, a dim
perception
of strange and stern faces bent around her,
and all was vanished. The wild visions of
delirium
now succeeded that long train of
bewildering
realities; but these were comparatively
happy
,
for now came the soft and beautiful illusions
of home, a father's arm protected her amid every
danger, and even in the moments of her wildest
suffering, the sweet melody of her mother's voice
lulled and soothed her spirit.
21*
CHAPTER VI.
The
illusions of a disordered fancy at length
floated quietly away. Lucy Everett awoke from
a long and refreshing slumber to recollection and
reason.
She was lying on a couch of elegant
workmanship
beneath a light and fanciful covering.
The room though small, was lofty and tastefully
arranged. A few fragrant and fresh gathered
flowers lay scattered on the fair covering; and
a vase containing a still more beautiful variety,
stood on the low toilette beside her.
It was a bright still summer afternoon, and the
lofty window open before her, commanded a
prospect of extreme and varied beauty. A soft
haze hung over the quiet landscape belowthe
broad bay, and clustering islands, and the woody
outline of its far off shores leaning against the
cloudless azure. A faint breeze was just
creeping
along the sleepy wave, slightly stirring the
folds of the muslin curtain, and freshening the
pale brow and cheek of the invalid.
Ah, Holy Mary, thou hast heard my orison,
exclaimed a low whispering tone; and the next
moment a tall young female was bending over
her couch, her dark features glowing with
pleasure
,
and her lip yet trembling with the aspirations
of devotion. Holy Mary, mother of Jesus, thou
hast heard thy suppliant. The English maiden
shall not die among strangers.
There was much that, to Lucy at least, seemed
singular in the person and manner of the young
devotee. Notwithstanding the unusual richness
of her whole dress, and the air of hauteur which
seemed to proclaim the lady of rank, too deep a
shade was mingled over her fine and well
formed
features for a daughter of the European race,
while the soft glow that suffused her countenance
seemed too clear and vivid for the cheek of an
Indian maiden. She wore on her bosom a small
diamond cross, a golden rosary adorned her neck,
and her long dark hair was wound in braided
tresses around her head. But the invalid felt
that it was the face of a stranger; and pained
and wearied, she turned away murmuring in
grieved tones the name of her parents, until a
sudden and violent flood of weeping relieved her
anguish. The stranger, meanwhile, still bent over
her, unconscious of the meaning of those
impassioned
words, and uttering in her foreign language,
every expression of condolence, which sympathy
or affection could suggest.
If you do indeed pity me, exclaimed Lucy,
at length adopting the language of her
companion
,
let me go home and die in my mother's
arms.
Ah, no, heaven forbid, replied the young
lady with a smile. You will not die now.
Your hand is as soft and as cold as my own, and
the deep flush is all faded out. No, English
maiden, I have not thus vainly told my beads.
The Holy Saints and the Blessed Virgin, will not
reject the orisons that, with fasting and incense,
I have offered them.
Oh, talk no more to me of the Virgin Mary,
nor of the Saints, interrupted the invalid. Dear
lady, if you do indeed love me, pray no more for
me in those unworthy names. Oh, it is a
bitter
thing to die,she added, in murmuring
tones,but to die among the despisers of the
true faith, far away from all who love me, and
in the dwelling of this proud and wicked
Baron
Three successive times the lady had crossed
herself during this burst of feeling, and at the
conclusion of it, her keen dark eye flashed with a
sudden expression of wounded pride.
The Baron de Castine is my father, she
exclaimed
,
drawing herself proudly up from the
couch, and though you are a prisoner of war,
and the daughter of his enemy, he hath kindly
and honorably treated you, as though you were
of his own nation. It was he that bade me watch
by your couch, and soothe you in your sickness,
and do all for you that I would have done for
the sister of my love, and now The
remainder
of the sentence was only told in the
proud glance, with which she turned away from
her, and walked slowly to the window. There
was now a short silence, interrupted only by
frequent
and heavy sighs from the couch of the
invalid
.
The eye of the stranger occasionally
returned
,
and with every glance at that pale and
lovely countenance, her resentment seemed
gradually
to grow less powerful, until at length
entirely
forgetting it, amid the glow of generous
emotions, she again approached her couch.
English maiden, I know that you have suffered
long and much, and I forgive your unkindness.
Say no more, she whispered, as an expression of
gratitude trembled on the lip of her young charge,
I know how hard it is to be parted from those
we loveand a mother toomy own is far away
in heaven, and though the daughter of the wild
Mohican race, I mourned for her none the less
bitterly.
Ah, my sweet young nurse, my dear Lady
Antoinette, exclaimed a shrill quick voice,
at the door, how fares your invalid, this
afternoon
.
Better, a thousand times better, was the
reply. Come in, Madame La Framboise,
and see if she be not changed, since
yesterday
.
A small and delicate female now opened the
door, and gently approached the couch. Ah,
yes, my dear young lady, she exclaimed, after
examining, for a few moments, the pulse of the
patient, which though yet languid, was now
calm and regular. The maiden needs only
your kind and gentle nursing, and she is well.
And now, she added in a livelier tone, I may
do you my message from Lieutenant Beaumont;
he says, if you do not join the dance this
evening
Hush, hush, Madame La Framboise,
exclaimed
the other, interrupting her, how can
you thus disturb my patient? and leading her
to the door, she added in a whisper, If the
prisoner continues better, I will join you again
at vespers.
A profound stillness now reigned in the
apartment
,
or if any sounds came upon the breeze
from below, they were softened and blended in
the distance, like some faint cradle air, and long
ere the vesper bell had chimed through the
palace
,
the English captive had sunk into a gentle
slumber.
Madame La Framboise had not vainly calculated
upon the effect of the unwearied attentions of the
Lady Antoinette, and in a few days more, her
unfortunate
charge was so far recovered as to walk from
her couch to the window, while the faint pink of
returning health, hourly deepened on her
countenance
.
The subjects of reflection, however,
which now constantly engaged her attention,
were such as might naturally be supposed to
retard
her recovery. The extreme hopelessness of
her situation,for a long and bloody war was
just opening upon the colonists,her anxiety for
the fate of her parents, and the idea of wasting,
within her prison walls, the bloom of that
existence
which she would joyfully have devoted to
their happiness, all contributed to lower that pitch
of elastic feeling, with which we are wont to
arise from the couch of languishing. She was
not indeed insensible to the many alleviations of
her fate. The kind Antoinette had frequently
assured her of the utmost exertions of her
influence
;
but the idea of escape from that well
guarded fortress, was too hopeless even for the
longing fancy of the captive,and might this be
effected, the impossibility of finding her way
through the forest, effectually checked every
project which friendship or hope could
suggest
.
It was in one of these dispirited frames, that
the captive one evening sat by her window,
watching the last lingerings of day upon the
distant
hills, and warbling a few catches of her
father's
favorite air, while her thoughts wandered
far away, over the expanse of wave and forest,
to the lovely and beloved home of her childhood.
The noise in the court beneath had meanwhile
gradually diminished; and on casting her eye
downward, she perceived that the group of
Indians
and soldiers, who a short time before had
crowded the pavement, was now gradually
diminishing
,
until only a single Indian remained in
sight. He was apparently engaged in mending a
broken bow; but Lucy noticed that as he
persevered
in his employment, his eyes were occasionally
directed, as if by stealth, to the windows of her
apartment.
There was nothing in his appearance or
employment
,
at all peculiar, save that he hummed
as he worked, occasional snatches of that well
remembered song, which Alaska had formerly
used as the vehicle of his communications to her
in the forest; and at times too, she fancied that
the voice itself seemed familiar. But the object
of her curiosity soon arose from the pavement;
and after gazing cautiously about him, he turned
suddenly and directed his aim against the palace
walls. Lucy now watched his seemingly
unimportant
manuvres with intense interest, for the
light was still sufficient to reveal the form and
features of the noble hearted Alaska.
Several times he had shot carelessly against
the wall, as if to test the mended string; but
Lucy had noticed that each successive time the
aim was higher, and she was seeking to ascertain
whether this circumstance was indeed accidental,
when she perceived with surprise that he had
again fixed his aim, and was evidently about to
let fly his arrow, precisely at the spot where she
now stood. In a moment she had retreated from
the window, and the next, the arrow whizzed past
her.
It was several moments ere she had sufficiently
recovered from her surprise to venture from her
retreat, and she then timidly approached to
examine
the arrow. A dark coil was wound around
one of its extremities. It yielded to her touch,
and the next moment a bracelet dropped to the
floor. It was her own, and braided of one of
those auburn locks that had waved on her
mother's
head in the day of her youth and beauty;
and, with a sudden cry of joy, the captive at
once realized that she beheld a token from her
distant home. She leaned again from the
window
.
They who send you this token, maiden, said
Alaska, in low and distinct tones, glancing
cautiously
around him, bade me bring you this
message
also. When one sun more has set, a guide
will wait for you on yonder shore. English
maiden
,
there is one within who can help you. The
daughter of the white chief is good and gentle,
she hath the heart of a Mohican, and she is
mighty. All night the guides will wait for
you, at the white rock beyond the hut of
Wassaic
.
At that moment, the deep toned bell
announced
that the hour of vespers was past; and
Alaska speedily retreated to a distant part of
the court. While yet trembling with the
amazement
which this communication had excited, a
rapid step was heard along the corridor, and
Antoinette
presented herself at the door. That she
was the person to whom Alaska alluded, Lucy
could not for a moment doubt; and the singular
and uniform kindness with which she had from
the first regarded her, together with the repeated
assurance of her sympathy and assistance, all
designated her as a proper object for
confidence
.
The Lady Antoinette listened in silence to the
brief detail. She trod swiftly up and down the
apartment, and there seemed a conflict of
overwhelming
feelings.
Forgive me, Lady Antoinette, exclaimed
Lucy, at length interrupting the painful silence,
if I have presumed too much on your
friendship
.
I had thoughtbut I was wrong. Do not
agitate yourself, Lady Antoinette, you are freed
from any engagements you may in your careless
moments have made me.
Speak lower, Mademoiselle, replied her
companion, pointing to the door of the
apartment
,
the guards were at this end of the
corridor
as I passed, and if they overhear us we are
ruined. I know, my dear girl, that suspicions
are
awakened; for when I kneeled at my
confessions
this morning, the holy Father bade me
remember
a sin of far more deadly hue than aught
that I had owned, and warned me of the guilt of
loving those whom the church regards only with
holy horror. But, Lucy, I do indeed love you,
she added, pausing before her, and her dark eyes
filling with tears. Stranger and heretic though
you are, I love you, may the Blessed Virgin
forgive
me;and for myself, I would joyfully incur
all the anger and reproach, if so I could effect
your escape. But, Lucy, I cannot do this alone.
I must exert my influence over those that love
22
me, to do that which would dishonor their noble
names,secretly and treacherously to release the
prisoners whom the blood of their soldiers hath
purchased. Ah, that any should do this for the
love of Antoinette de Castine! I could do all but
this for you, Lucy Everett.
I believe it, dear lady. I believe that you
would do all for me, that is kind and honorable;
and I desire no more. Forgive me, if the idea of
liberty and happiness, hath made me selfish. Dear
Antoinette, I have had fearful thoughts to-day, I
know that the priests of your religion have ever
deemed the blood of such an one as I, a grateful
offering to heaven. Antoinette, I am a daughter
of the Puritans, and who knows what dark trials
are now in store for me. Nolook not
incredulous
.
I have read too well the history of your
church and mine. Far better had it been for me
to have died in the forest.
Lucy Everett, replied Antoinette, after some
minutes of thoughtful silence, we must make
Madame La Framboise our confidant. Aye,do
not fear her; she is a Catholic indeed, but so are
we all, and she is full of invention and skill, and
knows well how to conduct such stratagems as
we shall have need of. I know too that she pities
your misfortunes.
Antoinette now drew towards the door.
Do not be surprised, she added, in a
whisper
,
if I see you no more to-night. If
suspicions
are once excited, my efforts are all in
vain. But I promise you, by the Mass, and
by this image of our Blessed Mary, that I will
not fail to exert my whole soul, for your
deliverance
.
Lucy Everett could not for a moment doubt
the sincerity of this earnest appeal; but her
heart died within her, as the sound of retreating
steps grew faint in the distance, and she found
herself once more alone, in the solitude of her
prison.
CHAPTER VII.
It
was a sleepless night for more than one in
the palace of Castine; and ere the pale beam of
morning had looked through her curtains, Lucy
had arisen from her weary couch, to await with
renewed fearfulness the crisis of her doom. It
was not until the hour of noon, that Antoinette
again presented herself. Her finger was on her
lip as she entered; and for some minutes only a
few trivial remarks were uttered, evidently
intended
for the ears of those without.
I have confided our secret to Madame La
Framboise, she at last whispered, drawing her
to a remote corner of the room,and she hath
promised her aid to the uttermost.
And is there any hope, dear Antoinette?
exclaimed Lucy, breathing quick and
gaspingly
.
Be calmbe calm, my friend,whispered
the other. It is to your own composure and
presence of mind, that you must now trust for
deliverance. My brother hath this morning
unexpectedly
returned from Quebec. Fear him
not, Lucy. I know he hath the name of a proud
and haughty youth. He hath been much in the
high palaces of the earth until his mien hath
indeed
caught something of their loftiness, but
few have kinder hearts, than Louis de
Castine
.
And is it him that you would persuade to
assist us?
No, Lucy. For the world, I would not have
it said that he connived at this project. The
shamethe disgrace, must all be mine. But no
to relieve a sister in distress, be she catholic
or heretic, friend or enemy, will never degrade
the high purity of a woman's honor;and even if
it would, for you I could bear it joyfully. But,
Lucy, hear me. The Wassaic is of my mother's
kindred, and Louis and I love well a moonlight
sail along those waters. They are counted safe
at present, and when the dews begin to fall, I will
ask him to row me to the dwelling of the Wassaic,
the chief of my mother's tribe.
And how is it possible, dear Antoinette, even
could I escape from these guards, to accompany
you unseen by him?
You cannot, Lucy, replied the other, in a still
lower tone, you cannot
accompany
me, you must
go in my stead.
Lucy felt at once that the project was not
hopeless. The French maiden was tall and
slender like herself; and though her complexion
and whole countenance, presented a striking
contrast to her own, now pale and delicate,
from recent illness, the plan was yet worth
attempting. A careful disguise would do much
towards concealing it; and the darkness of
evening
,
more.
And if the discovery should take place too
soon, exclaimed Lucy, as these thoughts passed
hastily through her mind.
Tell him the whole, dear Lucy. He has a
22*
kind and generous heart; and I know that, for
my sake, he will not betray you. And as for the
idea of his assisting your escape, if he alarms the
palace on his return with the news of it, it will
be enough. Dear Lucy, do not tremble thus.
Keep your soul calm and quiet for this
emergency
.
No, I cannot stay, she added, as the
captive
would fain have detained her longer.
Madame
La Framboise is at this moment waiting for
me. Fear nothing, Lucy, only be cool and
collected
.
Notwithstanding this latter injunction, the
remainder
of the afternoon was passed by the captive
in a state of excitement, bordering on distraction.
One moment,
home
with its thousand soothing
endearments, friends, and kindred, all seemed her
own; the agony of fear was over and she lay
a free and happy being weeping on her mother's
bosom. The next, an imprisonment far more
gloomy and hopeless, arose to her fancy; she
remembered the ferocity of the Roman
priesthood
,
and cruelties untried and unknown, nay,
death itself, seemed the fearful alternative.
Overcome with these agitating reflections, she
had hardly noticed the flight of time, until the
broad disk of the sun just lingered above the
forest
,
throwing a last flood of radiance over the
objects of her apartment. The captive now
ceased her wearied step; and with flushed cheek
and throbbing heart she threw herself on her
couch, seeking with a strong effort to recover
something of that calmness which she knew her
exigencies so much required. Several minutes
more elapsed, ere any sound broke the stillness.
Gay voices were then heard in conversation
without
;the
lock turned, and the next moment,
Madame La Framboise and the Lady Antoinette
stood within.
Hasten, Mademoiselle, exclaimed Madame
La Framboise, as with rapid movements she now
unfastened the veil. Fifteen minutes more,
and the vesper bell will toll;we must lose no
moments.
The exchange of dresses was quickly made;
but it was in vain that Antoinette strove to
assume
an appearance of composure. Her hand
trembled violently, as she clasped the rosary
about the neck of her friend; and her efforts at
firmness only rendered her tones more faultering,
as she repeatedly murmured that there was no
cause for fear. Madame La Framboise alone
seemed calm and collected. With surprising
composure she arranged and re-arranged the
beautiful apparel, until each slight dissimilarity
of figure had vanished, and the metamorphosis
seemed complete.
And now fear nothing, Lucy Everett,
exclaimed
Antionette, the boat is ready and Louis
hath promised to go the moment that Vespers are
over. You must attend the Massnay, I would
have saved you the trial if I could, but you
will not be detected. A few moments since
I left the drawing room in that very dress;
and if you are silent no one will suspect the
change. Draw the veil closely around your face
in the chapel; Louis de Castine will meet you at
the door, for the rest, trust Heaven.
The arrangements were now completed, but
Lucy Everett still lingered. Amid the confusion,
the hurry and agony of suspense, the idea of a
separation from her generous benefactress, had
scarcely occupied a moment's attention, and until
now she had never perceived how strong were
the feelings which that unwearied kindness had
kindled. The ties of human love are various as
the tints of autumn leaves; but there are none
more tender and beautiful, than those which
spring up between the lonely and the sorrowing,
and those who have lightened their sorrows or
gladdened their loneliness. The catholic and
puritan wept like sisters in the parting embrace.
Hasten, hasten, interrupted Madam la
Framboise
,
the minutes are precious andhark
there is the vesper bell.
Fare thee well, sweet English maiden, said
Antionette, at length withdrawing her embrace.
We shall see each others' faces no more here,
but by the cross and rosary on your neck,
remember
the catholic girl that loved you.
Come, come, Lady Antoinette, said Madame
La Framboise, drawing Lucy's arm in hers as she
threw open the door. If you linger longer here,
the mass will be over ere we reach the chapel,
and so saying she sallied forth into the corridor,
with her trembling companion. The bell still
tolled as they hurried on.
Ah me, Lady Antoinette, exclaimed Madam
La Framboise as they drew near the soldiers who
guarded the entrance of the hall, how I pity
these solitary prisoners. I am sure if I were
yonder
English captive, I should have died long ago
of very loneliness.
Lucy clasped her arm convulsively in hers, for
at that moment they were passing the door.
The soldiers bowed reverently, and they moved
on unquestioned and unsuspected. They still
pressed on through several lofty and dimly lighted
apartments.
We are almost at the chapel, said her
companion
in a whisper, as they descended a narrow
staircase. The saints be praisedwe have
encountered
no one as yet, and the danger is almost
over. Imitate me, my dear young lady, when we
enter and fear nothing. The Holy Virgin will
protect you.
Lucy had now need of some higher
encouragement
than aught which the benediction of the
catholic could impart, for at that moment the
bell ceased, the door opened, and amid a stream
of pure and beautiful light they moved slowly
through the aisles of the chapel. Oh the tumult
and agony of that moment! To the agitated heart
of the prisoner, every eye in this throng of
worshippers
,
seemed at once to have detected
beneath
her light disguise, the form and features
of the English Heretic. But this was soon past.
In a moment after, she was bowing beside her
companion, silent and unnoticed.
A quick succession of overpowering ideas
crowded to the mind of the young puritan, as
those rites and ceremonies which from her
earliest
recollection she had regarded only with
unmingled
horror, now burst upon her in all their
imposing splendor. She raised her eye,
loosening
for a moment the crowded folds that veiled her
features. The lights, the pictures, the wreathing
music, the low, rich mournful melody from the
chanting choir, all came over her bewildered
fancy
like the dim shadows of that land where the
faint perceptions of faith vanish amid the light
of glorious realities.
Surprised and indignant at this powerful effect
on her feelings, she now strove altogether to
divert
her attention, and in wandering over the
chapel, her eye became fixed on a figure near the
door, standing alone and erect amid the kneeling
throng. The rich military habit denoted an
elevated
rank, and a look of calm and conscious
superiority
lingered on every feature. There were
traces of deep thought and feeling on his
countenance
,
almost contradicting the extreme youth
otherwise indicated. His eye wandered
carelessly
over the kneeling assembly, and now and then
a shade of contempt deepened the cold smile
with which he surveyed them. Lucy gazed for a
moment in suspense, but it was only for a
moment
;
and with a thrill of delight and
astonishment
she now recognized the lonely and disguised
stranger who had once so deeply claimed her
sympathy.
Are you mad young maiden? said a low
whisper beside her, at once recalling the
recollection
of her fearful situation. Have the
catholics
no eyes? For heaven's sake draw your veil,
or we are ruined. Madam La Framboise might
well utter these astonished and terrified
exclamations
;
for in the joy of that unexpected
recognition
,
her young companion had for a
moment
forgotten the perilous circumstances that
surrounded her. Quickly and tremblingly the
injunction was obeyed; the worshippers were
rising, and in the ceremonies which now ensued
every nerve was indeed in fearful requisition.
At length the last benediction was said, the
assembly
began quickly to disperse; and Lucy
Everett, leaning on the arm of her companion,
moved slowly through the crowded aisle.
Notwithstanding the drapery which now so
thickly veiled her features, Lucy could still dimly
perceive the form of the young officer standing
unmoved, near the entrance. They were
approaching
the spot where he stood, and a single
word or look might make him aware of her
presence. But at that moment, a quick
pressure
of her arm again warned her of the perils
around her.
Look, Antoinette, said her companion in her
usual careless tone, see here is your brother
waiting to accompany you.
Where, where, whispered Lucy, returning
the grasp convulsively, and in vain seeking to
discover among the crowd the person to whom
she alluded.
Hush, dear child, there is no danger,
whispered
the other, and then aloud, we will wait
here for him, Antoinette. It cannot be long ere
he joins us.
But at that moment another glimpse at the
mysterious stranger, again absorbed her whole
attention
.
His eye was earnestly fixed upon her.
Had he then detected her earnest glances? Her
heart throbbed convulsively, for he was now
advancing
to meet them.
Come Antoinette, are you ready? said the
stranger in that well remembered voice, which
had last rung on her ear amid the forest of H.
The boat is waiting for us. Are you ready for
the excursion?
Readyaye that she is, answered Madame
La Framboise, disregarding the sudden emotion
evinced by her companion. You had better
take your brother's arm, Antoinette, she
continued
with a slight and meaning pressure, and at
the same time disengaging herself from her
clinging
grasp. You will hardly return before
midnight
,
and so I bid you good evening, continued
the lady as they moved into the hall. A
pleasant
row, and smiling and bowing she
disappeared
.
Surprised, bewildered, and embarrassed beyond
measure, with her arm in that of her companion,
Lucy now moved rapidly through the palace.
Hethe brother of Antoinette de Castineand
she could scarce restrain the expressions of her
doubt and amazement, as with rapid and almost
unconscious steps she now trod the pavement
without. To reveal herself at once, and claim
his protection, was her first hasty resolution; but
the next moment the conversation of her
benefactress
returned to her recollection. It was
Louis de Castine as well as the stranger whose
life her own exertions had once redeemed; and
though the idea of personal danger had now
vanished
,
every other reason for maintaining her
disguise
as long as practicable, was still as urgent
as before. At length they stood on the shore,
just above the point where Lucy and her
savage
companions had first landed. It was a clear
and beautiful night, the dewy breeze blew cool
and gently over her, as she landed in the shadow
of the rock while her companion slowly loosened
the boat from its moorings. The sweet waters of
the Penobscot lay before them, smooth and
beautiful
,
now and then softly leaving the pebbled
shore; and the sounds of life came in low and
mingled murmurs from the height above.
The soul of the young maiden grew calm amid
these soothing influences. And now as the light
oars rose and fell, slowly and gracefully, the boat
moved forth from the shadows of the shore,
scarcely
leaving a trace of her light path amid the
liquid
moonbeams. Lucy Everett gazed on the
dark rock and its frowning walls, so long her
prison
,
now slowly receding in the distance, and for
the first time amid the agitating events of the
evening, the consciousness of her freedom rushed
upon her mind. Those fearful barriers were at
length pastthe guarded hall, the court, the
battlements
,
all were safely past, she was no longer
a captive; and her whole soul rose, like a freed
bird rejoicing.
Antoinette, exclaimed her companion, now
for the first time interrupting the stillness, you
have grown strangely silent since vespers.
Aye.
Aye, indeed, but it is not your usual fault, and
I acknowledge it requires some vanity to
interrupt
this beautiful stillness. I can forgive you,
Antoinette, and the more especially as I am
determined
for this evening to engross a due share
of the conversation myself.
Indeed, replied his companion, hardly
daring
to exceed the monosyllable.
Yes, a new resolution you think. But a
truce to your railing now, Antoinette. It will do
well enough for yonder gay drawing room, but
even my sad words and feelings better become
an hour like this. Indeed, Antoinette, he added
in a different tone, I have more causes for
sadness
than you dream of.
Lucy felt painfully that her part was now
indeed
but ill performed. She well knew what
rich tones of kindness such an annunciation
would have drawn from the affectionate
Antoinette
,
but she dared not to trust her voice and
she was silent.
To commence then, with my important
communication
,
continued the youth, I am about
23
to leave you, Antoinette. In five days I sail for
France. He paused and seemed waiting for
her comments, but only a sudden start announced
the emotion of his auditress. You are
doubtless
surprised at a resolution like this, at such a
crisis. I know that the war which is but just
opening upon these colonies, seems to you only a
field of glory, where I might reap the laurels for
which I have so long panted. But, Antoinette,
it is that very crisis which occasions my
departure
.
In such a war there isthere can be, no
honorable part for me.
And why? exclaimed Lucy, who felt that
silence
now would not be overlooked.
Do not mistake me, Antoinette. To the war
in general, my remark has no application. As a
war between France and England, I would yield
my last life-drop freely in its battles. But as
waged in these distant portions of the kingdom,
a mere tool of selfish and fiendish purposesas a
war between the catholics and colonistsas a
war of bloody and unprovoked extermination
between
a few ambitious and powerful individuals,
and a simple, high minded people, I cannotI
will not engage in it. Antoinette, you are my
father's
child and have ever been to me a true
and noble hearted sister. I will withhold
nothing
from you.
He paused a moment, and the impropriety, the
indelicacy of thus intruding upon his confidence,
became now so extremely embarrassing to his
companion
,
that only a constant recurrence to the
instructions
of her benefactress, prevented her from
revealing her character. But surely it would ill
become her, to cast a blot upon the name of one
whom Antoinette called brother; and
determining
to preserve her disguise, until the appearance
of her promised guides, should relieve her
companion
from all wilful share in her escape, she
still maintained a painful silence.
Antoinette, continued the youth, among
the individuals of whom I speak, you know that
the Baron Castine is pre-eminent. He is your
father, and mine, and as such I would fain speak
of him with reverence; but as to this unnatural
and deadly policy which he is now adopting, I
must say of it, and will say it fearlesslymy
whole soul abhors it. Think for a moment,
Antoinette
,
if you can, of that fearful system of means
in operation around us. Think of the high and
holy influences of religion, so awfully perverted
as to arouse, and keep forever alive in the minds
of these savages, those deadly passions which are
to be satisfied only with the extermination of
these puritan colonies. And, Antoinette, you
know too the fearful circumstances of their
warfare
.
Think, if you can, without shuddering, of
these beautiful settlements laid waste, and
hundreds
and hundreds of helpless beings captured
or murdered in cold blood, without the shadow of
a crime, and all for the aggrandizement of a
single ambitious individual. I say, Antoinette,
I will never soil my spirit with any agency,
however
remote, in crimes like these. I have made
one effort, and it shall be my last. Our estate in
France requires my presence; and there I shall
await the termination of this struggle.
Antoinette, continued the young officer after
a few moment's pause, interpreting the silence
of his companion into an expression of
displeasure
,
I have spoken warmly, but I would that
you at least should know the secret springs of
my actions, and I will say yet more. The church
whose authority you reverence, the religion you
love, with all its allurements, its splendid and
imposing
forms of devotion, I have learned to look
upon as only a mighty fabric of human pride and
error. Nay more, the doctrines of those whom,
from your earliest recollection, you have been
taught to despise as heretics, are to me the pure
and sublime revelations of Heaven. Antoinette,
my mother was a protestant.
A protestant? replied his companion
involuntarily
.
Aye, I had thought you aware of this
circumstance
.
She died indeed in my early infancy
but not until she had stamped her own sweet
picture
on my memory, the image of all things holy
and beautiful. My childhood too was past among
the cottages of the Waldenses, in the dwelling of
my nurse, a simple and pious woman, to whose
care my mother's dying lips had consigned my
earliest years. It was there, where the bones of
slaughtered saints lay bleaching on the Alpine
mountains cold, in those valleys where the blood
of the true and holy had in all ages been poured
forth like water, that I learned to love those
persecuted
exiles, and surely it would ill become
such an one to stain his hand in their blood. But,
Antoinette, I will say no more on this subject,
continued the youth, after again pausing in vain
for a reply. It must ever be a painful one,
while we differ thus widely; but I have still
another
secret to confide to you. Listen patiently.
It is a trust, a sacred obligation which I am about
to confer upon.
There was now an evident embarrassment in
the tones of the speaker. Antoinette, he at
length resumed, you know my life has been past
in foreign climes. I have seen many of the high
and the rich and the lovely, unfascinated; but
Antoinette, I have at last found a flower that I
could love. A rose has sprung up on my lonely
path, wild indeed, and uncultured, but one that
I could win and wear forever. My sister, I must
leave these shores, but I leave behind me one
whose love could make the lone wilderness bright
and beautiful as Eden.
A cold dew gathered on Lucy's brow; she
breathed slow, and heavily.
During my late secret expedition, continued
her companion, I met with a beautiful
high-minded
and gentle creature, all unlearned in the
knowledge of a cold and heartless world, but just
such an one as the bright ideal around which my
affections have ever clustered. She was a
puritan
girl, and her name, Lucy Everett.
A half murmured exclamation burst from the
lips of his auditress.
Nay, hear me through, my sister, I know your
prejudices are all arrayed, but hear me through.
To your energy and decision of character, I am
about to confide a sacred trust. Lucy Everett
is now a prisoner of the Indians, perhaps,and
his voice sunk, perhaps already their victim.
The very night I left her native village, it was
burned and plundered, and many of its
inhabitants
made captive. Among these were Lucy
Everett
and her servant. The latter I found among
the prisoners at Quebec, but of the former I can
learn nothing, save that she was separated from
the rest on the first night of her captivity.
Antoinette
,
you have influence with our father, you
have powerful friends among these tribes. Let
23*
me entreat you by your sisterly affection, to
ascertain
her fate, and to spare no pains or toils for
her deliverance. You hesitate. Now my sister,
you have an opportunity of proving the truth of
your affection. As the preserver of my life,
Lucy Everett claims your kindness. During my
residence at H, Vandreuil, fully aware of my
sentiments with regard to some of his
proceedings
,
dispatched messengers with instructions to
murder me in secret, and but for the exertions,
of this same Lucy Everett, I might now be
sleeping in a distant and unknown grave. Oh
had I time to tell you all, you would not wonder
that I had loved this puritan stranger. And,
Antoinette
,
she was like my mothermy beautiful
and sainted mother, just such an one as I have
heard her described, when she first came to our
castle from her lowly and sequestered dwelling.
Her character, her religion, her nation were the
same, and her name too, my fair mother's name
was LucyLucy Mc Gregor.
Lucy McGregor! repeated his auditress, in
amazement, completely thrown off her guard by
this unexpected disclosure. Can it be?Lucy
McGregor the Baroness de Castine? But she
suddenly ceased her hurried exclamations; her
companion was now gazing at her with looks of
fixed astonishment.
Antoinette! Antoinette! he exclaimed
doubtingly
.
Prythee speak againyou have been
sparing of your words this evening; and sure the
light is not so dazzling, that you need sit with
that impenetrable veil around you. Antoinette,
he exclaimed, with increased surprise, as his
companion
still remained silent and immoveable
surely this is no occasion for trifling.
It was impossible longer to elude discovery.
The young maiden slowly drew aside her veil, a
shower of moonbeams fell upon her countenance,
revealing at once to the eye of her astonished
companion, the fair, rose-dyed features of Lucy
Everett.
The oar dropped from his hand. There was
something almost ludicrous, in the expression of
that sudden and bewildered astonishment, with
which he now silently surveyed her.
Briefly and simply, Lucy Everett told her tale.
Meanwhile, they were slowly veering towards the
appointed place of rendezvous, and the small white
rock was now clearly visible, breaking the green
outline of the shore.
And do you think then, exclaimed the youth
in reply to her last remark, that I would thus
idly throw away my recovered treasure? What
proof have you of the good faith of the savage
Alaska? And how know we, that the whole may
not be some treacherous scheme of these Indians,
to recover again their victim?
But the token, sir. It was my own bracelet.
I cannot be mistaken, and look yonder is their
signal. At that moment, a red and brilliant
stream of light burst from the shore near the
foot of the rock.
Louis de Castine looked earnestly thither.
He leaned for a moment silently upon his oar.
Return! Did I hear you aright, Lucy Everett?
Return to the palace and spread the alarm! Are
these the lessons of gratitude you would teach
me. No, dear Lucy, he added again plying the
oar, I leave you no more until I see you safe
under your father's protection.
They had now approached so near the shore,
that a low murmur of voices reached their ears,
and a single figure at that moment became
visible
,
standing in the shadow of the rock.
It is Alaska, whispered Lucy, as her
companion
looked sternly and suspiciously towards
him. Believe me, sir, you wrong him. There
is no room for treachery in his noble heart.
Well then, my sweet sister, murmured the
youth suddenly assuming an air of playfulness,
which became his handsome features; I have
one word more for your private ear. Do not
forget that I have this evening made you my
confident
,
that I have laid open to you my whole
heart, the very sanctum sanctorum of my
affections
.
But you have not as yet, by word or look,
intimated your approval. My sweet sister, may I
construe this silence in my favor? When I am far
away in a foreign clime, toiling wearily for the
vain distinctions and honors of this earth, may I
not have the assurance, that this consecration of
my affections is at least not regarded with
displeasure
?
Oh when my thoughts wander to those
distant shores, and that one being for whom alone
the laurels of earth are worth reaping, let me feel
that my devotion is not regarded as wholly
unworthy
of its object.
My brother, replied the maiden with a smile
brushing away the dew that had gathered on her
cheek, she of whom you speak is a lowly
being
,
and all unworthy of the love of one so noble.
It is a destiny too exalted for such an one as Lucy
Everett. As she spoke, the light gleamed full
upon her countenance; she drew the veil once
more around her, but not until Louis de Castine
had read upon her bright and blushing features,
the full approval of his love.
They were now landed in silence, among the
clustering foliage at a short distance below the
rock; and leaning upon the arm of her
conductor
,
Lucy Everett moved tremblingly along the
shore. Ere long, Alaska presented himself from
the thicket. A gleam of joy kindled his dark
features as he recognized the English captive,
but this was immediately exchanged for
something
of sadness, of deep and melancholy
curiosity
,
as he glanced upon the form of her conductor.
After gazing a moment in silence, he pointed to
the thicket before them; and winding around a
narrow and hidden path, they now followed his
steps.
In a few moments, they found themselves
standing
upon the edge of a wide area, in the center
of which rose the blaze which had served as their
signal. Several Indians were scattered on the
grass around it, and two or three figures like
those of armed soldiers, slowly pacing before it.
For a few moments, Lucy Everett and her
companion
stood the silent and surprised spectators
of the scene; but the eye of the former soon
rested on a single figure, apart from the rest, and
reclining in the attitude of devotion. His face
was turned from them, but the light gleamed full
upon his venerable form, and on the gray hair as
it stirred with the evening breeze.
The next moment, with a wild and joyful cry,
Lucy Everett had sprung from her retreat. My
father! Now heaven be praised, I have found my
father.
Bewildered at that unexpected greeting, the
old man raised his eye to the fair creature that
was bending over him. She flung back the
mantling
drapery, and there, in the light apparel of
the catholic maiden, she stood, the loved and
wept, his own long lost and beautiful daughter.
* * * * * * *
Years rolled on, and the war-cloud still
brooded
over the colonies of New-England, when the
young Baron de Castine once more set foot on its
shores. Oh the fearful traces that a few short
years can write on the cherished treasures of
earth! Castine was desolateits frowning walls
were levelled, and he who had reared them was
buried amid the wilderness. Antoinette too was
gone, his noble and true hearted sister; and she
now moved in a distant circle of rank and fashion,
the wife of the accomplished Beaumont.
And the young beautiful puritan? She too was
changed. Four years had not passed so idly,
that the warm dreams of sixteen summers still
lingered on her brow. Four years of filial
devotion
,
of patient, unwearying, unmurmuring care
had not left their own fair traces in the heart, and
on the face of the gentle and lovely.
Lucy Everett was an orphan. They to whom
she had been as the green clustering ivy on the
ruins, had gone, one by one, to heaven, and had
left her on the earth a lonely orphan.
So she bade a last farewell to the green graves
of her parents, and her native land, and ere long
the ancient castle of Castine rung with shouts of
welcome to the youthful Baroness, no less kind
and beautiful, but more blessed of heaven than
her unfortunate predecessor.Extract from a Report made to Gov. Endicot by Thomas
Kellond and Thomas Kirk.
Honorable Sir.
We, according to your honor's
order
,
departed in search after Colonels Goffe and
Whalley
(persons declared traitors to his Majesty) from
Boston
,
May 27th, 1661, about six o'clock at night, and
arrived
at Hartford the 10th day, and repaired to
Governor
Winthrop, and gave him your honor's letter and
his Majesty's order for the apprehending of Colonels
Whalley and Goffe, who gave us an account that they
did not stay there, but went directly for New-Haven, but
informed us that one Symon Lobden guided them to
the town. The honorable governor carried himself very
nobly to us, and was very diligent to supply us with all
manner of conveniences for the prosecution of them,
and promised all diligent search should be made after
them in that jurisdiction, which was afterwards
performed
.
The 11th day we arrived at Guilford, and
repaired
to the deputy governor, William Leet, and delivered
him your honor's letter and the copy of his Majesty's
order for the apprehending of the aforesaid persons,
with whom at that time were several persons. After
the perusal of them, he began to read them audibly,
whereupon we told him it was convenient to be more
private in such concernments as that was; upon which
withdrawing to a chamber, he told us he had not seen
the two colonels not in nine weeks. We acquainted
him with the information we had received that they were
at New-Haven since that time he mentioned, and
there-upon
desired him to furnish us with horses, &c.
which was prepared with some delays, which we took
notice of to him, and after parting with him out of
his house and in the way to the ordinary, came to us one
Dennis Scranton, and told us he would warrant that
Colonels Goffe and Whalley at the time of his
speaking
were harbored at the house of one Mr. Davenport,
a minister at New-Haven, and that one Goodman
Bishop
,
of the town of Guilford, was able to give us the like
account, and that, without all question, Deputy Leet
knew as much, and that Mr. Davenport had put in ten
pounds worth of fresh provisions at one time into his
house, and that it was imagined it was purposely for the
entertainment of them.
And the said Scranton said further, that Goffe
and Whalley should say, that if they had but two
hundred
friends that would stand by them, they would not
care for Old or New-England; whereupon we asked
if he would depose to that: he replied he would, that it
was openly spoken by them in the head of a company
in the field a training. Which words were also
confirmed
by several others, as also information that Goffe
and Whalley were seen very lately betwixt the houses
of Mr. Davenport and one Mr Jones, and it was
imagined
that one lay at one of their houses, and the other
at the other's. Upon which we went back to the
Deputy's
and required our horses, with aid and a power to
search and apprehend them; the horses were provided
for us, but he refused to give us any power to apprehend
them, nor order any other, and said he could do nothing
until he had spoken with one Mr. Gilbert and the rest
of the magistrates; upon which we told him we should
go to New-Haven and stay till we had heard from him,
but before we took horse the aforesaid Dennis Scranton
gave us information, there was an Indian of the town
wanting, which he told us was to give notice of our
coming.
And being at New-Haven, which was the thirteenth
day, the deputy arrived within two hours or thereabouts
after us, and came to us to the Court Chamber, where
we again acquainted him with the information we had
received, and that we had cause to believe they were
concealed in New-Haven, and there upon we required
his assistance and aid for their apprehension; to which
he answered that he did not believe they were there.
Whereupon we desired him to empower us, or order
others for it; to which he gave us this answer, that he
could, nor would not make us magistrates; we replied,
that we ourselves would personally adventure in the
search and apprehension of them in two houses where
we had reason to imagine they lay hid, if they would
give way to it and enable us; to which he replied, he
neither would nor could not do any thing until the
freemen
met together. To which we set before him the
danger of that delay and their inevitable escape, and
how much the honor and service of his Majesty was
despised and trampled on by him, and that we
supposed
by his unwillingness to assist in the apprehension,
he was willing they should escape. After which he
left us and went to several of the magistrates and were
together five or six hours in consultation, and upon
breaking up of their council, they would not nor could
not do any thing until they had called a general court of
freemen. Whereupon we represented to them your
Honor's and Governor Winthrop's warrants as
precedents
,
who upon the receipt of his Majesty's pleasure
and order concerning the said persons, stood not
upon
such niceties and formalities, but endeavored to make
all expedition in seizing on them, if to be found in their
government, and also how your honor had
recommended
this grand affair to him, and how much the honor and
justice of his Majesty was concerned, and how ill his
sacred Majesty would resent such horrid and detestable
concealment and abettings of such traitors and
regicides
as they were, and asked him whether he would
honor and obey the king or no in this affair, and set
before
him the danger which by law is incurred by any one
that conceals or abets traitors; to which the deputy
Leet answered, we honor his majesty, but we have
tender
consciences.
This was the substance of our proceedings, there
were other circumstantial expressions, which are too
tedious to trouble your honor withall, and which we have
given your honor a verbal account of, and conceive it
needless to insist any further; and so finding them
obstinate
and pertinacious in their contempt of his
Majesty
,
we came away the next day in prosecution after
them, according to instructions, to the governor of
Manhados
,
from whom we received civil respects, and a
promise, if they were within his jurisdiction, we should
command what aid we pleased, but for sending of them
according to your honor's request, he could not answer
it to his masters at home, but if they came there he should
give your honor timely notice. Whereupon we
requested
his honor, the governor of Manhados to lay a
restraint
upon all shipping from transporting them, which
he promised should be done, and also to give order to
25
his fiscal or chief officer to make private search in all
vessels for them that were going thence.
Upon which finding any other means ineffectual,
we made our return hither by sea, to give your
honor
an account, and to which (when your honor shall
require it) are ready to depose to the truth of it, and
remain,
Sir,
Your honor's humble servants,
Thomas Kellond,
Thomas Kirk,
Boston,
May 29th, 1661.
30th May, 1661.